
Abbot Kinney
Red Lion of Venice
by
Elayne Alexander





An Authorized Biography


Dedication
 Kendrick and Barbara Kinney

          My first meeting with this handsome couple occurred subsequent to my sending them a letter and requesting information about the Kinney family tree. I was writing a book called Abbot Kinney’s Venice of America. The work was a public service project for Los Angeles Westside Genealogical Society and we were stuck! I invited Kendrick and Barbara to lunch at the Sidewalk Café in Venice on Ocean Front Walk. Being the anxious type, I arrived first. When I informed the maître d’ that I was waiting for the grandson of Abbot Kinney, he replied, “Who is Abbot Kinney?” I knew at that moment that there was need in this town for more written material concerning the history.
          On that day, a collaboration was born and it continues up to the present. Although Kendrick passed away January of 2010, Barbara and I continue to have lunch and exchange ideas. She is strongly supportive of this book because she knows it was her husband’s wish that I write it. Sadly he did not live to see this volume.
          Kendrick, son of Innes and Helen Hawk Kinney, and I travelled to many libraries, historical societies, and to his grandfather’s holdings in Sierra Madre, now East Pasadena. The great house, gardens, and orchards are long deceased but the old Mexican oven, reservoir, and small stone cooling house are still extant. Area historians, Jane Calhoun, Marianna Bowman, and Greg McReynolds spent many hours with “K.K.” (as he called himself in notes to me,) and myself and even produced a few buried pieces from the dwelling at Kinneloa.
          Like his grandfather, a self-made man, K.K. was pushed into the world at an early age. His father died when he was 16 and it was suddenly his responsibility to support a mother and sister. After a difficult construction job, his aunt, Mabel (Mrs. Thornton Kinney) procured positions for him in the film industry. Working his way up the ladder of success, he achieved the status of Academy Award-nominated sound editor. Some of his more notable movies were The Wizard of Oz, Gone With the Wind, The Wreck of the Mary Deere, Ben Hur, Silent Service, North by Northwest, The Dirty Dozen, and What’s Up, Doc?
          Nearly two decades of our roaming and questioning passed as well as my having written four books on the history of Venice. And one day when I was invited to the Kinney house for lunch, Kendrick questioned if I would write the biography of his grandfather. I smiled and replied, “I thought you would never ask!”
          Barbara Zenker Kinney was and is a drop-dead gorgeous woman, as seen in the above picture. Her beauty is only exceeded by her good heart and disposition. In the deepest sense of the word, she is a lady.
           Barbara is the daughter of Herbert Robert and Alma Kress Zenker, San Francisco natives, who moved to Los Angeles in the 1920s. Barbara was born in Hollywood. She graduated from U.S.C. College of Dentistry with a B.S. in Dental Hygiene.
          The Kinneys had only one child, a son, Robert Innes, born in 1958, who married Catherine Stoughton. They have two teenage children: Peter Abbot and Anne Marie Kinney.
          As her husband inched closer to his 90th birthday his memory began to falter. He would loan me books or photos to copy and then was unsure if I returned them. Barbara instituted a library loan process, which satisfied all parties concerned and solved the dilemma. I am grateful for her common sense and creativity.
          She has always been kind to me and unceasingly hospitable. When I tell her I owe her 100 lunches, she laughs and says, “You do not!!!” Through all of the years that I have known her she has nurtured our friendship with good food, good humor, and unfailing optimism. She took me once to a yacht club and pointed to a spot. “I met Kendrick right there,” she said, with a wistful smile on her face. They were married 52 years.
          I love both of these people and always will. I am only who I am directly because of them. They changed my life forever. 







Acknowledgments

          First and foremost I would like to thank Paddy Calistro McAuley and her staff for believing in this project enough to accept it for publication in in a faltering economy. Much gratitude to Amy Inouye for the delightful design of this book. She is a talented lady!
          Todd von Hoffmann carefully scanned and corrected all of the book’s photos in a short period of time despite the fact that he was remodeling his house. He was unfailingly cheerful about it even though his walls were torn out, wires dangled, plastic tarps covered most of the furniture, Olivia, his parrot, was squawking her displeasure, and he was having to constantly wipe sawdust from his MAC and from two chairs for us to sit. Theo, his wife was so courteous of my (had to be unwanted) presence and she gave me MAC help and editing assistance later in the progression of the manuscript. She is known universally for her warm heart. I thank them with all of mine!
          If there were ever an annual award given for Most Generous Historian then Marc Wanamaker would own a mantel groaning with the weight of dozens of statuettes. From his enormous collection, he dredged up negatives from more than two decades past when he copied the Venice construction photos, at my behest, from the Kinney family archives. He copied these again for me and mailed a disk so they would have a place in this book.
          Never, ever short in the generosity department are my friends, John and Sarah Schacht. Many pictures seen on these pages belong to them. Whenever I have asked to use any images from their collection the answer has always been “…anything you want.” Of particular note are the glass transparencies that John purchased on Ebay and allowed me to take to a lab for copying. They are so fragile and I am indebted to them for their trust. John and Sarah (the world’s greatest southern cook) are forever friends.
          I am most grateful to the extended Kinney family for their cooperation over the years. Not to be forgotten is the late Jackie Gerety Konrad who filled in some blanks about the second Mrs. Abbot Kinney and Jeremy Kinney who was quite generous in sharing the details of his predecessor, Francis Sherwood Kinney and the Kinney Brothers Tobacco Company.
          The late Navalette Tabor Bailey, the late Thelma Brawley and her son, George Pryce were most helpful regarding situations dealing with Mrs. Winifred Kinney as well as general background regarding early Venice. Sonya Reese Greenland provided the data for the very gifted Arthur Reese. Thank you all!
          I gratefully acknowledge the Kinneloa historians, Jane Calhoun, Marianna Bowman, and Greg McReynolds for their willingness to share early days at Sierra Madre (now East Pasadena) and the volumes of literature provided by these friendly folks. Greg is the very talented artist whose creations grace the pages of Red Lion. He also did some special research for me to answer last minute questions.
          Betty Lou and Randy Young are well-known for their work in Rustic Canyon, especially the era when Abbot Kinney designed a town and planned a forestry station in that district. I am grateful for their providing this little-known history of the Doge-to-be. 
          I cherish the memory of the late Herman Hartzel who casually taught me the art of copy photography over the years when I used his photo services. He kept his prices very low, he told me, because he knew how important these pictures would be to the future. 
          Steve Stuzinski, image historian and new friend, discovered a very important pre-1920 photo album which Todd von Hoffmann found on Ebay and alerted me. I was privileged to visit Steve’s home and see his fine collection before purchasing the album.
          I would be very remiss if I did not mention three men who wrote books about Venice prior to my own: Jeffrey Stanton, Tom Sewell, and Tom Moran. Their works helped me to understand the town and its amusements clearly enough to begin research of my own. Arnold Springer provided some clarification on the canals in a book done after my first effort was published. The subject of Venice is still utterly fascinating to me. It was only by standing on their shoulders that I am able to see and record the details.
          I am always amazed when people who barely know me loan me their precious pictures without hesitation. Such was the case with movie producer/director, Tony Bill. For the use of his collection and his trust, I thank him.
          My regard and respect to Jim Hofer, Recorder, City of Riverside, who was kind enough to call me with leads concerning the grantor/grantee land index in his keeping. Also to Charles Johnson, formerly of the Ventura County Museum for checking Abbot 
Kinney’s presence (or absence) at the Channel Islands.
          I am indebted to Tom Anderson for many years of willingly provided information about Venice High School. Tom’s archives of that institution are amazing and were the basis of a book produced and designed by Nan Chorpash and authored by myself in 2011.
          For confidence and encouragement, I am grateful to the Venice Heritage Foundation and especially Stephen Pouliot. Arthur Verge, Ph.D., deserves many thanks for reading this and providing ideas, as well as loaning me George Freeth information. He gave me entry into his project and we worked together for years on the Hawaiian surfer’s story. Thanks to the people who helped with my first Venice book but particularly to Aimee Pritchard, Margaret Robe Summitt, and Thalia Johnson. Gratitude to J.J. Watson, my “adopted son,” Cousin Jerry Ross, esteemed friend, Art Palmer, and J. Calvin Pierce, (Jamie) himself a successful fantasy writer and my long ago high school boyfriend.
          Special kudos to Schell Alexander for critiquing this book and putting up with frozen dinners and lack of my company. You are having steak the day this tome is finished!!! 
          For more than 67 years books have been my best friends. When circumstances, people, or even one’s own body fails, one can always run away and do anything, with anyone, amongst the pages of a book.








Abbot Kinney
RED LION OF VENICE

Chapter One
An Apostle of Culture
	The sky had seemed a darker shade of gray than usual when Mary Cogswell Kinney went into labor. After an exhausting day of pain, she gave a final agonizing push to her fifth child and sent him into the politically unstable world of mid-19th century New Jersey. The diminutive boy squalled and flailed his tiny limbs as if already battling for a place among his siblings and the foreign atmosphere around him. His gestures were a forewarning of the determination and overwhelming energy which defined him throughout his sojourn on Earth. His pleased father stood back surveying his strawberry blond son and his uncharacteristic light blue eyes in a haze of satisfaction before hurrying downstairs to tell Nathanial, Constance, Francis, and Earnest that their new baby brother was strong and healthy. Their mother was fine, but he assured them that she would need to rest after her ordeal.
	The house servants at the large estate rejoiced at the advent of a new healthy child in the nursery, especially Moses Brown, overseer of the Kinney’s estate, and his wife, Elizabeth. Their two-year-old Sarah would have a future playmate. Brookside Farm hosted a relieved celebration. Childbirth did not always produce fine specimens in 1850, when medicine and prenatal care were still in primitive stages of development. The still-beaming father, Franklin Sherwood Kinney, a prominent counsel-at-law in his New York City offices, hurried to his study to announce the birth of Abbot Kinney, named for his maternal grandmother, Elizabeth Abbot. “On the 16th day of November,” he wrote in his family bible, “A son was born at 10 of 9 P.M.”
	Wealthy couples of the 19th century were usually less prolific in childbirth than those of poorer circumstances because a large amount of offspring was not required to run a farm to support the family’s subsistence. But the Frank Kinney family produced a total of seven issue and most were successful in life and their various endeavors. 
          The 1860 Federal Census reveals the Kinney couple and their children in the same Middlesex County, Morristown, New Jersey abode, but with the addition of James, who entered the world two years subsequent to Abbot. A little girl named Beatrice was born in September 30, 1858, but it is unclear what became of her as she is not enumerated after that year. Life was tenuous, especially young life.
	Franklin’s lineage was a distinguished one dating back to John Kene and a son, Henry, who was born circa 1624 and probably of Puritan origins from England or Holland. He first appeared at Salem Village (now called Danvers) in 1651, Essex County, Massachusetts. John likely set foot in the New World in the 1630s, approximately a decade after the Pilgrims colonized the area they dubbed Plimoth (sic). Perhaps the most notable ancestor in what would later be the United States, was William Bradford, of the Mayflower and Plymouth Colony. He was later elected Governor of Massachusetts and is known in modern American history as our Pilgrim Father.
	More importantly, Abbot Kinney’s maternal line was replete with a plethora of famous personages of history. No less than King John I, Eleanor of Aquitaine, King Henry II, King Alfonso I of Portugal, King Ferdinand II of Castile, King Louis VI of France, King Malcolm I of Scotland, Constantine the Great, and William the Conqueror preceded Mrs. Franklin Kinney in her gene pool. Abbot eventually learned some of the names of his illustrious ancestors when he hired a famous genealogist named Appleton to chart his pedigree near the close of the century.
	His formative years were spent with an aunt and uncle in Washington, D.C. From the age of seven, the slender New Jersey-born boy was educated locally and exposed to powerful men in government circles. His uncle, Senator James Dixon of Connecticut, was of a scholarly mind and undoubtedly formed Abbot’s penchant for knowledge and subjects of scientific interest. Senator Dixon, with his education comprising prose and poetry, was undoubtedly the prototype for his nephew’s interest in expressing himself through the written word. Married to Elizabeth Cogswell in 1840, who was a sister to Mrs. Kinney, the senator did not withdraw from public life until 1869.
	Franklin S. Kinney, a New York City lawyer, began working on government contracts in 1860 and subsequently purchased another residence near the District of Columbia. Family lore has it that Mary Kinney was a confidant of Mary Todd Lincoln and was called to the bedside of the dying Abraham Lincoln as he lay shot on that fateful night near Ford’s Theater.
	Thirteen-year-old Kinney was sent abroad to study about 1864. His descendants speculate that he was pleading to go into the Civil War to emulate his elder brothers. Wiser heads prevailed and sent him out of reach. He told his descendants later that he spent time studying at the University of Heidelberg in Germany and then on to the Sorbonne in Paris. The University of Lausanne in Switzerland rounded out his classic education. Law, medicine, biology, horticulture, languages and political economy were typical of his interests and he was a gifted student. Unexplainably, there are no records of his having been to any of these institutions of higher learning.
	Because Franklin Kinney was a firm believer in maximum education, young Abbot grew to feel his father was too strict in that regard. In an act of rebellion, he quit his classes and sailed home. But when news reached him that his revered uncle, James Dixon, had withdrawn from his place in the Senate due to health concerns, he finally made the decision to stay near his family.
	He brought with him a new facility for languages. Later admitting to speaking seven tongues fluently, it is also surmised that he was at ease verbalizing different dialects of Spanish and Arabic. His knowledge of these languages served him well for the balance of his life. At 19, he had matured into an urbane man of the world, well-dressed, well-educated, soft-spoken, and with the demeanor of a gentleman of the highest class.
	In all probability it was his uncle, Senator James Dixon, who confided to a government official that his favorite nephew was fluent in several languages. President Ulysses S. Grant heard that Abbot Kinney spoke excellent French and hired him to translate an American Civil War history written by Louis Phillipe Albert d’Orleans, Count de Paris. Phillipe served in the war as a Union soldier and was both a historian and journalist. That translation that Abbot effected is a standard Civil War reference book even into present day and Grant referred to the book many times in his own tome, Memoirs.
	Later that same year, Kinney took up residence at 132 North Charles Street in Baltimore, Maryland, determined to make his fortune in the stock market. His savings consisted of several thousand dollars and he was determined to make his fortune at a very early age. He related to the city directory clerk that he was merely a clerk himself but for a short time in the next few months, became a man of considerable means. Checks from the Bank of Commerce, signed by Kinney who listed himself as Treasurer (teller?)  exist in the family today.
          A story still told by descendants underlines the shrewdness of the young man thusly. It seems that he heard about a cache of aged, expensive liquor that was for sale. He persuaded the owner to permit him to take the bottles overnight where he sold them at a much-inflated price. The following morning Abbot paid the original owner and pocketed a two-thousand dollar difference. He invested all of his profits in the stock market where it began to double and triple.
	Meanwhile, Kinney was appointed by city officials to travel abroad and purchase unusual plants for Baltimore’s public gardens. He did this expertly, with years of the study of botany to assist him in achieving the goal. However, he was unable to preserve his stock market fortune, so he left the seaport city and moved back with his parents and brother, Earnest, at 22 Lafayette Square, Washington, D.C. 
           Always on the lookout for adventure, Abbot heard about a U.S. Mapping Project and after checking on it with friends, signed up for the trip. The only documented preparation for his foray is recorded in a Washington, D.C. church where Abbot was christened for what was undoubtedly considered a dangerous journey. The destination was the wild west. 
          Othniel Charles Marsh was anxious to resume his digging after a successful 1870 find. So the third Yale College Scientific Expedition in concert with the Smithsonian Institution’s U. S. Geologic Survey team of which Kinney was now a new member, proceeded with haste to Fort Wallace, Kansas. Leaving on June 12, 1871, with five army wagons and the customary armed military escort, Marsh picked his way across the country. The intrepid professor retraced the path he traveled previously, immediately when camp was established. Arriving there, it did not take long before the academic group recovered more of the specimen discovered in 1870, plus several other fossilized bone types.          
          Just one month into his trip, Kinney received a telegram that nearly sent him back home. His sister, Constance was engaged to marry Caesar Gianotti, the chamberlain to King Vittorio Emanuele II of Italy. Franklin and Mary wished to experience the foreign palace and court life through their only daughter, after Frank’s recent retirement from the field of law. The family applied for a passport in April of that year and sailed across the Atlantic Ocean in May for what they imagined a once-in-a-lifetime experience. However, Fate was not on their side and Franklin suddenly fell ill and passed away. He was buried in Chiavenna, Lombardy, Italy, on July11,1871. Abbot was devastated at the tragedy and threw himself into his work as the group continued.
          Mapping was difficult and backbreaking but work made it easier to forget his own heartaches in the loss of his father. In all likelihood, he was regretting his final disobedience of Frank’s wishes in the matter of education, but nothing exists in documentation of that today.
	After a month of paleontological difficulties in Kansas, both parties trekked to Denver, Colorado for a short leisure period. Because Marsh was an agitated and irascible sort of man, they left the Mile High City too quickly for Cheyenne, Wyoming. Then they laboriously pushed on to Fort Bridger, not far away. All the comrades arrived with a renewed fervor on August 22 and set out on a six-week exploration of the Green River Basin. Marsh and his students collected eleven packing crates of Orohippus Uintanus and Orohippus Pumilis, plus sundry other little-known species of dinosaurs..
	At the close of the Green River Basin Project, young Kinney made his way to Salt Lake City. He pushed on to Oregon and finally to the northern border of the state which would finally become his future home. Independent throughout his life, Abbot strove forward to experience the undomesticated section of his beloved United States, searching for the perfect place to settle. Meanwhile, winter weather brought an end to O.C. Marsh’s schedule and while a segment of the students headed back east, the balance of the associates met again with Abbot in the Yosemite Valley. Moving west to the breathtaking Pacific coast, all the men boarded a ship slated for Panama in the company of the esteemed academician and paleontologist.
	Because one of their team missed the sailing, their voyage was interrupted briefly when they were forced to dock in drought-ridden San Diego. The red-haired man’s trip into Southern California was not an impressive one and he declared decidedly that he had no wish to return. The disharmony of the sun-scorched vegetation, the poverty among the Hispanic peasants, and the lack of water were a deterrent he deemed overwhelmingly unsatisfactory.
	Having resumed their voyage home after uniting with their missing team member, the party sailed around South America’s Horn in very rough, storm-ravaged ocean and due north to the continent of North America. O.C. Marsh and his sea-weary entourage disembarked finally in New Haven, Connecticut, January 14, 1872. Regarded in modern times as a pioneering paleontologist, Marsh was sneered at by many contemporaries as a proverbial armchair explorer.
	At loose ends, Kinney, pressured by his brothers to enter into business with them, finally acceded. In 1868, Francis Sherwood Kinney founded a small tobacco company in Lower Manhattan and hired a crew of European rollers to instruct his factory hands in the methods of producing cigarettes. While experimenting with a number of brands using Bright or Turkish leaves, or both simultaneously, he began to achieve a heightened market in local New York sales. Francis, Abbot’s idolized older brother became a prototype for enterprising and entrepreneurship, which Abbot, the man, emulated all of his life. 	
          Using sugar and licorice in his tobacco mixes, the end result was a brand he dubbed Sweet Caporal. It skyrocketed in popularity and with sales booming, Francis implored all of his brothers to join him in running the new enterprise. Nathaniel and later Earnest and James, bought into the family business and gave up their father’s profession of lawyering. What began as the Kinney Company, ended as Kinney Bros. Tobacco Company, one of the three largest such firms in the country.
	Twenty-three-year-old Abbot, despite his independence and a wish to make his fortune in a different field, was absorbed into the enterprise by Francis as the buyer of tobacco leaves. He traveled between the southern states and the Richmond warehouse at first and then branched out to Europe and the Near East, using his knowledge of their native tongues to negotiate. Francis was mixing new and exciting leaves to foster higher sales and now using a machine, instead of manpower, to roll the cigarettes.
	Sweet Caps as their leading brand of machine-rolled cigarettes was called, gained wide recognition in the market. And to make all of their “smokes” more attractive, they copied a current craze of inserting a collectable card with each package. Subjects of these cards ranged from photos of popular stage stars to beautifully colored pictures of butterflies, military uniforms, ships, and the ever-desirable buxom and pretty ladies. Since, ordinarily, men were the purchasers of cigarettes, the cards were also used as a ploy to attract female attention. Urging spouses to purchase certain brands so that an entire series of cards might be completed, did not harm sales and was a very sound marketing tool.
	In 1870, before Abbott entered the company, cork-tipped Sweet Caporals was only a regional favorite but Francis expanded outward with the enticement of free cigarette cards and quality “smokes.”. Providing 35 different sets of cards, they were finally declared one of the “Big Four” sales competitors of Duke Tobacco Company, the leading manufacturer in the country. Some of the specific brand names associated with the Kinney banner were: Cleopatra, Egyptian Flowers, Full Dress, Halves, Latest English, New York Standard, Special Favors, Special Straight Cut, Sporting Extra Cigarettes, Sportsmen’s Caporals, and, of course, Sweet Caporals.
	By 1874, the younger Kinney was abroad in Egypt, where he was shipping exotic tobacco leaves home to the Richmond warehouse. The dynamic young man attracted the attention of the local ruler, Khedive Ismail, whose greed and poor administrative skills were angering the native people and causing a famine in the land. A smallpox epidemic was raging on the Upper Nile and the young American who spoke fluent Arabic was hired to investigate conditions and see what he could do to ameliorate them. Abbot spent an entire year in that land of abject poverty but could do little to assist the starving inhabitants or convince the scheming, wealthy khedive what he must do to ease the problems of his country.
	He had escaped the consequences of smallpox, but in moving on to Turkey in 1876, placed himself in a far more dangerous position. While in Salonica buying leaves, blends, and studying their methods of cigarette manufacture, Abbot very nearly stayed too long. He became the horrified, unwilling witness to the massacre of 12,000 Christians in an uprising. He was the final foreigner to leave from the harbor with his purchases intact. The machinations of foreign governments and customs connected to daily living outside of the civilized world where he was born, made a profound impression on him.
          Abbot was still listed in the Washington, D.C. City Directory as living with his mother and brother but the family had moved to 22 16th Street. He grew very close to his mother between tobacco buying trips and was concerned about the aging woman’s health. His instincts were right on track. Mary Cogswell Kinney died as Kinney was returning from his trip to Europe. Arriving too late to attend the funeral, he mourned her passing in his usual manner. He applied for a passport and informed his brothers that he would be absent from the firm while he sorted out his life and made decisions as to where he wished to live and in what manner he wanted to pursue his endeavors. Already a wealthy man from his shares in the tobacco company, he was free to travel to any spot he deemed interesting.
	Following the death of his father, mother, and revered uncle, he felt a persistent tug to find his own niche in the universe and after a battle with his conscience, he announced to his brothers that he would be embarking on a three-year vacation around the world. Kinney mapped out a unique itinerary that took him to familiar places and those about which he had only read. The young man applied for a passport in 1877, promising his family that he would return to his homeland in no more than three years time. His drive to find the perfect climate for his asthma and insomnia and a place to experiment with his botanical interests was enormous.
	His wanderings began in Europe, where cultural diversions and familiar locations gave him a perfect starting location. He moved on to Ceylon and Japan but Java and New Guinea beckoned with a more exotic finger. He stated later that he was strongly in favor of Australia because of their climate but passed it by because of some unrecorded negative reaction. Nonetheless, aspects of the country “down under” impressed him and later he wrote a plethora of material on their balloting system and multi-usage of native eucalyptus trees.
	His final stop outside of the United States was the Hawaii that was then called the Sandwich Islands. They were a tropical paradise to his east coast senses but the humidity was still not exactly helpful or analgesic for his health problems. However, he held the  kingdom’s culture in high regard and his family members visited the unspoiled islands for many years into the future.



























Chapter Two
 “The Mecca of All My Hopes”
	After languishing for only a short time in the humid air of Hawaii, Abbot Kinney boarded a ship for San Francisco, vowing to keep his word to return to the States in three years. His plans were not to arrive in the New York immediately but to first seek out a health spa in Florida. Perhaps the focal point of all his hopes lay not so far from home. He arrived in that raucous town in November of 1879, and immediately found himself the prisoner of a snowstorm in the High Sierras. Southern routes were the only rail lines open to him so Kinney boarded a train south for local sightseeing. Exploring San Jose, he was informed of a well-touted health spa that had just opened in Sierra Madre, California, so he packed up his manservant, Sam Taylor, and departed on a train south. He recounted his trip with the following compelling narrative.
	“I immediately bought train tickets and hurried south to Los Angeles. It was raining when I arrived and the streets were one mass of mud. Getting off the train at the old River Station I didn’t like either the look or smell of things, for that mud stank. I went up to one of the hotels but there was nothing pleasing about that place, so I hired a carriage to drive out to Sierra Madre. How that mud on the old adobe road stuck to our wheels! In due time we arrived to meet with the cheering intelligence that there wasn’t a room in the house. That was all very well but I was there to stay so they put me in the parlor where I remained three days.”
	This establishment, the Sierra Madre Villa Hotel, was owned by distant relatives, William C. Cogswell, and his son-in-law, William Porter Rhodes. Together, the main building and outlying cottages were comprised of 54 rooms, including a 200-foot glassed veranda. Kinney slept on their billiard table, and slept as he never had before. When he awoke the following morning with a clear head and feeling totally relieved, he eagerly set out to explore the surrounding foothills. The air was crisp and pure and the population sparse but near to the growing city of Los Angeles. He realized that quite inadvertently he had found the perfect climate. Kinney hurried back to the hotel with his African-American valet, Sam, and set up a large two-room tent in the eucalyptus grove. Decorating the canvas rooms with Persian rugs, silk sheets and articles of furniture he found locally, there the world traveler resided until he had fully explored the tiny hamlet of Sierra Madre.
	Later his friend, author Helen Hunt Jackson wrote a children’s book about Abbot Kinney and his first days in Sierra Madre. She named him George Connor in “The Hunter Cats of Connorloa,” and many facts from his early days in Southern California are detailed in her work. According to Mrs. Jackson, “George” rode on a horse day after day, looking at orchards and vineyards and was slowly convinced that the climate was also perfect for horticulture. He rode up and down the base of the foothills searching for just the right property. “Connor” finally discovered what he was searching for at the top of a mesa, grown thick with chaparral, with no road leading toward it. He envisioned a large frame white eastern style house on the plateau and knew that from the windows one would be able to see all over the valley and 30 miles distant to the Pacific Ocean.
	Kinney later called the district, “the Mecca of all my hopes.” The pristine air made his asthma more tolerable and he felt happy and at peace in the warm California sunshine. He purchased 550 acres in the spring of 1880, which included a mesa on which to build a large dwelling with a sizeable sloping field in front of it. The hill had in most recent times been the place of business and reclusive home of an old beekeeper. Soon after Abbot had acquired the original property laborers were engaged in clearing the brush, bridging ravines, and grading for a substantial road on the east side of Eaton Wash. By tunneling into the base of the mountainside, the workers transformed an insignificant water source into an overwhelming magnificent irrigation system. Pipes were laid and a 35-foot-deep reservoir with a 500,000-gallon capacity was constructed, as well as a storage reservoir with a 4,000,000 gallon holding area. An orchard of 6,000 citrus and 1,500 deciduous trees sprang up phoenix-like on the slopes along with a companion vineyard of 20,000 grapevines, most of which were the Sultana variety. Later, there would be dates and blood oranges for which the 30-something Abbot would become well-known all over California. His new land adjourned that of a man named Seabury. His neighbor’s property was comprised of 160 acres, which was secured by a note. Kinney purchased the indebtedness to the bank and when Seabury could no longer make the payments, Abbot was forced to foreclose on the note. His estate was growing.
	Under his direction, an imposing two-story home was constructed with four large bedrooms upstairs and four rooms downstairs, as well. They were surmounted by a tower. Named Kinneloa, meaning Kinney’s Mountain, it was a reminder of the Hawaiian culture that the young Easterner prized so highly on his trip around the world. When brother Francis built his mansion in New Jersey soon after, he copied Abbot’s estate name, dubbing his own mansion, Kinnelon. A town of that name grew up around the castle-like structure, which still flourishes in The Garden State.
	In “The Hunter Cats of Connerloa,” Helen Hunt Jackson describes Mr. Conner’s home as being an old-fashioned square house with a wide hall running through the center. A library and dining room were situated on the east side of the building, while on the west side were a parlor and large billiard room with a kitchen in the rear. Upstairs were four commodious bedrooms but servants did not reside in the main structure. Only Chinese were employed as servants and laborers in the early days of the ranch but that did change soon after. A long, low wooden structure that Mr. Connor called the “Chinese Quarter” was built further up the hill. In actuality, there was only one servant to live in Mr. Kinney’s home, and that was his African-American valet.
	Perhaps a better description of the “ranch,” as it was known in the family, came from Margaret Kinney Lloyd in a document addressed to her brother, Kendrick. Both grew up at Kinneloa because their father, Innes, son of Abbot Kinney, was manager of the property.
“Memories of  Kinneloa Ranch
	To the house, through the groves
	Orange trees lined Foothill Boulevard (now Altadena Drive), the entrance was through the grove of oak trees. Driving up the ranch road just crossing the Eaton Canyon wash passing a caretaker’s house and the lower reservoir, you would start an arduous climb up a narrow one-way road. If you met a truck or horse driven wagon, one would have to back up in order to let you continue your climb. After reaching the top of the foothill, a short drive up the ranch road (now Kinneloa Mesa Road) towards the house. One side of the road, maybe two miles was bordered with beautiful bearing olive trees, the other side of the road was solid acres of orange trees.
	Upon arriving at the top of the mesa road to your right was the barn, corrals, and ironsmith shop, also a building with a large wine press. To your left, you passed a very large reservoir, many beautiful trees and palms, which surrounded the big and beautiful house. There was a large turnaround in front of the house (southwest to canyon edge), a pretty little fish pond on the left.
	A rather long set of steps, a landing and a few more steps and you were on the front porch, facing large double doors. The porch surrounds three sides of the house. Another 4 or 5 feet inside was another set of double doors, no screens. In fact no screens anywhere in the entire house, except for the kitchen area and a large, wide covered concrete area for the milk table, servants’, and workers’ dining room.
	When you passed through the second set of double doors, you entered a very large entrance hall. You faced a very wide, and handsome staircase, replete with wonderful banisters and beautifully carved rondels. As your eyes moved towards the first landing of the stairs, two exquisite and very large stained glass windows showered the landing with light. One had the Kinney family crest, and the other, equally ornate, had A.K.’s initials. The landing at this point had another set of stairs leading from both sides of the stairs to the second floor.
	Off the landing were two bathrooms. One still had the big old steel tub, the other had been modernized, a huge porcelain tub and basin. It still had an old style oak water closet, the pull the chain from above type, with the large oak encased water tank. The house did have inside plumbing thru out.
	In the foyer, I remember a large walnut hat stand with mirror. Also, either side of the entrance doors were two huge closets. Mother took one to store all her cherished gourmet goodies, while the other was a guest closet. Outside of the door leading to the living room, was a handsome, sculpted marble bust of my great grandfather on the Kinney side of the family. His name was Franklin Sherwood Kinney. All of the main downstairs rooms could be entered from the hall which ran the entire length of each side of the staircase.
	Living room and dining room
	All of the doors in the living quarters, upstairs and downstairs, were 3” (thick) and paneled. As you entered the living room you faced a large fireplace, grey marble mantel, and large plain wood trimmed mirror which went to the ceiling. There were two elaborate, enameled, candle holders, glued into the mantel, probably from Austria. Very long French doors opened onto the porch from the east (south?) side of the room. A large gaslight chandelier hung from the ceiling, all of the ceilings were 18’. There were two huge double hung windows about 12” from the floor on either side of the fireplace, both living room and dining room. Glass transom over the main doors to the hall which were opened with a long hooked pole above the living room door. There was a deeply recessed sliding door separating the living room and dining room.
	The dining room was also a beautiful room, fireplace on east with same type double hung windows, 12” off the floor. Again a transom over the door which opened into the hallway. This room was furnished with black walnut dining set, 12 chairs, large sideboard, and serving table. The walls were decorated with 4 beautiful oil paintings which were all of the family of A.K.’s mother’s side of the family. All were Cogswells, and all were women. A doorway leading to the kitchen was opposite, and to one side of the sliding doors which separated the living room and the dining room.
	Kitchen, pantries, servants’ area
	A rather long narrow hall led to the kitchen from the dining room. On the right side a large room had been children’s dining room and schoolroom. A blackboard was still on the wall. Next was a large pantry for food – deep bins, tin lined, for all types of dried beans, coffee, rice, flour, sugar, etc. Opposite this pantry on the other side of the hall was a very large pantry holding many sets of dishes. The butter churn, and the large whipping cream utensil was also kept in that room.
	The kitchen itself was light and airy. Windows above the sink. A large wood stove; first there were two wood stoves, one was finally replaced with an electric one. A very long, large kitchen table, and a small table in the northeast corner with some chairs. There was a door and screen door on the east side.
	Another doorway on the west side opened onto the large covered concrete area where the ice box (huge) and milk tables were kept. This keeping room had overhead skylights.
	A large double trap door which when opened had stairs leading to the wine cellar which was extensive – 15 or 20 huge barrels of wine, mostly red wine, port and sherry. A shelf held the decanted wines. The barrels all labeled with type and dates. Running underground from the wine cellar some 200 ft. to the canyon was a 3 ft. tunnel. This kept the temperature and air circulation for the wine.
	Servants’ and workmen’s dining room and downstairs bathrooms
	Crossing over from the open covered area from the kitchen was a large servants’ and workmen’s dining room. The Mexicans and the foreman were fed a big lunch every day, along with their red wine. They also would bring their milk pails at night and get milk for all their families.
	Beyond the servants’ dining room were two bathrooms, one for the family and one for the workers and servants. Again, I remember clearly pulling that big chain from above my head to flush from the big old water box above.
	Music room and library/billiard room
	The two large downstairs rooms across the hall (from the living room and dining room), I remember well. The one opposite the living room was my grandmother’s music room. Everything was black and gold. Black marble mantle piece, black wallpaper with yellow chrysanthemums, black chairs, and settee (Victorian style), marble top black tables. All upholstered in gold color brocade, drapes of the same material, lace glass curtains, black piano and stands. Grandmother held musicales, and had a glorious voice. She had studied to be a grand opera singer.
	The other room, brown marble mantel, bookshelves to the ceiling on two sides. A ladder that would glide in order to reach the top shelves. One corner a big oak desk, and a large pool table in the center of the room. Years later the desk was moved to the music room, the music stands were removed and this served as Daddy’s office. It was close and handy to the front entrance.
	When we were little, I remember a little Mexican boy would come early and light the fires in the upstairs bedrooms, and the living and dining rooms. My mother referred to this as the pneumonia place. You raced from a warm bedroom, there was an electric heater in the bathroom, and then through the cold hall, running downstairs. Or my brother and I when we were late slid down the banisters. A big hurry to get into a warm living and dining room. Most all the logs were orange tree logs. Daddy would go through the groves, and if a tree was not bearing sweet enough fruit, it would be cut out and replaced with new young orange trees. He was credited by the U.S. Dept. of Agriculture with budding and developing lemons which would bear twice a year. In his early years he was continuously budding fruit trees, and many different varieties of avocados.”
	The foregoing was completed in 1993…the following was written in 1994.
	“The ranch and ranch life
	Going up the hillside towards Mt. Wilson were the grape vineyards, also the old cottage for the Chinese, and an upper reservoir for storage of drinking water. Later a house was built in back of the big reservoir. The foreman and his wife Ruth’s children were all born there. His name was Frank Hanna.
	Stone house on big reservoir
	Nearby and on the edge of the north side (mt. side) of the reservoir was a stone house. This was built for cooling butter, etc. before the days of ice which was delivered in a horse drawn ice truck when I was little. Anyway, the stone house had a trough the length of it, partitions and cold mountain water ran thru it all the time. Many things were kept in huge stoneware jars and placed in that trough. Later, when ice was delivered this stone house wasn’t used for anything but as another tool shed. Also, it was a good place to store olives that had been cured in brine, both black and green. Very large stone crocks about 3 ft. tall were used for the olives.
	Cork oaks were grown above the old Indian oven. They actually used the cork for the wine bottles and barrels.
	At the left side of the front porch was a huge bay tree, bay leaves galore. There was a cinnamon tree near the little fish pond that you could pull the bark off. A camphor tree, the leaves were oily, but they were pest free and very fragrant.
	Some wonderful apricot trees were grown in the upper end of the canyon, several rows of guava bushes, different varieties, grown for jam and jelly. A large patch of alfalfa grew up on the hillside, beyond it were the grape vineyards. The deer were so tame they would stand in the alfalfa and literally stare you down. They were so plentiful, besides, they were very destructive as they would devour any young fruit trees. Daddy ended up with a pack of Airedales to keep them on the chase. He also put huge bear traps in the grove along side Foothill Blvd. (now Altadena Drive), with big red signs: Danger, beware of bear traps! He would have some in plain sight, his way of reducing all the fruit thieves that would come in the grove and steal a great deal of fruit. It slowed down the thieving very quickly.
	I remember the L.A. Times delivered by the forest ranger, who rode uo the ranch hill every morning with the paper. Also, a Chinese vegetable man with a canopied wagon, and bells on it, arrived once a week. Cook would get his veggies and the Chinaman would write the amount in Chinese figuring on the side of the kitchen door. He would add up the figures and present his bill once a year. All bills must be paid before Chinese New Year.
	There were ducks, geese, and beautiful peacocks that lived in the pepper trees that were around the barn and entrance of the outbuildings. In the barn there was a tack room, stalls for the horses, huge bins for oats and barley. Grandfather’s old carriage was there for many years. Also, some chicken hatching crates.
	When Mother and Daddy were first married and moved to the ranch to live full time, Daddy had some fine riding horses and a couple of carriage horses. The horses were kept in stalls in the barn. There were several mules kept out in the corral, and were usually worked every day plowing, pulling wagons full of fruit, etc.
	I can remember riding in the canyons, also the enormous bath-size watering trough at the corral. The horses had their own pails. The cows were kept in a big pen on the back side of the barn. We used to jump from the top of the hayloft down into the hay below – it was fun!!!”
	Margaret Kinney Lloyd, the eldest of the children of Innes and Helen, went on with memories about growing up at Kinneloa Ranch. In a letter to her brother Kendrick from her home in Florida, she went on.
	“My true story
	Daddy’s Dr. Bishop drove a Locomobile. You could hear it miles away as it came up the old mesa road. One day he arrived with his young son, about 6 years old. His name was Freddy Bishop. Daddy suggested that I take Frankie out to the barn, watch the young chicks hatch out, see the horses, cows, and the new little colt, a few days old in the stall with his mother. We had fun. I was about 8 and, oh, so wise. Frankie was enthralled watching the baby chicks hatch out, pecking their way out of their shells. When I showed him the new little colt, he was very excited. He got to touch it some through the lower slats of the stall, and the mare was not nervous. He saw the peacocks, the cows, and mules, and when we walked back to the house he was just bubbling. The minute he saw Daddy, he ran and asked him, “Please, Mr. Kinney, the next time your horse lays an egg, can I have it?” Cute and true.
	Afterthought – Christmas memories
	Christmas eve.
	One year I remember you and I creeping down the stairs (we had been put to bed, we both had big double beds in the nursery) and looking thru the glass transom above the dining room door. Ursala and Dwight Brigdon were helping Mother and Daddy trim the tree. Besides all of the huge, beautiful ornaments, strings of popcorn, and tinsel, were all the little candleholders. Real candles and they would drip wax on the ornaments. When we would go downstairs to see the tree, they were all lighted on Christmas morning. We would wake up and new stockings would be chock full at the ends of our beds. Usually little bags of gold foil covered chocolate dollars, chocolate cigarettes, little toys. You would always get some little cars, I would get doll things.
	I remember the two of us making popcorn in long handled poppers in the fireplace. Then stringing the popcorn. They were stored in big blue cracker boxes.
	One Christmas there was an enormous tree in the black music room. I remember you getting a kiddy car, and I got a doll carriage. The Brigdons always came for Thanksgiving and Christmas dinner. Even after we moved to town, Elan Brown and Charlotte would come, we both loved Charlotte because she played with us and would go for walks to the barn. (Note: The Browns were the ones on the hill near us.) The Browns would always come over for eggnogs. Daddy always had things for all of the ranch help, plus plenty of red wine. They all loved him. Christmas was always very special. Big bouquets of holly from the ranch, and the trees were all cut from the ranch.”
     Additionally, the terrace in front descended to a fountain and pool, which was surrounded by all sorts of rare water plants and from them a terrible dragon reared its head and gaping jaws seeking whom it may devour. Goldfish darted in and out of the foreign-bred vines, seemingly heedless of the danger. As a botanist, Kinney was able to recite all of the names as well as those of the trees. Among the most curious to the local visitors were the cinnamon and camphor trees, the indigo plant and the Australian sago-palm. A pretty canyon with a waterfall and a cave in its remote depths, which was a veritable Sybil’s Cave was also a part of the property. Within its depths a wailing sort of music emanated, the result of an echo from obstructed running water at the mouth of the cavern. The effect was curious and unique to all who visited.
	Both Helen Hunt Jackson and Margaret Kinney Lloyd related stories about the 
Chinese on the ranch. Generally, Asians were not well-regarded in the 19th century because they were imported to the United States for cheap labor and a working class that would do jobs Americans wouldn’t do. From the time of the U.S. acquisition of California in 1848 a large influx of manual laborers were brought in to build railroads. By 1867, there were about 50,000 living in the state. In 1880, a new treaty with China was signed allowing the U.S. to regulate the flow of these Oriental workers but not to prohibit it. Much anti-Chinese sentiment was built up because the workers were paid so little and also took higher paying jobs from Americans. In two years, the Chinese Exclusion Act halted the immigration wave of these people for ten years. In keeping with his lifelong policy in favoring the underdog, Kinney voiced great sympathy for their plight when he first arrived in California. H.H. Jackson also held these noble egalitarian sentiments, but for Native Americans, as later evidenced by her book, Ramona.
	Mrs. Jackson’s book goes on to relate a story about 17 cats which livered at Connerloa and were kept a little hungry in order to clear the area of gophers, rabbits, and moles. Mr. Conner was given the first cat by a local Hispanic lady so he named it Mexican. From Mexican, the rest of his pack descended. Conner’s ranch was cleared of pests and this was accurate concerning Kinneloa, as well.
	Citizen Kinney of Sierra Madre lived upon his mesa in a lovely white house, visible for miles around. Strangely, this occasioned his second meeting with Helen Jackson. Having met briefly at the Kimball Mansion, a boarding house in Los Angeles, only months previous where Abbot was residing while awaiting the completion of his ranch house, Mrs. Jackson was charmed by the educated, European-mannered man and Kinney returned her regard. He related to George Wharton James that, “Mrs. Jackson’s brightness, vivacity, and keen interest in everything she saw attracted me to her, as it did everybody else. We didn’t have much to say to each other when we first met. One day (when visiting Los Angeles) she went driving with Jeanne C. Carr of Pasadena who took her to my ranch…”
	With Mrs. Carr, Helen made almost daily drives into the countryside in a spring wagon pulled by a pair of half-wild horses. She wrote in her popular classic novel, Ramona, “In the branches, the birds of the air could rest and clouds of blossoms seemed to actually float in the air,” in describing the wild mustard as being like that in the New Testament. She likened the plant to a golden snowstorm against the bright blue heavens of the Pasadena sky.
	On first sight, the writer disliked Kinney’s abode and told her friend, Mrs. Carr, that the structure did not blend in with the natural surroundings. “Who could put a great staring white house on a hill like that?” she asked, peevishly. But once again, Kinney charmed the lady as did the house with all of its exotic artifacts collected from his worldwide ramblings. She particularly loved the view from the “loa,” as she called the mesa. 














Chapter Three
 Ramona
	Helen Hunt Jackson left the Los Angeles area in a few weeks and commenced touring with artist/illustrator, Henry Sandham, searching out stories to write for Century Magazine. Visiting old missions from San Diego to Temecula, her tender heart found living conditions of the local indigenous peoples nothing short of appalling. Returning to Los Angeles County May 7, 1882, Helen once again made her home at the Kimball Mansion. She lost no time the following day driving a buggy out to Kinneloa to beg for her new friend’s assistance. She knew Kinney was fluent in Spanish, a language understood by most of the local native Americans. And he was able to handle several Indian dialects, as well. But most importantly, he was conversant with state land laws and an imposing figure who stood over six feet tall.
	Mrs. Jackson requested that Kinney accompany herself and Mr. Sandham as they investigated the plight of the mission Indians of Northern California. The party of three left on May 21st, taking a boat to Santa Barbara to begin the journey. There, Kinney hired a carriage to carry them from the cool coastal clime to the dry, 93-degree heat common to San Luis Obispo. Once there, they trekked north, finally reaching Mission San Carlos in Carmel. The heat and dust were very trying for the men but especially so for 51-year-old Mrs. Jackson, who was substantially overweight and thus always fashionably corseted.
	As in Southern California, the Indians were poverty-stricken, living in huts, suffering the diseases of white men, but worst of all, half-starved. The group returned to Los Angeles, disillusioned, but Helen had enough material for many magazine pieces. The plight of the mission Indians undoubtedly ate at her consciousness for many days before she decided to take action.
	In mid-June, Mrs. Jackson was back in Colorado Springs, Colorado, with her husband, Bill. Still unable to eradicate the suffering native peoples from her mind, she wrote a letter to the Department of Indian Affairs in Washington, D.C. When correspondence with the Secretary produced no solid support, she penned a missive to the Honorable Hiram Price, Commissioner, outlining the project she had in mind.
	On July 7th, she received a response appointing her Special Commissioner of Indian Affairs in Southern California, with the endorsement of President Chester A. Arthur. Helen wrote her acceptance immediately but it was contingent on the appointment of Abbot Kinney as co-agent and interpreter. On November 28th, Kinney was finally approved for the post and plans were formed through correspondence between those appointed, to write a report on the abominable lives led by the Indians.
	Helen Hunt Jackson returned to Los Angeles in late February and once there, got word that the Soboba Indians were about to be evicted from their lands near San Jacinto. The two government appointed agents and their driver, Newell Mitchell, hastened to the desert town without awaiting the arrival of Henry Sandham. There was little they could do immediately, so they returned to the Pasadena area in a diminished state of mind.
	On April 12, 1883, the party of four – Kinney, Jackson, Sandham, and the driver, Mitchell – set out to explore the southern missions in a two-horse, double-seated carriage. Their first stop was San Juan Capistrano and since Helen was considered the leader, Kinney dubbed her “General.” She called him “Comrade” or “Co,” for short. But Mr. Sandham was always “Henry.”
	All but two Indian tribes were reached and interviewed by the partners and they returned to Los Angeles exactly one month later, exhausted and in low frame of mind. Information awaited Jackson that would eventually save the Soboba lands and she declared she would pay for the lawyers herself, if the government would not do so. On July 13th, Mrs. Jackson’s manuscript, “Report on the Condition and Needs of the Mission Indians,” was mailed to Washington, signed by herself and Abbot Kinney. More than 200 copies were distributed to congressmen and other officials and, although word was written to Helen that the report was favorably reviewed and accepted, it had little lasting impact.
	Mrs. Jackson regularly penned notes to Kinney, always signing them, “General,” and addressing him as “Co.” She also wrote to Mary Sherrit, who was running the Indian School at Pala, and whose salary she was paying. Helen wanted more details about the shooting of a Cahuilla Indian named Domingo because she was using him as a main character in a novel she was writing. The hero’s name became Alessandro in the story and the book was named “Ramona.”
	Helen preferred the San Francisco Bay area to the sunnier climes of Southern California and retired to an apartment there to write for her publications and nurse her failing health. A diagnosis of cancer invaded the life of Helen Hunt Jackson, shortly after Kinney visited her in San Francisco. He made one last visit to sit at her bedside and reminisce about their trips on behalf of the Mission Indians and the government document they produced together. In her last conscious moments, she sent a message of love to Senora Antonio Coronel and desired to say that she wished her a successful and happy life. The Coronels had played host to Helen and her party on more than one occasion and accompanied them to introduce Native American families to the four strangers. The women, of similar empathy, grew into fast friends. Later Abbot wrote to Don Antonio Coronel that Helen was given one last injection of morphine by her doctor and then passed from life. The year was 1885 and she never truly knew the impact of her book, Ramona. It lives on today as a classic of its time in the fight against racial inequality.
	As is often the case, a Southern California newspaper wrote a disparaging summary of Helen’s life and work and when it was brought to Abbot’s attention, he leapt to her defense with a letter printed in the Pasadena & Valley Union newspaper, September 25, 1886. It was titled Helen Jackson and read as follows:
	“The bickerings and bitterness of life are, by a general custom, hushed in the presence of death. When members of our family die, it is usual to recall what was good and admirable in their lives, generously forgetting the human weaknesses to which some or all of us are prone.
	This has not been the course of a Santa Barbara paper in regard to Mrs. Wm. S. Jackson, who recently died of a lingering and painful disease in San Francisco. Mrs. Jackson died a stranger in California, far from her home. Under such circumstances it is the part of no manly or generous Californian to speak harshly of the dead. It is less proper to make statements that would have been incorrect and unjustifiable toward this lady when living.
	The Santa Barbaran forgets himself so much as to say that Mrs. Jackson had no spark of genius, that she was incapable of making a correct statement, and that the only reason he could sustain the wide reputation ‘H.H.’ enjoyed was that she was unconventional. In another place, I am informed, this editor pronounces her crazy.
	Mrs. Jackson was a friend whom I esteemed and honored. I cannot allow a dear and tried friend to be traduced as Mrs. Jackson was in the clipping in your paper without protest.
	Helen Hunt Jackson was a woman of warm heart, poetic insight, and large cultivation. Her sympathies were wide enough to have a place for everyone in distress of whom she knew. She was as much as home and welcome at the scanty fireside of the hovel as in the palace of the rich. Many a poor and distressed family in California knows practically of her kind heart, and, what is perhaps of more import in such matters, knew the warm and unaffected sympathy with which the aid was given.
	The Mission Indians of Southern California, for the most part, an industrious and much injured people, have much to thank Mrs. Jackson for in the improved condition of their land tenures, their good schools, and more intelligent action of the government toward them.
	Her poems, novels and essays have been widely read, many of them are of a high order of merit, and some of her poems are gems, true to nature, simple and touching that have in them the qualities of perpetual endurance. ‘Ramona’ is her last great work. It has been well said that it is by far the best novel ever written with the scene laid in California, and it is properly a California novel. It is a poem in prose and of universal interest, as it deals with the true and simple feelings of humanity. Every incident in this book is founded of fact. From the ejectment at Temecula to the killing of the husband and acquittal of his murderer, the basis of every statement is susceptible of proof.
	In general, Mrs. Jackson was careful and conscientious in making statements. No one could be more so. She always took the greatest pains to be accurate.
	‘H.H.’ wrote much about Southern California, especially about the Missions and the old life, which now has a softening mist of romance between it and us. Her beautifully illustrated articles on these subjects, were published in the Century, and being widely read attracted much attention to our beautiful country. None were more favorably received than the one on Los Angeles.
	Mrs. Jackson preferred Los Angeles and its environs to Santa Barbara, and said so. To this poor motive, perhaps, is due the ungenerous and unusual attack of a citizen of our State upon a dead lady.
She was the friend of the friendless, the helper of the oppressed; when she erred she erred from too warm a heart and too confiding a sympathy. Were such a frailty distributed on the rest of the world, it would be no worse for it.
The last few days of Mrs. Jackson’s life were passed in San Francisco. A terrible cancer preyed upon her vitals. There in her husband’s arms she died. In dying as in living she was more considerate of others than herself. Her last words and thoughts were for those about her.
So passed away a kind heart, a brilliant writer, and a kind friend of Southern California.” 
And the letter was simply signed, “Abbot Kinney.”

Chapter Four
Man of Unique Accomplishment

          Kinney had only settled in California three years hence when he was invited by Mrs. Jackson to accompany her to determine the fate of Mission Indians. Already shrewd in his 33rd year, he was quick to discern business opportunities so when he arrived with Helen in the San Jacinto Valley to check on the Soboba Indians he saw a blank slate with possibilities everywhere.
          Jackson and Kinney were guests at several ranches as other accommodations were unavailable in the fledgling settlement. Among these were the homes of Charles Thomas and Hancock McClung Johnston. Both men were prominent racehorse breeders with commodious homes in the San Jacinto Mountains.
          It is now surmised that it was from these two residents that Abbot first learned of a year-old court decision that partitioned the lands of San Jacinto Viejo to several persons who planned to turn a large profit if a water supply became available. Kinney saw the need for a dam and reservoir to be constructed at the South Fork of the San Jacinto River.
          After consulting with others and finishing his duties as Assistant Commissioner to Mrs. Jackson, the future Doge of Venice and Mr. Johnston entered into a loose agreement to purchase the Hemet Valley lands, design a town, and supply them with water and thus fertile ground. The Lake Hemet Company, with Abbot as president, incorporated under the laws of the State of California and signed an agreement with Francisco Estudillo, youngest son of the original owner of Rancho San Jacinto Viejo. The July 8, 1886 Purchase Agreement called for buying 3,000 acres of what would later become the City of Hemet for $10,000 with the balance due over a period of three years.
          On October 14, 1886, Kinney and Johnston had not remitted the agreed upon monies although the partners had laid out more than half of that amount on survey work at the sites for the dam and reservoir. Nowhere is it stated that a flaw developed in the plan or exactly what caused the New Jersey native to pull away from the deal. With Kinney’s stock income from the tobacco company and his stated income of $600 a month from rentals in New York, he could have easily afforded the acreage. However, the town of Hemet, conceived by Johnston and Kinney, would develop and thrive under different hands.
          Never one to lose an advantage, Estudillo sold the acreage the following day after the agreement expired for the original agreed upon amount of $10,000 to Edward Mayberry, Peter Potts, and Albert Judson. This time the money was paid immediately to avoid future legal wranglings. And only one month later, Kinney’s former partner, Johnston, purchased an interest in the new company. The Lake Hemet Co. and Hemet Land Company were incorporated January 27, 1887.
          Why did Abbot Kinney pull out of the community of Hemet and the dam and reservoir that were conceived to support it? Let’s take a long look at other details commanding his attention.
          Always busy in his immediate environment, the red-haired man formulated a plan which resulted in a free public library in Pasadena. At the same time he invited Mrs. Jeanne Carr, T. P. Lukens, H. N. Rust, and Sherman Rust, all wealthy local people to hear his ideas regarding the Pasadena Library and Village Improvement Society. The first order of the day was the establishment of a book repository box for the public. This society was approved and incorporated with a capital of $50,000: 10,000 shares at $5 each. Because Mr. Kinney was the innovator of the idea, and had donated $300, he was elected president of the new group. A wooden two-story library building was erected on Colorado Street and grandly opened to much local fanfare February 16, 1884. With just 329 books on its shelves. many presented by the group’s president, Pasadena welcomed it warmly. An art loan department was established at that time and various citizens provided items of interest to that endeavor. Kinney deeded a wooden stirrup made for Father Junipero Serra, a Japanese bronze emblem, a Japanese lacquered tortoise shell inlaid with gold, a woodpecker’s storehouse, Tasmanian pearl shells, a shark’s egg, two Apache hats, a piece of cloisonné, a Persian stand, and an Indian net woven intricately from mescal plant fibers.
          Like his father, a supporter of education, Abbot was prominent among the founders of Sierra Madre College. Donations were gathered from as far away as Los Angeles and finally six acres with a building on Columbia Hill was selected. The institution opened September 17, 1884 with an appalling long program of 32 musical renditions and 19 speeches, some mercifully brief.
           Greg McReynolds, East Pasadena historian, provided information about the Sierra Madre Lamanda Citrus Association. Kinney was one of the ten incorporators of this fruit packing house but not a major player. Holding only five shares he was a relatively minor part of the alliance. An inception date has been difficult to detect, probably because the name was changed. It could have begun as the Lamanda Park Packing Association.
          At the Los Angeles Republican Convention held on September 24 of that year, Judge H. W. Magee was nominated for State Assembly. Abbot Kinney, a “Democrat of superior quality,” was later nominated as his opponent. The two opposing factions had more than one debate, as reported by the Pasadena Valley Union, but Magee was discovered not to meet residency requirements so he exited the race. A Colonel Banbury took his place and Kinney seemed to lose interest at this turn of events. He announced that the hot summer climate of Sacramento would not be conducive to his future health and he decided he was not able to reside there. Voters abstained from casting ballots in favor of the master of Kinneloa and the election of Banbury was inevitable.
          Other more important matters captured Abbot’s attention during that time. On November 18, 1884, he was united in marriage in his third decade to 18-year-old Margaret Dabney Thornton, daughter of California Supreme Court Judge James Dabney Thornton and his wife, Sarah Frances. The nuptials took place just after the noon hour on a Wednesday afternoon at the grand home of the bride’s parents, 823 O’Farrell Street, as reported by the San Francisco Call newspaper. Only a few friends and the immediate family was invited to the ceremony performed by Reverend Doctor Scott of Saint John’s Presbyterian Church. The house was decorated with white flowers and maidenhead fern. A party of 26 sat down to a sumptuous wedding luncheon, including Governor Kinkead of Nevada. The blissful couple left for a short wedding trip to Monterey and Santa Cruz but the real honeymoon occurred when the new Mr. and Mrs. Kinney journeyed to the New Orleans Citrus Exposition the following month.
          With Kinney’s ancestry his choice of Maggie Thornton as a bride, could not have been more appropriate. Although she knew her family lines extended back to the Washingtons and Jeffersons of Virginia who had produced two presidents, more recent research turned up a line even more prestigious than that of her husband. Descended from royal lines in most countries of the world (even ancient Egypt,) Mrs. Kinney was blessed with a pretty face and a lovely singing voice. She was one of the chief attractions at San Francisco musicales and charity concerts. From an Italian aria to a simple ballad, Miss Maggie was a standout at whatever event in which she appeared. She continued to sing after her move to Southern California and her husband fondly called her a second Helen Hunt Jackson.
          The year 1884 had been a prosperous and satisfying one for Kinneloa’s master. He was appointed to chair the California State Board of Forestry due to his interest in trees, particularly the eucalyptus. Life on his “loa” (Hawaiian for hill,) was beautiful and peaceful with lovely Maggie. The citrus orchard was producing abundantly, particularly blood oranges, for which he was noted. The sun was usually shining and he had what he most wanted in life: productivity, happiness, and health. For a while his public commitments took a detour while he relaxed.
          Lucy Crittenden Kinney was born at the home of Margaret’s parents August 27, 1885, named for a courageous and tenacious grandmother, and was the very image of her father. The second child was called Thornton or Tony and he made his entrance into the world in Santa Monica October 16, 1886. In a letter to his brother Earnest, Abbot wrote that he gave the boy his wife’s maiden name to show his great esteem and respect for her.
Sometime in the middle 1880s the summers at Kinneloa became too oppressive for Margaret and Abbot built her a summer home on Ocean Avenue at Margarita in Santa Monica. The family lived in the sea view home May through October of every year for two decades. 
          With his two homes, a thriving citrus business, a new wife, two children, a California State post, a failed run in politics, is it no wonder that Kinney did not have time to split between the southern desert around Hemet and the legal machinations required to build a dam, reservoir, and a town? Without adequate transportation to reach the area, he would have had to locate his family to the hot dry clime, where wife, Margaret, did not do well. 













Chapter Five
 “Shadow of the Dragon” 
	As early as 1882, Mr. Kinney, always an adventurer, began taking trips to San Francisco. Los Angeles was still a country town and the city in the north was the culture spot of California in the late days of the 19th century. It was then that the world traveler first began recording his thoughts and experiences relating to the large influx of Chinese inhabiting the state. One such narrative was printed in a magazine known as the Overland Monthly (Vol. II, Second series) –November, 1883- No. 11. The article, with the dramatic title, “Under the Shadow of the Dragon,” probably reflected popular thought concerning the Chinese migration to the western United States just as the term, “Okies” mirrored the resentments of the 1920s when dustbowl inhabitants began moving west to improve their lot in life.
	“Ten hundred fresh from China, their faces turned with eager absorbed looks to the shore. So many, so close together they made one think of sand in the sand hills nearby.
	It was in the days of unrestricted immigration. The ship was a little iron ocean tramp, an irregular trader, chartered by Pu Hong, a Canton merchant. The Captain, a dapper little fellow, was storming about and swearing big oaths. At last he hauled into the wharf, and everything being ready, the custom house cordon was drawn.
	Then what a scene of confusion! The hitherto silent, patient mass broke into a pyrotechnic of language. They fired monosyllabic words right and left. Every man for himself; and it seemed as though the old saw would be reversed, and the devil take the foremost. The Chinamen were anxious to get on shore. The gang-plank was not wide enough, and in spite of the exertions of the officers, many of them went over the sides of the ship, tossing their picturesque luggage ahead. Some had bright-colored baskets; others had their effects wound up in curiously woven matting; some in sheets or in brightly colored pieces of cotton. Some had boxes, red, yellow, brown, or canvas covered with bright decorative labels. Some had lacquered boxes, others had inverted washbowl hats tied up in bundles; these were to speculate with. All were in confusion, good-natured, laughing at accidents; the victims loudest. Sea legs on shore and a slippery gang-plank, upset more than half as they came out. Bundles went one way and the men another, the two indistinguishable in their oriental coverings, until the effect was of men split in two on the gang-plank and joined together again underneath. One large fellow with an imperial yellow box, fell scattering the curious contents right and left, as though exploded by a bomb. He laughed, collected himself, and his property, and trotted off. Finally, their compassionate consul spread resin on the plank, thus removing the most fertile source of their troubles.
	Soon everything was out on the wharf in apple-pie order, the bundles unrolled, the trunks and baskets opened. The Chinamen had evidently known what to expect. Their luggage contained little: seldom a change of clothes; sometimes a pair or two or their queer stockings. These are reinforced on the foot, but made only of fine cotton in the leg;  they reach to the knees, where they are sometimes self-supporting, and sometimes tied with blue, red, or green silk bands. Some had brought an extra pairs of shoes or a blouse, but for the most part, fearing the customs people, they wore all their clothes, even in some instances several suits, and almost always, a box of colossal pills done up in a brittle coating, easily cracked off. These pills are used as a tonic like our quinine. They are also put on as a plaster, and seem a sort of universal remedy. There were half a dozen Chinese doctors on board, traveling like common coolies. They seem to have little more medicine than the rest, and of what excess they did have, the customs officials relieved them, thus saving the population of some of their doses.
	The Chinamen are great fellows for smuggling. They tie silk or opium under their arms, between their legs, or around their bodies. They weave silk into pieces of matting. They have false bottoms to wastebaskets and trunks, occasionally a false lining to a hat; opium is sometimes put into their bamboo sticks-in short, they have a thousand devices for ingenious hiding. The best off of these passengers were 62 who were returning after a visit to China. Most of these wore American hats, and had red and blue American in color. Blue predominated, but all colors excepting red were represented. One stout fellow wore a sleeveless jacket of figured green; another was all in butternut; his bare legs harmonized well with his dress, and he had, moreover, a delightful brown basket in two stories that could be taken apart. Those who wore leggings or stockings tied with silk, knee breeches, and blouses fastened on the side, were the most picturesque. Hats like inverted dishes added much to their effect. Some wore round black skull-caps with six ribs or lines, and a red button on top. One had a small red crown on his cap. Those who wore American hats had a curious fashion of tying them with their queues; while their hair lasted, they were sure of these hats.
	The custom officers were not unkind, but most of the seizures seemed unnecessary. Hardly any of them would have been made from whites. One poor fellow had brought a bed lambrequin with Chinese decorations to present to his employer in Oakland. The officers took it. Next to him was a man whose sole baggage consisted of half of a decomposing sheep. This was not confiscated. The police and customs people were very polite to us, but their evident idea was that we were looking only for what was repulsive, criminal, or what would pander to the antagonistic feeling of the masses, and one of the officers dragged me up and down over boxes and across the entire wharf simply to show me a man with a hair-lip.
	There were on the ship many boys – little fellows from 10 to 18 years old. They seemed mature – more like little men than boys. They were mostly under contractors who were bringing them over on speculation. They were dressed like the men, except that their pigails were made long enough for the fashion by braiding in blue and red cotton or silk. The pigtail regulation introduced by the Tartars is, that their appendage, without counting the tassel, much reach to the knees.
	There were on board several merchants; these wore gowns fastened at the sides with small brass buttons and silk loops. These gowns were beautiful; usually of delicate colored silks with shaded arabesque patterns. Many of them were left open at the sides, showing white or colored trousers underneath. These were often of silk and tied at the bottom, producing an effect similar to that of the Austrian soldiers’ trousers.
	On the steamer’s bridge stood a representative of the six companies, telling the strangers what to do. The Chinese are thoughtful of the wants of their countrymen arriving thus in a foreign and unsympathetic land, whose language they do not understand. Always on the arrival of vessels with Chinamen on board, the six companies would send representatives to meet the new arrivals; these registered each man according to his province, and when the revenue ordeal had been passed, loaded them on express wagons, drays, etc., to be carried to the Chinese quarter. It reminded one of the Niagara or New York ferries to see these poor fellows seized as they came under the customs rope, with chalk marks on their backs as well as their luggage. Draymen pulled one was, red-shirted Irish expressmen pulled another; and the poor coolie was in despair at the wrangle till the company’s man came to their rescue. Probably this custom of the six companies has given rise to the idea that it is they who imported the Chinese. This is a mistake.
	When the Chinese first came to California, they formed guilds or clubs, as is their custom everywhere, and segregated themselves according to the districts from which they came. From this arose the six companies, representing each a province of Canton. Each has its president, vice-president, secretary, etc. From this arose the six companies, representing a province of Canton. When anything important occurs, the merchants who are the controlling element in them meet and decide what is to be done.”
             Mr. Kinney went on to relate the rules of discipline the guilds invoke on the immigrants and how they rarely use our court system unless they are forced to comply with United States law. He empathetically stated that Chinese will not testify against one another or they will prevaricate for the Grand Jury and tell an entirely different tale at the trial. It is nearly impossible to obtain adverse testimony. So the guilds developed their own methods of punishment and the Chinese were far more afraid of them than they were the U.S. Government.
           At last given the freedom to move into San Francisco, the author said whimsically, the immigrants “disappear like sugar in water.” He went on to describe Chinatown as a hive of intense industry with every square inch of space taken up by a worker of some sort. Some floors were even divided into doubles and tall men could not stand upright to run machines. Nothing was wasted and even chicken blood with entrails was left curdling in bowls.
          “….. We had another remarkable experience in an opium factory. Through the courtesy of a Chinese merchant, we were enabled to see the preparation of opium in all its stages. The way to the factory was down a long, narrow lane between high, blank walls. Suddenly, turning to the right through a small door, we passed from the bright day into utter darkness. Groping about in passages, knocking against corners, we passed several small cupboard-like rooms, in one of which a man smoking opium was reclining on a matting-covered shelf, his head on a little wooden pillow; as usual, the only light was a wick burning dimly in a tumbler. The appearance of these smoking rooms is weird beyond description. However small they are, they seem full of endless vistas; the whole room is dark excepting the spot where lies the smoker’s head. This is lighted in a low yellow glow, with the heavy shadows crowding in. Harmonious with the scene is the sallow, half-narcotized face; into that, also shadows are crowding fast and the last glimmer will soon be out.”
     Abbot Kinney also spoke of vice in the Chinese culture stating that no one was free and each person was controlled by many factions. “….. During the latter part of the night we went through the slums of Chinatown: into the alleys, the opium cellars, the crowded houses, into all the places the detectives show as low and bad. We saw wickedness but not disorder; vice, calm and undisguised, apparently not thinking of itself in the wrong. In the alleys were the women, behind their little grated windows- poor women, most of them owned by masters who force them to earn money in a dreadful way. Some are actually slaves, others are under contract for a series of years; only a very few are free.”
          …..The worst form of Chinese slavery is that of young girls from ten years of age upwards. From three to four thousand of this miserable class are now living in California. They constitute, with few exceptions, the Chinese female population of the state. I have talked with some of these, and heard their sorrows, but their awe of their masters and of the relentless highbinders prevents them from daring to accept aid in an escape. Most of them do not understand the possibility of such a thing. Occasionally one runs off with a Chinaman, or turns up all bruises at the missions or police court; but their masters usually get them again by false testimony or misrepresentation. The terror in which Chinese interpreters live makes this possible. About half of these linguists have thus far lost their lives by acting honestly in cases opposed to the highbinders. Their fate has generally been to be chopped to pieces by hatchets.
          The most objectionable feature of the presence of the Chinese in California is their effect on our own people. The poor native whites are in a more unsound moral and industrial condition than in any other northern clime. It reminds one of the condition of affairs in the South in slavery times, and the cause in both instances is doubtless the same. Once while traveling in the foothills, we stayed in a little house, where the woman keeping it was much overworked; but said she could only obtain Chinese help. There were plenty of poor white girls in the neighborhood in want of money, but when asked to take any menial position they uniformly replied that they were not going to do a Chinamen’s work. It was the same as old times in the South; there, it was the negro slave who degraded labor. The effect of the Chinese in California has been to degrade labor, to weaken the political body, and to injure morally in the broad sense of the word both the rich and the poor.”
          A strange statement from a man who hired all Chinese workers in the early days of his Kinneloa citrus ranch and who retained one Chinese worker at his estate for years. Kinney was greatly lauded for his egalitarian actions in his later years in Venice and up until the final days of his life. He was regarded as a man ahead of his time.
          Greg McReynolds, Sierra Madre and Kinneloa area historian provided this blurb from the 1887 Los Angeles City Directory: “A peculiarity of Mr. Kinney’s is that he employs the same amount of help the year round. He has no Chinese, Having years ago decided against employing them; he has—even at great pecuniary loss—steadily refused to have them on his farm or around his house. He pays his help the usual current wages and in addition sets aside 10% of his net income to be divided among them, giving 5% to his foreman and the other 5% to his hands.” Greg goes on to write that he thinks this may not indicate a personal dislike of the Chinese on Kinney’s part but that 1887 was the beginning of bad feelings toward the Chinese in the Caucasian community, which led to the exclusion laws of the 1890s.



Chapter Six
Rip Currents

          Kinney incurred a plethora of enmity when a disagreement broke out among his neighbors in the area of Sierra Madre and Pasadena. Water rights were in question and, as usual, Abbot took the part of the underdog, those agriculturists who had no source of “liquid gold,” as it was called. Though the master of Kinneloa had a seemingly endless supply of water in his reservoir, he sided with the Anti-Riparians who held that there should be no monopoly of public streams. His neighbor, DeBarth Shorb, son-in-law to the late Don Benito Wilson, was a radical Riparian who wanted to control water rights and made his derision of Abbot, “the irrigator,” known in the newspapers. The San Francisco Call printed a scathing denouncement of the man from New Jersey, as did the Pasadena and Valley Union newspaper.
          The following year bought a great land boom to California. A party of surveyors began work on a government map of Sierra Madre and Mount Wilson. In government recognition of Abbot’s achievements with the Board of Forestry, Mount Wilson had been renamed Mount Kinneloa. Harrison Gray Otis, the crusty publisher of the Los Angeles Times wrote a scathing denouncement of   Kinney, with whom he had a running feud about politics, and it resulted in much consternation in the big house at Kinneloa. The newspaper stated that Abbot was “hungering and thirsting” after a mountain. Chagrined, Kinney wrote a letter to the family of Don Benito Wilson explaining that he had not sought the change and did not want the mountain named for his ranch. The government bowed to public pressure and the name of Mount Wilson was restored.
          Abbot added real estate broker to his list of talents when he began buying property, developing, and selling it a a much higher amount. He formulated a unique plan for developing a Nob Hill-type of community in a section of what is now Pacific Palisades. Surveyors mapped the area and trees were planted on the sides of non-existent streets. The Santa Monica Outlook Railway was organized with the idea of providing transportation from the new Southern Pacific Railway in Santa Monica to his sub-division. As a result of the financial depression of 1888 and a generous offer for the land, the doge-to-be abandoned his plans and sold out to Collis Huntington. Senator Jones and Mrs. Arcadia Bandini deBaker were persuaded by Kinney to donate six acres of prime land in Rustic Canyon to be utilized as a State Forestry Station for the study of eucalyptus trees, newly imported from Australia. The trees would provide medicinal oils and lumber, it was theorized but the idea proved a failure. The trees planted near the Huntington Palisades remain to this day as a reminder of the would-be developer’s fertile imagination. The eucalyptus grove was declared a State Historic Landmark in 1971.
          Margaret was pregnant once again and Franklin, named for Abbot’s father, was born into the world on June 14, 1888. He was a fine healthy boy and the Kinneys rejoiced at their luck.
          Abbot’s star was rising in Southern California. His name was a byword in the San Gabriel Valley. As such, he was invited to address the crowd at the July 4th celebration in Santa Monica. Margaret favored the audience with some melodies from Steere’s Opera House. The following November she was heard again at the Opera House as a part of their fundraising event for St. Augustine’s Episcopal Church. Receiving a hearty ovation, Mrs. Kinney beautifully sang, “The Magnetic Waltz.’ Just prior to Christmas she appeared at the same church as a part of a local group’s rendition of  “The Mikado.” Her solo, “He’s Going to Marry Yum Yum,” garnered much applause.
          The stork visited the Kinney’s Santa Monica cottage in August, 1889. A healthy son they named Kent was born to them. With four children, one a newborn infant, Margaret had little time to herself, despite the employment of nannies.
          The future Doge of Venice’s public commitments became overwhelming. He was named Roadmaster of Santa Monica (Head of City Streets.) He immediately embarked on the planting of trees along Wilshire Boulevard, the street that led to Los Angeles. He was also one of the driving forces who funded and set up the Santa Monica Library and Free Reading Room. He accepted a position as trustee of that establishment. Following this accomplishment, a Free Reading Room  was organized at the National Soldier’s Home in Sawtelle.
          Living more or less full-time in Santa Monica now, the stork came in visit again in January of 1891, adding the Kinney’s handsome son, Sherwood, who was given his deceased grandfather’s middle name. 
          Lady Luck, who seemed to favor this fortunate family up to this point, finally turned her back on them. An epidemic of rheumatic fever swept the district. Margaret, pregnant with Innes, Lucy, Franklin, Kent, and Sherwood, all were affected to varying degrees. Abbot and Thornton were the only family members to escape the ravages of the disease.
          Six-year-old Lucy and three-year-old Franklin died on the same day, August 18, 1891. Abbot and Margaret’s personal papers list the little boy’s death first at “5 A.M.” and the couple’s only daughter at “9 P.M.” Sherwood and Kent survived but both had heart damage as did the unborn baby. Kent would live 13 years before he died of lasting effects and Sherwood and Innes lived only until early middle age. Abbot and Margaret were devastated. A letter from a resident of the Kinneloa area stated that Margaret took to the upstairs of her home and would only allow her husband and one servant to approach her and the children who survived. Abbot’s rare comings and goings were noted in the Santa Monica newspaper. During this period of time, the grieving Mr. Kinney wrote two books, The Conquest of Death and Tasks by Twilight. Both books were undoubtedly cathartic to the couple.
          Just prior to their great personal disaster, Abbot had taken on a business partner in 

because he was a passive, silent type and wished to remain in the background while 

interest in the Ocean Park Casino, a family-oriented entertainment establishment and not 

          The ocean was considered dangerous at that period of time. Only men swam and 

few ventured far from the shore so sand lots were not popular as vacation spots. 

However, when the partners began to build places of entertainment, values began to rise. 

The entirety was known as the Santa Monica Tract and lots were priced at $110 each with 

$25 down and $10 a month terms. In an effort to attract more buyers for their real estate 

in this South Santa Monica district, the men donated a 250-foot by 850-foot ocean front 

lot to the YMCA The only stipulation to the gift was that the YMCA must construct 

public buildings on the land. Subscription books of stock were offered for sale and all of 

the local pastors of Christian churches endorsed the enterprise. In June of 1894, the 

YMCA formally opened their doors.
         
          The Kinneys began to appear in public more often with the opening of the new 

organization. Innes made his entrance into the world February 12, 1892, in the midst 

of the family’s mourning period. Abbot and his wife welcomed a new baby but it did 

little to lessen the effects of their grief. They took the children with them wherever they 

traveled and so the baby and his three brothers were seen by the general populace more 

often. When the first polo game of the season was announced, Mrs. Kinney and Mrs. 

Matilda Ryan gave a tea for participants and their spouses.

          As if Lady Luck was trying to make the loss of two children up to the family, 

Carlton was born four years to the day the Kinneys suffered the deaths of their little girl 

and her brother, August 18, 1895. Somehow Mr. Kinney found time to write another 

book, this one about one of his favorite subjects, Eucalyptus. Other books penned 

between 1895 and 1911 were Money, Under the Shadow of the Dragon, Protection 

Versus Free Trade and What Men Do for their Nerves. Additionally, Abbot held the the 

title of president in two different societies: the Southern California Academy of Sciences 

(1890-1900) and the Southern California Forest and Water Society (1896-1909.) 

Descendants of Kinney relate that he was an A-type personality and slept only lightly. He 

kept a pad and pencil on his bedside table to jot down ideas he envisioned in the middle of the 

night.
          In Los Angeles, both the Herald and the Examiner newspapers were in the position 

of looming bankruptcy. Poor management resulted in diminished subscriptions. February 

2,1887, Kinney stepped into the muddle and purchased the two businesses from the 

Creightons in order to protect his stock. He hired another stockholder, William A. 

Spaulding as managing editor even though a very evident dislike between the two men 

was obvious. Six months after the master of Kinneloa hired Spaulding, he and a pair of 

friends made Kinney an offer he did not refuse.

          In the sixth month of 1887, Abbot was made Chairman of the Yosemite 

Commission by California’s Governor Budd. The commission’s main purpose was to 

remove or reduce abuses such as the overcharging of entrance fees and to keep trails clear 

and regulate cattle and sheep pastured in the Valley. Kinney was one of the men 

responsible for Yosemite being declared a national park.

          By May of the following year, partners Ryan and Kinney contracted a new pier to 

be built near the Santa Fe Railroad wharf in Ocean Park. Town fathers gave the men 

permission to build on the pilings that protected the outfall sewer line, reasoning that it 

would protect those same pipes from storm damage. In latter August, the pier was 

completed and a grand barbecue and clambake were staged to draw visitors to the 1,250-

foot  pier. Mr. Perry and Mr. Carrillo leased the tip if the structure for a pleasure boating 

concession and provided steam launches, a sailing yacht, and a dozen rowboats for 

entertainment of the visitors.

          The seaside town of Ocean Park would probably have been Abbot’s lifelong 

preoccupation if Francis Ryan had not chosen that time to suddenly pass away. His death 

occurred October 8 1888 when Ryan was only 43-years-old. He left behind a 38-year-old 

widow with two daughters who knew little of the world outside of her home.  

          Six months later, Matilda Ryan became Mrs. Thomas Horace Dudley and her 

deceased husband’s holdings were turned over to  Mr. Dudley who was a local mover and 

shaker, similar to Kinney. Dudley had no intention of emulating his wife’s former 

husband and becoming a silent partner. At first, affairs between the two men seem to 

progress without difficulty. The partners built the South Side Golf Links in Ocean Park 

and the opening ceremonies were celebrated with a formal ball at the Doria, residence of 

Captain and Mrs. Addison Smith. A two-day golf tournament followed in June.

          Abbot Kinney had a penchant for railway systems. He recognized that if a business 

district were to be successful, customers had to be able to travel to it. He was marginally 

involved in the Boyle Heights Cable Railway in East Los Angeles and the proposed rail 

system between Santa Monica and Rustic Canyon. In 1899 he originated a scheme for an 

electric railway to run between Santa Monica and Redondo Beach using the sand to lay 

tracks. He called it the Redondo and Santa Monica  Railway Company and the line, the 

Los Angeles Traction Railroad. He administered the project from one of his Los Angeles 

offices on Spring Street. In 1903, work of laying 16 miles of track began but it became 

the laughing stock of the westside  because of poor management on the site. That coupled 

with many other problems was the beginning of its decline. The Ocean Park Review 

exchanged insults with the Los Angeles Daily Times. Abbot finally received a generous 

offer from Sherman and Clark of the Los Angeles Pacific Company and sold them his 

holdings in 1904 for $280,000

          The title to Rancho La Ballona. was contested and muddy for many years in the 

courts. It was patented to Ygnacio Machado, Felipe and Torres Talamantes by President 

Grant in December of 1873 but the patent was founded on a Mexican land grant  in 1839 

by the Mexican governor of California, Juan Alvarado. In 1867 a partition suit was 

brought by John Young, Ignacio Machado, and others to divide the ranch among the 

various purchasers of individual properties. South Santa Monica and Ocean Park were 

decreed to be the possessions of Andres, Raphael, Jose Antonio and Christobal Machado. 

Raphael and Andreas Machado first sold the area to be known as the Kinney/Dudley 

Tract  to a British Army officer named Captain Hutchinson. Later, Hutchinson conveyed 

the land to Abbot Kinney and Francis Ryan.

          The Machados were not apprised of the fact that the beach strip was sold along 

with the rest of the land and thought they still owned it. The sandy strip, measuring 40 to 

200 feet from the surf along the entire length of the rancho, was challenged in a suit 

brought in 1897 but Judge York died before he was able to hand down a decision. In 

October of 1899 a second case was tried in Los Angeles Superior Court and after 

voluminous and contradictory testimony was heard, the beach strip was given to the final 

buyers who thought they had owned it all along. The Kinney/Dudley tract was kept 

intact.

          An Ocean Park Racetrack was laid out and planted with Abbot’s favorite trees: 

eucalyptus.  Ten-thousand were planted by the Kinney faction. And although the pleasure 

district seemed to take a step forward, a setback occurred only a couple of months later. 

The old Casino-cum-Country Club burned to the ground taking the grandstands and 

tennis courts with it. It was only insured for one-third of its value. Undeterred, Kinney 

and Dudley commissioned the laying of 500 feet of broad walk in Ocean Park. A new 

country club was shaping up on local drawing boards. As a part of the racetrack the new 

clubhouse would feature bowling alleys, billiard rooms, tennis courts and golf links.

          Yet another tragedy struck the Kinney family when newborn Crittenden was a 

stillbirth. Margaret, at 36, had lost three of the eight children she had birthed. The 

pressures of work and responsibility did not allow much time for mourning. The couple 

moved on, substituting hard work for their grief.

          The business street leading up to the new Ocean Park Pier  began to evolve and a 

decision was made by the City of Santa Monica to call it Pier Avenue. A new hotel was 

constructed and when a music pavilion was requested, one was immediately forthcoming. 

Only two years into the new century 119 houses had been constructed with the addition 

of three stores, a postal facility and a second hotel owned by the Holborow family. It did 

not look like anything could stop Kinney from achieving his dream city but relations 

were strained between Dudley and himself. In February of 1902, T.H. Dudley sold his 

50% share to Alexander Fraser, H.R. Gage, and G.M. Jones. Fraser already had 

negotiations underway for a lavish bath house on Ocean Front Walk and the Santa 

Monica Outlook newspaper said the deal was fortunate.

          From the inception, the new partnership did not run smoothly. Instead of one 

partner to deal with, Abbot now had three. The new Ocean Park Pier was storm-damaged

shortly after the merger took place and 300 feet of the structure was washed away. 

Kinney and Dudley were forced to pay for half of the damage for contractual reasons and 

the other half was covered by Kinney and his new partners. It was about this time that 

Abbot moved to Santa Monica on a more permanent basis, doubtlessly to keep a closer 

eye on his Ocean Park Improvement Company.

          Their final child, a son who went unnamed, was born to Abbot and Margaret. He 

only survived two months and then was laid to rest in Woodlawn Cemetery along with 

the couple’s other offspring.

          A bank and school shot up almost overnight, a new wider broad walk was laid and real estate continued booming. Competition between partners became so intense that Abbot turned his attention to a newspaper he began two years previously, The Los Angeles Saturday Post. He oversaw this small paper in the quiet one of his offices, in the Stimson Building in downtown L.A.
          Tragedy continued to haunt the family when Kent suddenly passed away in the house on Ocean Avenue. His death certificate and cemetery record list the reason as pericarditis, an aftereffect of his bout with rheumatic fever. Margaret was so prostrate with grief at the death of her 14-year-old son that his father had to accompany the body to Woodlawn Cemetery alone. Five of their nine children were now deceased.
          He must have been greatly tired of the stress in his life because only two weeks later, the four partners agreed to dissolve the Ocean Park Improvement Company. Strangely, they did it on the toss of a coin. Abbot was to receive 50% of the land and the three other men the same amount. Kinney called out  “Heads,” and made the coin flip. It came up heads. The other three men must have thought they lost their investment because the natural choice would have been to select the developed part of the tract where the Ocean Park Pier stood. But the Doge-to-be wanted to begin again and this time without interference. He chose the undeveloped marshy land of Venice.
          In May of 1904, the Outlook carried a description of Kinney’s elaborate designs for a “veritable Coney Island.” The Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors were presented with his plan one week later. He called his city, Venice. The Board subsequently gave its approval and the master of Kinneloa embarked on the most successful adventure of his life. He was 54-years-old.


Chapter Seven
Venice-of-America
          The Venice plan was greeted with hoots and raspberries from the public. It was known that Abbot had failed at some of his other schemes. Someone coined the phrase, “Kinney’s Folly.” But as contracts were awarded and the city began to take shape, smiles were replaced by looks of wonder and the raucous laughter ceased. On the property where an old racetrack had been situated, G.I. Goucher was given the contract to begin dredging the canals. How else does one rid themselves of swamps but to build canals? T.C. Wadsworth secured contracts to construct both the pleasure pier off the newly-built Windward Avenue and a ship hotel on pilings. The pier lumber arrived by ship in August of 1904 and work began only a month later. Eighteen-year-old Thornton Kinney recorded important photos of the construction on his camera and they exist today as the only pictures taken of this important event. The newly dredged Grand Lagoon was graded by a west side construction company with the grand opening date slated as July 4, 1905, less than one year later.
          Architects Marsh and Russell commenced building their Venetian-style designed buildings on Windward Avenue, one of the areas Abbot considered his showpiece. Eighty-five feet wide, the street was to be paved at the owner’s personal expense. Operators of the Short Line Beach and Venice Strand came to an agreement in Kinney’s Los Angeles office that they would dig a two-mile canal, which would serve connecting their set of waterways and the Venice Canals with the Playa del Rey Lagoon. Expenses for the new boulevard linking Playa del Rey and Ocean Park would be absorbed by owners of the properties. European-style bridges were planned to span Kinney’s canals designed by Felix Peano, an Italian metal sculptor. Peano was also secured to festoon the bridges and buildings with leering lions, slithering sea serpents, grimacing gargoyles and other Moorish-design mythical creatures. Exquisite arcades with iron columns and capitals fashioned after the likenesses of a local businessman and a beauty queen were designed to protect passengers arriving on the Green Cars for a day at the Abbot Kinney Pier.
          A labyrinth of utility tunnels were slated to lay nestled beneath the pristine face of Windward to protect its beauty from the unsightly wires and pipes. Hidden entrances shielded the tunnels from intruders. Los Angeles Pacific Railway extended a line to their new Windward stop. They also installed a switch and a spur running to the pier to facilitate the handling of materials used to build the structure. Rocks in very large sizes were commissioned from Chatsworth to build the breakwater. Kinney had just requested permission to construct the storm shelter from the government. Real estate agents reported the sale of 18 unimproved lots in the period of one week at the Venice-of-America subdivision. Lots averaged 80 by 90 feet and they were priced from $500 to $1,400.
          The Venice (formerly Ocean Park) Country Club on Westminster Avenue hosted a masquerade ball to bring Los Angeles residents to the subdivision. It was Abbot’s first promotional event in his new city. Dancing and refreshments were the drawing card but real estate was the practical reason for the event.
           Plans for a tent city were unveiled by the Outlook in December. A main street 1,000 feet long by 50 feet wide would serve the 250 white canvas structures just south of Grand Canal. Replete with lighting, sewers, water and electric street bulbs the vacation cottages were already in manufacture at a temporary tent factory set up near Grand Lagoon. Excavation for trenches to lay the 30-inch conduits had already begun in the loose sands. Two lines of pipes were laid four feet below sea level and sheet piling was used to shore up the ditch sides to prevent cave-ins. In February of 1905, the last pipe was set in place. The local newspapers reported a Lagoon Bath House set along the sides of Grand Lagoon.  A 70 by 70-foot warm saltwater pool was planned for in the wood frame structure and plastered interior. A garage was slated for the rear of the structure with an auto repair shop and headquarters for an automobile club. Cars were not popular in 1905 but Kinney was a visionary and knew they would be in great use in the future.
          Construction of the Pier Auditorium began in earnest just after Christmas of 1904. Seating capacity was set at 8,000 and it was announced that the famous Innes Band of New York would play at the dedicatory ceremonies.
          Meanwhile, in Abbot’s life outside of Venice, California, Governor Pardee appointed five representatives to the American Forestry Congress, Kinney, of course, being one of them. Serious discussion had been bandied about by local concerns concerning the disposition of certain western forests. So this Congress was a welcome gathering to many interested parties.
          Tides were unusually high during the winter of 1905-06 and Kinney waited anxiously for permission from the government to build his breakwater. His worse fears were realized in March of 1905 when a heavy surf, a six-foot tide and a storm at sea brought enormous and powerful breakers to his beach. All of the Santa Monica Bay piers were damaged. Most of the Kinney Pier was washed away and a pile driver left on the south side of the structure fell in the water. Sidewalks buckled and were displaced. The Short Line Beach real estate office was toppled off its foundation, The sandy shores were deep in wreckage. The Auditorium was gone with most of the rest of the pier. Sour King Neptune sent his ocean to hammer at the wood on the beach making most of it not reclaimable. Almost three inches of rain fell and what small section of the pier still standing, was weakened by the onslaught of the breakers. Damages were estimated at well over the $40,000 mark.
          The very day after the storm, the long-awaited permission from the government was received. Kinney, with a wistful attitude, immediately began construction of his $10,000 sea wall. It was the first private breakwater in the United States. He also arranged for workers to begin a 24-hour schedule for 600 men in rebuilding the wrecked pier. When asked about the new grand opening date he replied that it was the same as the old one: July 4, 1905.
          Because the new St. Mark Hotel, located at the corner of Windward and Ocean Front Walk, was made of bricks, it avoided most of the damage. Dr. J.S. Hunt built the Windward Hotel next to the St. Mark. Later it was renamed the St. Charles and now took the name of the St. Mark since that hotel was demolished. The Bridge of Sighs connected the two edifices later, and descendants report that Kinney had a private dining room just on the east end of that walkway. Here he entertained special guests of the town and local notables.
          Alexander Belford, a resident of Los Angeles, constructed a 41 by 85-foot, two- story brick office building at the southwest corner of Windward and Trolleyway (now called Pacific.) Space was leased immediately for two stores, a post office, and a bank on the ground floor.  David Evans of Salt Lake City erected a city block on Center Street and a narrow-gauge railroad track was laid in preparation for a miniature railway system. An army of workers rushed plans to complete the city by Independence Day.
          People were no longer laughing and using the term, “Kinney’s Folly.” The Pier was complete and the newspaper announced a new arm was added on the wharf and called it, “Frolic.” The annex was to have a Venetian theme of its own with a 1,000-seat theater and arcaded paths. Pilings were driven for it in the water just west of the Pavilion at the land end of the sructure.
          A Venice Yacht Club, organized by members of the Country Club, announced a regatta as a part of the opening day ceremonies. The Southern California Swimming Association planned lagoon water races and a diving contest for the more talented aquatic enthusiasts. A shipment of an organ and opera chairs arrived by train and were installed in the completed Auditorium. The Lawn Tennis Association set up an elaborate match and festivities. Speakers, musicians, and performers began to arrive in Venice-of-America. Most everything had fallen into place.
          Every large fair and exposition of that era had a Venice section with canals and gondolas which were always a popular place to go. Abbot Kinney took that idea and made it his dream to create a permanent Venice on the western shore of the United States. He declared it would be a renaissance of culture. Indeed, he succeeded in opening his dream city on Independence Day, 1905.          



















Chapter Eight
Sunrise
          Instead of July 4, the celebration actually began June 30. Mrs. Abbot Kinney, wife of the entrepreneur whose energy and millions made this veritable cultural renaissance by the sea possible, turned the wheel that opened the conduits and sent the salt water charging into the dry canals. At 2:00 P.M. Mrs. Kinney made the canaled city a reality. Through two 30-inch pipes which reached 500 feet out into the surf,, 500 gallons of seawater per second, rushed into the system. Pumps were not used, only gravity caused the water to ebb and flow. A rousing cheer was given for Margaret and the success of the new canals.
           Not yet complete, Windward Avenue was strewn with 1,000 potted plants, banners, 4,000 flags, patriotic bunting, green wreaths, and gaudily painted signs. The St. Mark Hotel was finished and open for inspection and visitors were fascinated by the lavish rooms and the café through which they were permitted stroll. Streets were watered down to prevent dust as Kinney had not yet kept his promise to pave them.
           The canal district was planted with beautiful flowers and trees from the private nursery that Abbot had established to beautify his unique space. The graceful bridges arched their necks over the canals, complete with Felix Peano’s sea serpents and the like. He only lived in Venice for two years but he left a permanent mark with his colonnades and capitals. 
          A three-day tennis tournament began at the Country Club and both Abbot and his 18-year-old son, Tony (Thornton) entered the men’s single division. The elder Kinney was a sports enthusiast all of his life and swam daily in the Pacific. The newspaper did not publish the winner of those tournaments but Abbot Kinney is recorded in state records as a men’s singles tennis champion.
           Simultaneously the South Coast Yacht Club launched their regatta with a two-mile race beginning at the Kinney Pier. Marchetti’s Ship Hotel Cabrillo was christened at a ceremony in the prow by Miss Nina Adams, assisted by a flock of lovely ladies dressed in white. A sumptuous banquet was laid out in the dining room where John C. Ince, Superintendent of the Kinney Company, toasted the grand occasion.
           The first gathering at the new Pier Auditorium commenced at twilight where the construction workers were lauded and toasted. Unanimously chosen by the residents and builders as event chairman was Jack C. Crow, a carpenter who made his home in Los Angeles.
          Sunday, July 2, the Venice Assembly opened at two hours before noon. Considered the best preacher in the country by many of the faithful, Reverend Benjamin Fay Mills, gave the salutory address, “Modern Science and Religion,” to the overflowing Auditorium crowd. The patriotic musical program which followed was led by a large pipe organ that accompanied Genevra Johnstone Bishop and Sidney Lloyd Wrightson.
          The Innes Band of New York was unavailable so an equally famous orchestra by the name of Arend’s played concerts and a children’s chorus sang throughout the day. No less than 40,000 people rode the Green Car to Venice to inspect the new shining city. The population of Hollywood that year was only 10,000.
          The Santa Monica Outlook headlined, “Venice Bursts on Illumined Sea,” the following day to illustrate the action of Abbot Kinney when he threw the switch on the 17,000 electric bulbs strung across Windward and festooning the canals. The resulting fairyland of splendor dazzled the onlookers and more than one mouth opened in awe. Derogatory terms died on the lips of gossips and critics.
          After the spectacle of lights, the crowd was wonderstruck. Their effect on the calm waters of the Grand Lagoon and all over the canal district was a marvel and subject of much discussion. The first of a series of twilight concerts began and melodies drifted across the waters while the crowds sat mesmerized in the Amphitheater. 
          Kinney’s Surf Bath House and Lagoon Bath House were not yet complete. The dressing room structure at the surf line was yet unpainted and the outdoor pool with its 40 foot-wide broad walk was still in the digging stage. But few had come to swim that day. A lavish bathhouse was built at Ozone Avenue by Alexander Fraser to compete with the ones in Venice but eventually there were so many swimmers that all of the establishments did well financially.
          Announced in the Times, the two-hour sale the day before disposed of 335 lots for an aggregate amount of $405,000. All of the lots abutted on the Grand Canal and its tributaries. Along Grand Canal the lots cost $1,000 to $1,250 each. All records for all sales in all classes of subdivision properties were eclipsed. Abbot was jubilant. The local critics were staggered.
          The big day finally arrived and promptly at 9:30 A.M, .a patriotic concert commenced in the Auditorium. Accompanied by 42 pieces of Arend’s Venice-of-America Band, Mme. Johnstone-Bishop, Mr, Wrightson and A.E. Walper raised their voices in praise of their country. A 400-member children’s choir raised their voices with a recital on the grand Venice Pipe Organ. The subjects of Theodore Roosevelt and Old Glory were addresses made and they were preceded by a recitation of “The Star Spangled Banner.” Dancing in the spacious Auditorium was slated from 1:30 P.M. to 6:30 P.M. and again from 7:30 P.M. to midnight.
          A swimming competition began at 2:00 P.M. in the Grand Lagoon under the auspices of the Southern California Swimming Association. An eight man 100-yard race was first on the schedule for the amateur championship of California. The second contest was similar but restricted to those under the age of 16. A 50-yard competition comprised the third event and most of the same swimmers participated. Next came high and fancy diving by swim instructor/lifeguard, Jake Cox, who distinguished himself a few years in the future by becoming the manager of the Venice Plunge and doing fire dive exhibitions both in the Plunge and from an airplane. He later appeared in the sixth event, a high diving contest held in the Lagoon’s center on a high tower.
          The present and former champions swam in three heats with the first two winners qualifying for a final half-mile event. Swimming with her arms and legs tied in the eighth event was Miss Pansy Lord who had just turned 15. Fancy and trick diving, from the rings, a springboard, and the trapeze, rounded out the ninth segment of the entertainment. A silver loving cup was donated by Abbot Kinney for the final event which was a 220-yard relay race. Gold and silver medals were given to winners that day as well as other valuable prizes collected from local businesses.
          A Japanese fireworks display ended the long day of hilarity and tired but happy, Los Angeles visitors boarded the Green Cars at the Windward stop to head home to their beds. The Santa Monica Outlook reported that of the two Independence Day celebrations, Santa Monica and Venice, the biggest draw was at Venice.
          On July fifth, the celebration continued. Clarence Eddy favored the crowd with an organ recital at the Auditorium, Grace Dickman provided the solos, which the audience seemed to like tremendously. An even larger crowd turned out for Professor Jerome H. Raymond who presented a stereopticon lecture, very popular in the area. His subject was, “Constantinople: Despotism and Disintegration.” The Cumnock School of Expression in Los Angeles, along with its School of Fine Arts and Nature Study, exhibited its student’s works of art. Another band concert on the Grand Lagoon rounded out the day.
          Now that all of the hoopla had passed and the opening ceremonies were finished, Kinney had no intention of allowing his investment to settle down into another humdrum beach city. After his reported expenses of more than two million dollars, he met with his company and Superintendent Ince to work up a schedule of activities, promotions and planning committees. Real estate sales continued at a record pace and it would be a lifetime commitment to keep the city running smoothly.
          Incorporated with directors, Abbot and Margaret Kinney, Thornton and Sherwood Kinney and John Pope, the Venice Water Company was born. A very large spring of  fresh water was discovered when the Lagoon Bath House was being excavated and Abbot wanted to control the flow of water, unlike his stance when he fought the Riparian Water Wars with his neighbors and enemy, DeBarth Shorb. Capital stock was $250,000 and $500 was subscribed.
          Much of Abbot’s early success was due to the lack of technology in the early part of the 20th century. Television, radio, and computers had yet to make an entrance into family living rooms so unless there were readers in the household, the population had to leave their homes for entertainment. Moving pictures were new and not everyone had a spare dime to spend on viewing them. In Venice-of-America, one could walk among ornate and exotic buildings, stroll on the pier and breathe sea air, watch the pretty girls, see aquatic events, or whatever the city was featuring, and all of it was free! If one did have spare money he could take a boat ride on the canals or eat food to which he was not accustomed. It was a veritable paradise!
          Because Kinney was an exercise enthusiast all manner of sports were featured for the enticement of the public. Foot races, soapbox derbies, swim expositions, and contests of all sorts, were only a few of the delights proffered to the public. The proximity to the ocean and canals was an exciting draw. Water basketball (now called water polo) was very well attended and the Venice group played teams from other towns and YMCAs. Later in the town’s history, a team made up of Venice boys who practiced at the Plunge, made the Olympics and had the dubious honor of meeting Germany’s Hitler in their foray into that country. 
          On another dark note, it became obvious to Abbot that Signore Carlo Marchetti was not operating the Ship Hotel in a respectable manner. It was whispered that one could purchase drugs and arrange for prostitutes through the Italian immigrant. Kinney tried admonishing Marchetti at first; he was a stockholder in the enterprise. When he did not comply with town rules, the Doge of Venice appeared before the Ocean Park Trustees and requested that his liquor licenses be removed. At first the town leaders hoped that the Ship’s proprietor would abandon his ten-year lease and a more ethical person could be found to replace him. Fate took a hand in the situation when just two weeks later, another Marchetti enterprise, the St. Mark Café was damaged by fire. Only one day previous the Italian had allowed his insurance policies to lapse so he had no choice except to resign both posts and renege on his contracts. His business voyage lasted only 100 days in the infant town known as Venice.
          The Venice Assembly was one of two vehicles which Kinney planned to bring culture to the people of his fledgling city. It was very prolific in its output of lectures, singers, musicians, and intelligencia during the 1905 season. Religious speakers held forth on the subject of enlightenment. Abbot had a number of favorite mottos and one was, “Education should never cease while life lasts.” However, Kinney’s life of cultural leanings and the lives of many Angelenos were decidedly different. When the novelty wore off, audiences thinned and then nearly disappeared. After only two seasons, the Assembly was declared a failure and the Doge began to supply amusements more to the taste of his neighbors.  They preferred the sea air, the swimming, and floating on the canals of his sunshine-baked coastal town.
          A cause for great celebration, the Venice-of-America Land Company incorporated August 10, 1905. Superintendent J.C. Ince and City Engineer, M.D. Chapman were honored by two shiny gold watches and the applause of 300 employees of the Kinney Company. Abbot provided a delicious banquet at the Country Club for all concerned.
          The Los Angeles Times printed an article stating that the Doge of Venice sold his Flatiron Building at Spring, Main, and Eighth Streets. It is very likely he was consolidating his money to support his new project. The Times asserted that he paid only $36,000 for it during the depression in the 1880s and sold it for a whopping $450,000.
          If Marchetti did not prosper in Venice, other establishments flourished. A $10,000 Venetian-style boathouse sprang up in October on a site Abbot had set aside for an aquarium. Gondolas were purchased from St. Louis, Missouri, and Kinney found some Italians who could sing around Los Angeles and hired them as gondoliers. Two boxcars of canoes arrived from a factory in Michigan and the Grand Canal was widened and deepened. A management firm was needed to oversee rentals so the Lemcke Boat Company of Santa Monica was chosen by Mr. Ince.
          Fifty-three pieces strong, the magnificent Ellery Band appeared in the Auditorium just before Thanksgiving. Balcony seats were sold for ten cents but the lower floor was free. The management hoped to draw a better class of gentry to their events so a $2.50 
fee was placed on the boxes. Music was the only cultural aspect of Kinney’s renaissance that succeeded in a town where many inhabitants were born on mid-western farms.
          Christmas passed uneventfully in Abbot’s brand-new town but big plans were afoot as he made arrangements to replace the Venice Assembly and give the public the type of entertainment that he thought might be more palatable to them. They took time out only to celebrate the New Year at the Country Club on Saturday, December 30. It was deemed appropriate that dancing would be abandoned to hear a concert given by the widely popular Ellery Band. Venetians, in their best clothing, turned out to ring in the new and wave goodbye to the old year.
          A staggering amount of activities was on the drawing board for the year 1906. Paramount among them was the Venice Winter Carnival to be celebrated at the sparkling new Midway Plaisance.  Invitations were sent out for the grand opening, January 13 and 14, which included no less than Kinney’s personal friend, the Governor of California, George Cooper Pardee, and his staff.  Mayors from 40 different cities were also invited and special Los Angeles Pacific cars were rented for the dignitaries. The new manager of the Ship Café had orders for an ornate dinner to wind up the day. For more than six weeks a large workforce of carpenters were busily erecting a tiny hamlet of “strange-looking buildings,” the newspaper called them. Located on the southern side and facing Grand Canal, each structure featured a different culture from that of the local area and was peopled by different ethnicities. Gaston Akoun, the man chosen to be Midway manager, selected a dozen of his most successful attractions from another show he managed called The Trail at the Lewis and Clark Exposition, held in Portland, Oregon. He brought them to Venice to be a permanent part of the show. The name, Midway, as Kinney called it was gleaned from the Chicago Wolrd’s Fair where the Doge had been a visitor.
          The featured exhibits included places where Abbot had stopped on his three-year ‘round-the-world trip such as Fair Japan, a Nipponese theater, manicured gardens, and a bazaar selling paper fans, art goods, lanterns, silk kimonos, ivory chopsticks, and the like. Japanese dancers with white faces awed the less sophisticated Angelenos. The Igorots were advertised as menacing headhunters and man-eaters from the Philippines and they ran out on a stage to perform scary tribal dances. One Venetian recalled that her mother used to threaten her behavior by saying she would give her to the Igorots if she misbehaved. Chiquita was a 30-year-old, 32- pound South American woman who used all of her 28-inch height to charm her audience with bicycle riding and dances from her native land. The Spanish Theater was her domain. The Klondike Mines revealed the misery of gold mining in the land of ice and snow. Each visitor took a tiny piece of “gold” home with him only to find later that it was just pyrite. 
          The Streets of Cairo was a replica of the Algazara Plaza in Cairo, Egypt, and they exhibited real mummies from the ancient civilization. The Whirlwind Dancers of the Desert performed outside while camel rides, overseen by Egyptian drivers, delighted those who had never seen such a beast. Madame Fatima was a world-famous belly-dancer, who “didn’t dance with her feet.” She began her career on the streets of the east and came to the United States for a better life. Later, she retired and came back to Venice to live there until her death.
           Darkness and Dawn was a type of fun house in which a spooky version of heaven and hell was depicted. The Temple of Mirth , “a foolish house,”  was a room filled with curved mirrors and people who jumped out at visitors to scare the laughing crowd. Bosco Eats Them Alive was a man who ate live reptiles, usually lizards. Not long after his debut in Venice, his death was announced. One of his hapless (but poisonous) victims bit him.
A “smart chicken’” answered questions by pecking on a button that released corn for her to devour. Snake charmers vied with hula girls, while magicians, freaks, a bearded lady,  and other carnival attractions plied their trades on the banks of the placid canal.
          Opening exercises took place at the Lagoon Amphitheater. As was Kinney’s habit, a solid hour of speeches nearly paralyzed the audience. Finally, smokeless rockets heralded a fireworks show presented by Y. Kushibiki, the Japanese Commissioner to the Lewis and Clark Exposition, who happened to be in the canaled city to install the oriental exhibits. The bursts exploded hundreds of feet above the spectators heads to reveal purple cows, blue monkeys, red mules, and piebald pigeons of monstrous size. It was a show that the local populace would never forget.
          After having “lived” in Venice-of-America only two months, the mummies residing at The Streets of Cairo fell victims of a blaze. Some improperly wired lights caught fire. The volunteer Fire Department arrived in good time but they used their hoses to extinguish, which only made it worse for a while. The Outlook drily observed that the water caused more damage than the flames but the long-deceased Egyptians could be exposed to the sun for a few days and would be able to report for work after only a short vacation.
          Six months later, a second fire broke out in the hastily constructed Midway. Kiki, the unofficial host of the Midway, was scared out of his wits and responded accordingly. The Venice Volunteer Fire Department responded once more and hoses were connected to a hydrant at the Lagoon. The Temple of Mystery and the Spanish  Theater were engulfed and strong winds hampered progress. When the flames were doused, it was found that the damage was not as bad as was feared considering the scope of the blaze.
          Feuding with Kinney, the greedy Ocean Park trustees tried to exact a license fee from each individual exhibit in the Midway, while Abbot insisted it should be licensed as a single business. Fraser and Jones, his former partners, contended that the Plaisance was not a proper attraction for a beach town. Smoldering enmity broke out anew while nasty rumors spread and tempers flared. In the end, the Midway was licensed as a single entity. A lifelong rift was born between Dana Burks and Kinney through the endless bickering and constant control the City Fathers tried to wield over the Doge and his wildly successful town.
          Music was an abiding passion in the life of the master of Venice. Recalling a fine orchestral director he once met while traveling in Italy, Abbot sent for him to play in 1906. Manfredi Chiaffarelli brought his wife and family first to Philadelphia, and then made the rest of the trip to Canal City. Signore Chiaffarelli became a permanent resident, thrilled many audiences, and wrote an opera that featured Venice and a Kinney family member as the hero. 
          Arthur Reese was the first man of color to establish a business in Venice. His janitorial and shoeshine services were, at once, successful. Because there were no rentals available for black men, Arthur purchased a piece of land at Sixth Street and Santa Clara. Kinney developed a lot of respect for the Louisiana native and asked him to take over the janitorial work for the Kinney Company. Soon he had so much work, he sent for his cousins, the Tabors, to work for him. They built a home on his back lot and became part of the crew of 23 who kept the town pristine. 
          When Reese heard about a special holiday affair planned for the Dance Pavilion and Auditorium, he asked Kinney if he could decorate the exteriors of the two structures. His career as a decorator was launched. His artistry was unparalled. He was named the official Venice Town Decorator. Their respect was so great for one another, Kinney always addressed him as Mr. Reese and Arthur called Abbot, Mr. Kinney.
          Of important note, the Outlook reported the Kinney Company formally donated the gift of Venice streets and alleys to the City of Ocean Park (Santa Monica.) The newspaper reported that acceptance was held in abeyance until their attorneys looked over the paperwork. In all probability, the gift was made so that service would have to be maintained by the grantee, and not the grantor.
          In the aftermath of the San Francisco earthquake when homeless victims roamed the streets of that city, Kinney’s friend, Governor Pardee sent out an appeal to all of the Santa Monica Bay beach cities. Their enmity forgotten for the moment, Dana Burks, President of the Ocean Park Board of Trustees conferred with Abbot Kinney and space was found for 200 of the destitute. Sixty souls arrived in the first wave and were comfortably settled in Villa City, the canvas-sided vacation cottages Kinney built on Grand Canal so that the working man would be able to afford a place to vacation. Fifty more appeared on the steamship, Santa Rosa in four more days and they were removed at once to a facility providing sandwiches, coffee, and medical examinations. Some of the homeless had burns and other injuries. When they, too, were settled in Villa City, the Japanese at the Midway Plaisance sponsored a benefit performance at the personal expense of Mr. Kusubiki to raise monies for food and clothing. Many of the immigrants carried no personal effects whatever. The Santa Monica Relief Society solicited funds with Margaret Kinney heading a grand musical festival on the Pier. Food and clothing were distributed as well as daily living expenses.
          A milestone on the calendar of cultural events in Venice was achieved on May18, when the idolized Sarah Bernhardt was booked to play in the Auditorium. Her private railcar, loaned by Cornelius Vanderbilt, was switched to the tracks that were laid on the Pier to convey rocks to the breakwater and the esteemed actress was able to live close to the stage on which she performed. An avid fisherman, Bernhardt expressed her desire to throw a line from her dressing room window and cook her catch for breakfast. The Kinney Company, who hoped they might have her return, hired young boys to swim out to her line and hook live tom cod on it. 
           Her repertoire included her famous roles in “La Sorciere,” “Camille,” and “La Tosca,” as a finale. Mr. and Mrs. Kinney were invited to dine with The Muse, as she was billed and had a pleasant evening. Later, she spoke fondly of her stay in the canaled city and the courtesies paid her. No doubt she best recalled the string of fish she caught.
          Situated on Horizon Avenue, the new bathhouse foundation was hotly contended by the Ocean Park Trustees. Their opposition was understandable considering that they already constructed a lavish bathhouse just north of the Venice city limit. G. M. Jones and the Board commanded the Kinney Company to remove the obstruction by noon on June 10 or Marshal G.G. Watt would use necessary force to do so. However, prior to the witching hour just short of 200 Venice women and their offspring trudged through the warm sands with picnic baskets to enjoy lunch on the foundation in question. The marshal and the street superintendent watched the merrymakers but no effort was made to remove them from the area. The crowd remained after dark  and a petition bearing a multitude of signatures was presented to the Trustees the following day. Outmaneuvered, and fearful of their publically appointed positions, the Board relented.
          The Outlook reported an incident that occurred in Los Angeles, aboard the Venice Short Line cars in that same month. Abbot boarded the train with another man with whom he seemed quite amicable. As the trip continued the anonymous man began making loud and insulting remarks. The quiet, mild-mannered man’s eyes began to blaze and much to the astonishment of the other riders he threatened his companion loudly with violence. When that did not stop his seatmate’s tirade he threatened ejection. The bully left the car under his own steam at the next stop. It seemed he preferred a more dignified exit.
          That the burgeoning town needed a city hall became painfully obvious to the increasing population.. Kinney offered 50-foot lot on Windward Avenue to the Trustees for a very low price. That was rejected due to the title being not clear so the town fathers donated a lot from the East Ocean Park Tract, near the Tokyo district where most of the Japanese farmers resided. The City Hall was built near what residents called the “back country,” and some said it was as far away from the commercial section as Tokyo. Thus, the term Tokyo City Hall was born.
          Built back in 1904, the Venice Miniature Railway was purchased by Kinney as a means to take real estate purchasers to display lots for sale in his Venice-of-America. Designed by John J. Coit, a former Southern Pacific engineer who had previously designed a small rail system in a Los Angeles park, the Doge commissioned a larger network. The Johnson Machine Works of L.A. built the locomotives quickly. Two Prairie-type engines with their eight-wheel tenders were soon ready to operate. The cost was $4,510 each, a staggering amount in 1905. Black, with silver lettering, the common running speed was 20-miles-per-hour but they were capable of higher speeds. Ten 8-wheel passenger cars, 5 painted a cherry red and 5 painted blue were fabricated to facilitate riders and Venetian lion heads appeared in relief on the sides of each car and at the end of every row of seats. Incorporated under California’s state laws as a steam railroad company, the train was leased to Coit. Kinney’s two sons, Carlton, the youngest, and Innes, age 14 were the president and chief engineer, respectively. Coit was the operating engineer and a dwarf named L.W. “ Shorty” Chase was the first conductor. The car barn, roundtable, and ticket station were located at what is now the northwest corner of Abbot Kinney and Venice Boulevards. 
          For unknown reasons, the Kinney Company wished to nullify their lease with the designer and operating engineer and run the train as they saw fit. Coit was out of town but was somehow informed that he was to be terminated. He returned to the area and waited until well past midnight. He sneaked around the turntable and entered the barn where he disabled about 200 parts of the locomotives and made off with them in a bag. He effectively halted the operation. The Kinney Company swore out a warrant on Coit and he replicated their actions. The conflict was finally settled out of court when the Kinney Company, who paid for the system, was given full control of the train. No settlement amount was announced.
          The Miniature Railway is alive and well and running in a park in Los Gatos, California. Engine Number Two is in service and Engine Number One was cannibalized to provide replacement parts for its younger brother. The third engine is not running and when it was last located, was kept in storage in Whittier by a man who did not want to sell it for sentimental reasons.
          In a surprise move, Los Angeles Pacific Railway tried to take over Abbot Kinney’s city! Company officials leaked that they were in negotiations with the Doge to purchase his holding. A rail official told the newspaper that the offer would really be an ultimatum because if the master of Venice declined their offer, a similar resort would be constructed at Playa del Rey. The entire story was a farce established to release the L.A.P. from an agreement with Abbot to pay him ten cents on every ticket sold between Los Angeles and Venice. The “buy out” offer implied that the rail line wished to stop the percentage arrangement. Foxy Kinney had already made contingent plans for a competing company  to run between the two cities in case his contract with L.A.P. ever was overturned. And he was just stubborn and capable enough to fabricate his own rail line as the other company knew. A long war between Harriman and Kinney interests loomed.
         Harriman falsely let it leak that he had purchased Venice from Abbot at the low price of $2,750,000 and the implied message to the public was that Harriman could attain whatever he wished at the expense of anyone he pleased to bully. He had not yet reckoned with the shrewd genius of Abbot Kinney. Quietly, without any hue or outcry, the newspaper announced that the L.A.P. had dropped their nefarious plans to buy Venice in return for 21 years of operating expansion permits. In return they had to provide space for civic purposes without any contention, whenever it was requested. It was an apprehensive armistice.
          Sells Brothers Circus included the new town of Venice on their annual schedule for the first time. They were negotiated to arrive at the canaled city after their El Paso closing so the Doge persuaded them to winter in his city of the unique. He built a barnlike structure to secure their more temperamental and dangerous animals and provided them temporary homes with local residents and within his canvas-sided cottages.  Two daily performances was their payment for his generosity and he received a small cut of their entrance fee. Personages no less than Del Fugo, the Clown and Buffalo Bill appeared in Venice-of-America. A 200-wild animal menagerie was set up in one of the Midway buildings and visitors, for a small fee, could shake their heads in wonder at the snarling tiger and step back in awe at the enormity of the elephants.
          Christmas of that year dawned under overcast skies. The crowds that gathered at the Auditorium and the Dance Pavilion were still of a respectable size and arrived on the electric cars to celebrate with holiday showpieces. Camillo’s Orchestra held forth at the Auditorium and Forcelatti’s Venice–of-America Band performed at night in the latter. In later years, Abbot Kinney played Santa Claus to the poor children of Santa Monica Bay and gave out delicious food as well as lavish gifts to those needy tykes.
          Taking on a new partner, the Sells-Floto Circus opened at the Midway, January 20, 1907. A gigantic tent had been erected on the banks of the Grand Canal to contain the one-ring show and those who paid to see it. The stars of the show, the Eddy Family, who skipped and danced across a high wire and an astounding equestrian act, left the crowd gasping with delight. A grand Spec (circus language for Spectacular Parade,) was presented to all visitors with elephants, camels, and ponies. Such was life when you lived in or visited Venice. You might see just anything.
          Led by Abbot Kinney, the people of Canal City brought a damage suit against the Ocean Park Trustees when officials refused to act upon complaints concerning the sewage system. In retaliation, the Board refused to issue the monthly liquor licenses for the bars and restaurants in the city and ordered the Dance Pavilion on the Pier to close their doors on Sundays. The Outlook newspaper featured the entire imbroglio including the insults to Kinney mouthed by his enemy, Dana Burks. Knowing they were not pursuing the correct path of action, the expose in the paper pushed the Board to make an arrangement for the sewer problem and an uneasy peace was formed between the battling factions.
          When the Venice Power House next door to the Lagoon Bath House blew up close to midnight, soon after, rumors were spawned concerning the cause. But there was no obtainable proof as to the cause and the man in charge did escape with his life.
          Abbot was very proud of his sons and lost no opportunity to laud them for their creativity or expertise. Young Innes, at age 15, invented and launched a new type of boat on the Lagoon. It featured a propeller attached to the pedals. Peddling it across the placid waters, Innes was probably unaware that he had just invented the first pedal boat at the seaside resort. He was also quite a skillful sailor and his sloop, the Aimee raced and won against a gasoline launch named North Star. A rematch was anticipated but the latter craft broke from her moorings and was dashed to splinters against the Venice Pier.
          It was in July of 1907 that a man was spotted riding atop a board through breakers on North Venice Beach. He was astonishing to the gathered swimmers and someone called a local newspaper to report this amazing young Hawaiian. George Freeth had just arrived from the island kingdom and was visiting friends in Venice. No one in Southern California had ever seen a surfboard unless they had visited Hawaii. Freeth, a champion swimmer, diver, and surfer had come to the mainland searching for work. However, the lifeguarding service was voluntary in Venice so no work was available for him in Canal City. He instituted a race, which he won, and gave exhibition shows on his heavy board. He was a sensation and was billed “The Man Who Walks on Water.” He emphasized aquatic safety to all to all who would listen but one cannot pay rent without a regular salary.
          When Redondo Beach Bath House heard about the sensation at Venice, they lured him to work in their new facility but only at a fraction of what he should have been paid. So he performed in shows to augment his meager income but spent leisure hours playing in both Venice and Redondo Water Polo Teams. As skill dictated, he was always the captain and his team usually triumphed. He is credited with organizing and training a more professional lifesaving corps.
          Margaret was not heard from much in this period of time and it was whispered that she was not entirely well. However, she organized the first Venice Literary Club from the ladies at the 500 Club at the Country Club quarters. Approximately 100 joined her group. Like any new organization beginning, the women needed funds so Mrs. Kinney proposed they stage “H.M.S. Pinafore”  on a boat in the Lagoon, facing the outdoor Amphitheater. Of course, Mrs. Kinney had a large role in the operetta as it was one of her favorites. Funds raised for the event benefitted the Venice Life Saving Crew and they were used to purchase a lifeboat which was christened, Venice.
          The battle raged on between Kinney and the Ocean Park Trustees. An order to raze Villa City as a fire hazard was handed to the Doge. The real reason that Trustee Hickey wanted the canvas-sided dwellings to vanish was that he was not able to rent his compound known as Hickey Flats for the same low prices that the Kinney Company was asking for their vacation cottages. In an attempt to outwit him, Abbot remodeled most of the canvas walls, magically making them bungalows. Another bitter battle escalated.
          Happier plans were afoot in the Kinney family. Sherwood’s 17th birthday was approaching and Margaret spent many hours planning a lavish party for the boy at the Ship Café. On January 23 the dining room was resplendent with plants and hundreds of flags and pink and green flowers. Special railcars were hired to bring in his friends from not only the local area but Los Angeles and Pasadena, as well. The newspaper reporting the event called him “a young man of rare gentlemanly qualities and a host of admiring friends.” The family served a large cake after dinner with 18 candles: 17 for his age and “one to grow on.” Two-hundred guests swayed to the music of an orchestra and the tables were laid out to form the initials S. and K.
            Carleton Kinney, age 12 and his brother, Innes, age 16, conducted 140 visitors of the National Association of Railroad agents for an inspection of the Miniature Railway for their amusement. Innes, who had just been visiting Arrowhead Springs for his heart condition, was excited to return to the pleasures of the seaside town. The agents bathed and bowled free of charge along with being conducted around the district by Carlton to view the surrounding countryside.
          Arbor Day was always a reason to celebrate in Venice considering the founder was a botanist/horticulturist. A lecture on the life of Luther Burbank took place in the Pier Auditorium each year. A band played popular selections of the day while the crowd dined on box lunches. A large group of celebrants were led to the lake, a round pond at what is now Abbot Kinney and Venice Boulevards, where the canals connected.. The brass band played while seedlings were planted in the park by each individual group with their own small ceremony. Trees were provided by the Kinney Company, so that they remained uniform.
           The elections dawned clear and sunny and Kinney’s Good Government League swept the slate with the popular vote. New Trustees took their seats on the Ocean Park Board and tensions eased in the district. Dark mutterings were silenced and things looked brighter for the Kinney faction.
          At Abbot’s invitation, the United States fleet sailed into Santa Monica Bay waters in April. The Minnesota, Missouri, Ohio, and the Maine were the large battleships in the squadron but a total of 16 vessels anchored in the Bay. Local area clothiers had a field day selling replica hats and middy blouses to the young women and the sailors were treated in a royal manner. Tours of  all of the battleships were a popular attraction for the gentlemen and  it was reported that 10,000 were ferried out to the ships on the first day alone. 
          A fancy dress officer’s ball was slated for the Dance Pavilion and for the first time in its short history, the crowd overflowed the structure. A line of 500 couples stretched the entire way around the floor and down the middle. Arriving in formal dance dress, spectators were permitted to watch the spectacle as the Grand March commenced at 8:30 P.M. with Captain Harber and Mrs. Eglehoff-Rundel in the lead.
          The old soldiers of the G.A.R. at the Sawtelle Soldier’s Home were conducted to one battleship on a special tour meant to honor their former service, many of them having fought in the Civil War. They arrived in large wheelchairs, supported by crutches and leaning on canes but it was a highlight to their mostly uneventful lives in a home for the aged.
          A second ball was given for the warrant officers and midshipmen on another pier. Mayor Dudley, Kinney’s former partner, declared a holiday and businesses closed. Athletic events were scheduled and the servicemen scored highly against their landlocked contemporaries. Magazines were collected for the midshipmen to take on their journey as well as “comfort bags,” prepared by the W.C.T.U. and disbursed by the White Ribbon Army.
          The newspaper reported that no less than 100,000 spectators watched on the shores as the “White 16” departed the Santa Monica Bay. Every hotel and lodging house was filled beyond capacity. At approximately 8 A.M. the fleet began maneuvers and every viewing area was packed. The ships left the Bay and sailed north to Santa Barbara just one hour later. Everyone was left with a high opinion of the United States Navy.
          A former bunkhouse for canal workers was brought to a lot at the Grand Lagoon and Grand Canal and Abbot Kinney leased it to a group of women known as the Cosmos Club. The ladies signed an agreement to remodel and refurbish the white frame structure as a part of the lease. This small building was to become a part of the future Kinney home and to remain in the family until it was given as a gift to Irving Tabor after Abbot’s demise.
          The arrival of June 19 was an important day in the life of Kinney. The hotly contested new Plunge, at Ocean Front Walk and Horizon formally opened its doors on a gloomy June morning. Architect C.S. Russell leaked the cost at $100,000 for the 169-foot by 239-foot structure. Spanish Renaissance-style green glazed tile surrounded the salt-water pool on the lower floor while the upper level consisted of spectators seats which would accommodate 2,000. The most popular feature was the fountain situated in the center of the large pool and many liked to sit on the edge of the geyser and glory in the feel of the warm salty water cascading down their backs. Many windows and a skylight emitted sunlight from the beach. A laundry, 500 dressing rooms, and observation towers were also provided. Bathing suits were emblazoned with a large “V.”
           The L.A. Athletic Club leased the annex of one section of the building useful for a meeting room, gym, and reading and sleeping rooms. Athletes used the gym for training and physical culture classes were popular. At a later date, when L.A.A.C. vacated the annex, a Venice Athletic Club was born to rent the space and provide the same amenities.
          Abbot was a man of formality and so another grand opening was announced. A band concert at St. Mark’s Plaza at Windward and Ocean Front Walk preceded the celebration with aquatic events in the pool following the solemn address. Jim Jeffries refereed a boxing match and a baseball game was also held that day at Athletic Park. It was a day designed for sport enthusiasts and Venice boosters alike. Most of all, it was a triumphant day for the Doge in weathering all assaults by the authorities and  opening his establishment despite them.
          The nation’s 132 birthday was also the third anniversary of the city of Venice and it was greeted with a variety of celebratory events, designed to make those in surrounding communities pale in comparison. Sherwood Kinney, an avid swimmer and water polo player on George Freeth’s team, took part in the one-mile swimming race around the Venice breakwater. Both the Dance Pavilion and the Skating Rink ceased collecting admissions that day while at Athletic Park, a Japanese team from Los Angeles challenged a Venice baseball team. The Auditorium was free all day featuring both musical and vaudeville acts. Results of a boxing match in San Francisco were announced by rounds to the crowd, and a turkey dinner was served near the breakwater.     
          In the mid-afternoon, gondola races were displayed to the crowd in the Lagoon Amphitheater but all of the events were secondary to the day’s grand happening. At 7:30 P.M. a Grand Naval Sham Battle was fought in the Bay waters. The Pier and shoreline were packed with excited onlookers as the battle progressed. Much of the “sham” part of the battle was covered by darkness and the lack of any artificial lighting but the crowd reacted as if they could see everything. The mock engagement was followed by elaborate oriental fireworks and a water polo game was featured between Bimini Bath House and the Venice team. It was the finale of the most elaborate birthday celebration yet held on the Bay.
          Considering that George Freeth had only arrived in California five months earlier, he accomplished an enormous amount of training of the Venice Volunteer Lifesaving Corps. “Practical rescue work,” says Arthur C. Verge, P.h.D. in this article in California History (Volume LXXX No.2/3, Summer/Fall 2001, George Freeth ; King of the Surfers and California’s Forgotten Hero,) “which included not just the use of lifeboats but also the novel idea of swimming out to bathers in distress. That was new.”
          Then, Dr. Verge writes about the reason that Freeth was considered a hero of the highest order. “Freeth’s tireless efforts to make the Venice Volunteer Lifesaving Corps proficient at water rescue work were severely tested on the afternoon of December 16, 1908. On that day at approximately one-o’clock, a tremendous winter squall suddenly descended upon Santa Monica Bay. The usually placid waters turned quickly into rolling troughs of white caps and blinding spray. The gale force winds and high surf they caused, trapped several Japanese fishing boats off the Venice Pier, near its protective breakwater. Although the crews fought valiantly to stay afloat and away from the pier’s south-to-north jetty of solid rock, the storm’s immense strength proved to be too powerful.
          For the next two-and-one half hours, George Freeth braved gale force winds, pounding surf, and a frigid ocean temperature to save singlehandedly the lives of seven men. In the process he nearly lost his own life to hypothermia. Despite being near collapse from having stayed so long in the chilly waters, Freeth ignored the pleas of onlookers and dove off the Venice Pier to rescue still another boat in distress. It was his fourth time out on a long rescue. The Venice Lifesaving Corpsmen then risked their own lives and launched their boat to assist Freeth. Once the object of public ridicule, the now heroic Venice lifesavers rowed through the powerful breakers in the well-practiced fashion that Freeth had taught them. Inspired by the example of their mentor’s tenacity in keeping three drowning fishermen afloat in the churning ocean, the lifeboat crew effected the final rescue. Freeth’s bravery and that of the corps, was witnessed by thousands of onlookers, many of whom who had left their jobs to watch the prolonged operation. Owing to Freeth’s skills and those of the crew he trained personally, not one life was lost in the ordeal.
          Rescue of the eleven fishermen made front-page news in all of the major Los Angeles papers. Both the Los Angeles Times and The Los Angeles Tribune dispatched eyewitness reporters to cover the story. Their first-hand accounts brought Freeth and his crew to national recognition.”
          The rescued Japanese appeared at the beach the following day to present the 24-year-old Hawaiian a gold watch and a financial donation. The men also announced that they had changed the name of their village to Port Freeth. A newspaper reported the following year after a visit to Port Freeth, that nightly offerings of rice and poi in their Shinto ceremony were made in protection of their hero.





Chapter Nine
Tidal Pools
          A float in the Rose Parade was a sign that any town had arrived. The old year had not yet flown when the crew and float representing the lifesavers departed the canaled city to be prepared to line up amongst the beautifully decorated floats of the 1909 Hunt Club’s Parade. The Pasadena News described it as “bedecked with flowers…a lifeboat as the central item on the float. Men sufficient to fully man it marched along side.” Among those on the float and walking were the lifeguards who aided George Freeth in his rescue of  Japanese fishermen off the Venice Pier. Led by the hero, George Freeth, of surfing fame, and now of life saving fame, the group already had received a letter from President Cary of the Tournament that they had won first prize in class “W.” A silver cup was forwarded to corps headquarters where it was displayed proudly. But larger accolades were coming their way and especially to George Freeth.
          One would think that Kinney would have tired of grand openings but they did bring visitors to town and the visitors spent money. The next such event took place in mid-January when the Aquarium on the Pier opened. The star of the museum was a large seal captured off the Channel Islands and tagged with the name, Venice. It was an extraordinarily large seal, which took a unheralded liking to his crate and refused to leave it once the box was breached. Efforts to rope and force him into the seal tank were disappointing and the mammal sent up a howl of protest and skidded to the back of his temporary home. Workmen watched in awe as Venice was so bored by the action that he took a siesta. After some leverage on the carton was applied, the whole thing tipped and the seal fell into the tank. There were some 48 such aquatic containers in the new building.
          Within the Aquarium was a smaller museum that displayed Native American baskets collected by the Doge, himself, when he toured mission country with Helen Hunt Jackson. Those same baskets were donated to the Ventura County Museum by Kendrick Kinney, Abbot’s grandson. The rear section of the structure was later donated to the University of California’s Marine Biological Research Station.
          Much pomp and circumstance was featured by Manfredi Chiaffarelli and the Venice-of-America Band. Crowds gathered for the excitement and it was reported that 100 automobiles were parked on Windward Avenue. The Pier nearly groaned under the impact of so many bodies but Abbot Kinney, the greatest merchant of Venice, had developed the reputation of headlining the most electrifying and riveting phenomena in Southern California.
          When the 1909 Arbor Day rolled around, Abbot was honored by the Cosmos Club because he was their only male member. An elm tree, named after the Doge, was planted and dedicated to him. Mrs. Howell’s speech included the sentence, “May this tree grow and live long enough to inspire all who enter this park, with a like philanthropic spirit as the one whose name this tree bears.”
          Fra Elbertus was scheduled to lecture in the city of Los Angeles in April. Seeing his chance to play host to Elbert Hubband, Kinney invited him to be a guest in Venice and the master of Roycroft accepted. East Aurora, New York was the home of the liberal author’s settlement, where any person willing to work could find employment He believed in the beauty of useful items so from the Roycroft workshops there emerged an impressive array of artful creations including baskets, hand-wrought furniture, and book bindings, among other handiwork. A royal reception was held for the famous gentleman at the Ship Café.
          The need for a polytechnic high school was the topic of discussion at a meeting between the Good Government League and the Venice Chamber of Commerce. Margaret Kinney had already made a trip east to solicit funds from influential men and returned to Venice with promises but no hard cash. With or without the assistance of other school districts, it was agreed by both groups that every path should be explored and every search for financing investigated. A loose curriculum was also a topic of discussion but it was put aside until funds were more firmly intact.
          Another hot topic brought to the attention of both associations was the need to change the name of the city legally to Venice. Other items on the agenda were more pressing so the town’s name remained as Ocean Park for the time being.
          The Abbot Kinney Company again presented a deed to all of Venice’s streets, alleys, and courts to the Ocean Park Board of Trustees and this time it was received favorably. Right-of-way for the Miniature Railroad was excepted. The gift was given with a clause that if trees, flowers, and shrubs did not receive proper care, the deed would be nullified and revert to the Kinney Company’s ownership. Trustee Griffith objected to the strings attached to the deed, and Kinney’s enemy, Dana Burks protested loudly, in his capacity as past-president.  President Eakins explained that the Doge had invested many thousands of dollars to manicure the streets and vegetation and he had every right to place this reserve clause on his gift. The rest of the Board agreed with the exception of one dissenting vote.
          May 30 rolled around and Memorial Day exercises were celebrated in the same manner as former holidays. The usual casting of flowers on the waves by small children was the highlight. It was followed by a parade of city organizations, a bevy of beautiful young girls, and the august officials marching proudly. The old soldiers from the Sawtelle Home, 200 strong, arrived in their wheelchairs and were honored. The Venice-of-America Band supplied the solemn music and after the concert, Judge Curtis D. Wilbur addressed the congregants at the Pier Auditorium. It was a day for reflection, remembrance, and gratitude for lives given.
          Urabenye, a Buddhist feast, was celebrated in Venice and called Japan Day for those who could not pronounce the original name. Colorful Japanese dancing and exotic music filled the wharf as did sporting events such as jujitsu matches, wrestling, and fencing. The Pier was delicately festooned with bright flowers and paper lanterns blowing in the ocean wind. Unusual Japanese goods were offered for sale such as stiff silk obis, chopsticks, teak furniture, and mahogany statues of Buddha. As sunset approached, a grand parade of lanterns led by a smoke-spouting dragon snaked through the streets to a fireworks exhibition. It was a joyful, noisy festival that was featured annually in Venice’s early years,
          After a great deal of discussion, Kinney and Mayor Eakins of Ocean Park determined to make what they considered a high bid for the much-anticipated Jeffries and Johnson boxing match to be staged locally. Their bid was $150,000. To their disappointment, a wealthy syndicate from another state bid more than $300,000 and the fight was held there.
          The Forestry Society of California announced that the Honorable Abbot Kinney had been named as their new president. His book, Eucalyptus, was considered standard literature in the field of forestry and he had long been involved in local forestry matters. His love of trees kept him active in that field until his passing from the Earth.
          Holly was delivered by the wagonload from the nearest canyons to decorate Windward and the Pier. Poinsettias were more expensive and delicate but they were interspersed with the holly, as well. Underprivileged youngsters were treated to their annual Christmas party, sponsored by the merchants, and came away with gifts and candy enough to last through the approaching New Year. Churches served the religious with sacred music and sermons concerning the origin of the day while decorated trees and joyful residents celebrated their Christian holiday.
          On January 21, 1910, Venice City offices were moved from Kinney’s Los Angeles address in the Stimson block to new quarters on Windward Avenue. The stockholders were satisfied as was the Board of Directors, who had insisted on the change of address for all of the parties’ convenience..
           The “Goo Goos” did not rest on their laurels through the year. The Good Government League set up their next slate of trustees during the year and when the election rolled around, they were ready. W.O. Stamps, C.W. Holbrook, Howard Lorenz, G.H. Nettleton, E.B. Browne, and R.A. Phillips swept the nominations from the “Ocean Park Bunch,” as they were known. When the voting results were read at the polls, it was also stated that the trustees would be paid five dollars per meeting. Just three dollars would buy a good pair of shoes during that era.
          Mr. Kinney, with his charm and connections, was able to persuade the Grace Henderson Concert Company to travel from New York to perform with the now famous Venice-of-America Band The only student of diva, Adilina Patti, her rumored talent was quite a draw. Miss Henderson’s coloratura soprano voice filled the Venetian Plaza with the classical music arias that Abbot Kinney loved best. It was a memorable event in the city.
          The Doge loved children. Anyone who knew him even slightly knew of his preoccupation with little ones. Each year he invited all of the youngsters from local orphanages to a day of free food and all the rides they could fit into eight hours. Badges were issued so that the kiddies could enter the Plunge or the Miniature Railway at will. Hot dogs, ice cream, and cotton candy were included but each group chaperone was required to see that the small stomachs had at least one good meal, as well. Venetian residents volunteered their conveyances to transport the orphans to and from their respective establishments.
                    By a special act of Congress dated June 25, 1910, George Douglas Freeth was awarded a Congressional Gold Medal for his heroic act of nearly single-handedly saving seven Japanese fishermen from the cold waters of the Pacific Ocean two years previously. Kinney and other leading citizens of Venice swore out affidavits attesting to the bravery of the Hawaiian lifeguard. One such witness declared, ”There is no doubt in my mind that these seven men would have lost their lives on this occasion if it had not been for the noble efforts of George Freeth.” Another stated that Freeth received no pay for his efforts and worked strictly on a volunteer basis, “In my opinion, there is not another man on the beach, or perhaps in America, that could have accomplished the wonderful feat that Freeth accomplished in this matter.” The Doge was proud of George but doubly proud that this act of superhuman courage had taken place on his beach. Sherwood Kinney was a member of the lifeboat crew that assisted the hero in the final traumatic recovery. 
          A mock U.S. Navy battle was so well remembered from two years previously that Kinney decided to restage the fight but this time in the daylight. July 4 was the chosen date and 20 boats were volunteered to participate. Seats sold at the breakwater for 25 cents but, as at the last skirmish, the shoreline became packed with humanity. The Ship Café was forced to close its doors to new entrants. Those already inside were packed like proverbial sardines. Five-thousand shells were fired, three craft were destroyed by the ammunition, and miles inland,, the monstrous fires from the blazing boats could be seen.
          All of that stated the celebration was strangely free of accidents and major incidents. Only one injury was reported when a Roman candle exploded, burning s lady’s face slightly. The Kinney Company staged the battle with the guidance of a professional choreographer.
          Carlton Kinney now age 15, was sent east to New York to visit his Uncle Francis’s family and see the Coney Island of the east. He dispatched a card back to his family asserting the famous Coney looked, “old.” The tone of his card led the family to believe he was not impressed and when the content of the card was leaked to the local paper, it was printed.  The young Venetian also complained about the heat and humidity, being used to the cooler, drier summers of the west coast. A later communication spoke of his growing fame as a swimming champion. The local Norwalk Yacht Club sponsored several events in which young Kinney won four first-place ribbons. Taught to swim in Venice, Carlton made no secret of his origins.
          Unfortunately, Venice had earned the reputation of a wide-open town. The snickered saying of that day was, “Venice, Vernon, and vice.” Checking police reports of 1910, Mrs. Hoppe had three rings stolen, as well as one earring, two bunches of keys, a card case, and $3.40. Just prior, another lady, staying at the St. Mark Hotel was relieved of a diamond pin, a ruby ring, a gold necklace, a topaz snake chain, and a pin fashioned with sapphires and pearls. The Venice Drugstore was the scene of another robbery: $43.60 plus two diamond pins, one designed in a sunburst. Two apartment houses in town were ransacked. Clothing, cash, and jewelry were missing from three apartments. A fight broke out at the Arcade Saloon and a man named Irene Wilson was robbed and badly beaten. But the worse offense of all of the reports stated that the Venice Lifesaving Station had been looted of miscellaneous ropes and equipment that the volunteers had worked hard to accumulate in the span of the last few months. Self-respecting women began to acquire an escort for evening excursions and parents held their children to a curfew.
          Venetians and their new paper, the Venice Vanguard, expressed outrage and sympathy to employees and owners of the Los Angeles Times when it was bombed. Deaths and injuries occurred from the dastardly deed and although the newspaper was not a favorite in the west side of Los Angeles, no one was happy to see their disaster.  
          Two written complaints concerning Venice’s police chief, Parrent, were handed to the Board of Trustees who had already been informed by the District Attorney’s office that they had not approved of his actions in a couple of instances. Trustee Stamps walked into the police station and ordered the chief to submit his resignation immediately. Parrent informed Stamps that he had no intention of quitting unless someone of higher authority commanded him to do so. Officer Pirotte felt that the trustee was not treating a man of the chief’s authority with respect and resigned his position on the spot. His withdrawal was accepted by the Board the following evening at a meeting of the City Fathers.
          A misconduct hearing was slated for November and a panoply of citizens appeared as witnesses against the Chief. Two ladies testified of abusive language, H.O. Briggs, a former officer, told the jury that Parrent had sold him a revolver taken from a prisoner. Another former officer stated that he had pocketed a permit fee, and yet another patrolman told of his order to collect a protection fee from a liquor store owner. The chagrined policeman was demoted to the position of desk sergeant and tendered a resignation one week later.
          Merchants of Venice challenged the Ship Café employees to a rousing charitable baseball game at the Athletic Field and triumphed, 22-8. The cause, of course, was that Christmas was fast approaching. The $10 gate receipts were turned over to a ladies group for purchasing needed gifts for the upcoming annual party.    
           Santa Kinney made his usual appearance at the huge tree, handing out dolls, toy trucks, Uncle Sam iron banks, small Lionel train sets, and miniature china tea sets for the small hostesses in the group of youngsters. The Doge had made his private charity into one the entire town gloried. Sweet cakes, baked by residents, candy canes, and hot chocolate were passed around to the excited kiddies and a joyful time was had by all.
          Abbot had requested that all businesses be open on New Year’s Eve. The traditional masquerade ball was the paramount event of the auspicious night  but music, vaudeville, and a group of professional singers at the Ship Café were high on the list of everyone’s priorities, too.
           Several thousand waited at the Dance Pavilion as Eugene Estoppey finished off his last lap of the long distance run for the world’s record. His time was an amazing 1,000 hours and the waiting group of fans were wild in their exaltation. His body all but disappeared into the hoards of gathered people.
          A troop of seeming old folks with wrinkled faces and gray hair made their way down to the beach in the minutes that preceded midnight. They slowly entered the surf with a spotlight playing on their aged movements. Then the powerful light swung up the beach to reveal a laughing group of children emerging from the waves. “Off with the old year and on with the new.” A display of fireworks lit up the skies at exactly midnight. Mixed with the bells and horns and the banging of metal pots, the cacophony was extreme. 1911 was ushered in as no other.

Chapter Ten
Sand Dollars
          Automobiles were becoming more affordable for the average person and therefore more popular on the road. Abbot had just purchased a new model the year prior and hired young Irving Tabor to drive the beast for him. Tabor liked to tell the story later that when he was sweeping the pier one day, Mr. Kinney asked him if he could drive. He replied that he could, even though he was unable. The Doge hired him on the spot and the resident of Oakwood hurried off to have a relative teach him his new trade. Irving stayed in the Kinney employ until 1927, seven years after the master of Venice died. He became more like a son to the family and was revered and respected by the descendants until the time of his death.
          Although most locals still rode the electric train, now called the Red Cars, many autos were driven to the beach resorts where parking was at a premium. In 1911, each weekend day, the cities could looks for approximately 20,000 cars to appear at the shores, searching for parking. It became a large problem and the beach towns with the most parking spaces garnered the most visitors.
          The St. Mark Hotel, Windward and Ocean Front, was receiving so many complaints and had a nearly empty house. The addition of bells and running water were provided to those rooms lacking such appurtenances and a brass elevator was installed in the lobby by Andrew Lee, the proprietor. Some of the guests refused to ride the car, fearing it would go right through the roof and send them spinning into the sky. Refuted loudly by the mechanics who installed it, it was tested with 1,800 pound weights.
          A newspaper piece penned by the Doge in the Venice Vanguard, was the cause of a suit brought by George M. Jones against Mr. Kinney. The article in the paper stated that the plaintiff and Dana Burks, members of the Ocean Park Board of Trustees had arranged with Alexander Fraser to promote their joint interests and ruin that of the defendant. It was also thinly veiled in the article that Jones and his cohorts sought to destroy the Venice Plunge, Villa City and that they ordered the removal of the rail tracks that led to the Kinney Pier. It charged that Tokyo City Hall was built in a location far from downtown Venice so that it could promote the business of the Ocean Park Board, only. Allegations ranged from sewer mismanagement, land misuse, and corruption. Mrs. Louella Sibley testified that she had picnicked on the bath house foundation in order to prevent its being demolished by authorities. Other witnesses appeared for the defendant and spoke of the sewer stench causing their move to another area.
          The case was heralded in the newspaper as “The Tale of Two Cities.” The Doge declared that all of the Trustees were guilty of his charges and not just George Jones alone. He ended his testimony by revealing that Venice did not even have insurance. The jury went out to deliberate and only took 15 minutes to return with a finding. The verdict of innocent made headlines in the Vanguard and the paper, run by the Rennie family, quoted the old adage, “Surely the truth is mighty and will prevail.” 
          The Midway Plaisance attendance had fallen off sharply since its inception in 1906. When visitors had viewed the attractions two or three times, they were not willing to spend more of their hard-earned cash to return. It was rather expensive for a date night. There were many instances of the lessees fleeing when their rental payment was due and the Doge took more than one Midway act to court for non-payment. The Kinney family made the decision to remove the entirety and make room for a brand-new racing rollercoaster. Contracts were signed before the area was totally divested of its unique buildings and parts were shipped from Chicago. The 150-horsepower, four-foot-high engine arrived first and the 9,000 feet of track followed. Top speed for the two cars was rumored to be 70-miles-per-hour. The nearest similar coaster was located in St. Louis, Missouri. Thomas Prior was the builder of the great Race Through the Clouds.
          The Daughters of the Confederacy met in the Auditorium and their member, Margaret Kinney, gave a short welcome speech. People who knew her whispered that she did not look well but it was forgotten in the excitement of the day. A reception, a luncheon, a ride on the little train, and a gondola trip comprised the entertainment. Members said that it was the best assemblage they had ever attended.
          Sells-Floto brought the show back to Venice to winter in the mild climes. The performer who attracted the most comment was “The Harem Girl,” who flashed her gauzy costume to all who attended the parade. At the end of the route, she disembarked and went to visit her friends at the Venice Vanguard newspaper.
          June 29 was a date long remembered by the residents of the seaside city. As a result of the $50,000 court case where Kinney was found innocent, the name of the canaled city was officially changed to Venice. Precincts reported that the title was altered by a 4-1 vote. The firehouse siren blared in victory and the Venice-of-America Band led the victors up and down the broad walk. Fireworks blazed from the end of the Pier and two ladies topped off the evening engaging in a scratching and hair-pulling contest while their male escort passively watched.
          Margaret Thornton Kinney had not looked well for several years but the seaside city was stunned when she suddenly died. Her home at 16 Park Avenue was the place of her demise and she was surrounded by Abbot, son Sherwood, and a few friends. Her other three sons were informed by telephone but could not reach her bedside in time. Her obituaries credited her with a modest and democratic demeanor and she was said to be loved by many. All Venice businesses closed for the day. At her Christian Science funeral in Woodlawn Cemetery, it required two trucks and one auto to deliver all of her floral tributes. The Vanguard reported that it was the most enormous floral display they had ever seen at such an event. Her pallbearers were prominent citizens and loving hands laid her body to rest for eternity beside those of her five deceased children.
          She was the social leader of Venice. It was clear that she would be missed tremendously. Margaret’s death certificate listed her demise as having been caused by renal failure while the family declared the cause as “sugar diabetes.” Perhaps the newspaper came closest when they proclaimed her death was due to heart failure. Her friends said she died of a broken heart.
          The popular little town by the sea was committed to entertainment and not much time was available for mourning. As if celebrations took the place of sadness, July 4 was feted as it never had been in the past. A Grand Illumination of the Pier and Beach was scheduled for July 3 with an artillery salute at 8:30 P.M. It was not only Independence Day. It was the birthday of Venice, as well.
          The morning dawned bright as elaborate patriotic decorations were seen in every nook and cranny. A patriotic concert was held in St. Mark’s Plaza by the 250-voice Eugene Davis Chorus. The concert was repeated at sundown just before the fireworks were ignited. Some 80,000 people crowded into the city that day. Most had come for the opening of the Race Through the Clouds Rollercoaster. Much to Tom Prior’s delight the cars ran to capacity all day long. Twin train cars, racing side-by-side gave an element of chance to the outcome. It was not found at any other ride. Surreptitious betting was carried on by some of the male riders but most customers of the coaster described it as thrilling and scary. The crowd did not know how scary it really was because car-tracking had not been invented for rollercoasters in 1911.
          A recently elected High School Board in the new city made a decision to use the six-year-old Lagoon Bath House for the first high school. Although the Board did not entirely approve of the building and the poor condition, Abbot Kinney was offering them free rent. It was voted that $1,500 be expended on the renovation of the unused structure, particularly to cover the pools and tear down dressing rooms. A number of applications were made for the head position but the only requirement the Board placed on the job was that it should be given to a male.
          That male turned out to be Cree Telford Work who was named as the first principal of the Venice Union Polytechnic High School. Apparently the Board judged women as competent enough to hold down the job as teacher, as Miss Finney was hired to teach science and math, Miss Gillette, art and design, and Miss Rogers, Latin and modern languages. Not barred from the teaching rolls, Mr. Misner imparted commercial subjects to the students and Mr. Ross mechanical work. The school was open to any resident of the district who could show he had the ability to take the class. Those living outside of the area were charged tuition.
           Students for all four grades showed up on Enrollment Day but the largest number signed up for ninth grade. Total registrants numbered 43 but others appeared and indicated their willingness to attend in the future. V.T.Reuter, President of the Board declared that just because students had attended other schools, that fact alone was not sufficient excuse for a transfer to be issued.
          In an effort to capitalize on the amazing aviation meet at the Dominguez Rancho in 1910, Abbot contracted with Frank Champion to fly over Venice and thrill the visitors. Flying was a new sport and the Dominguez Air Meet was the first time most Californians had seen an aeroplane fly. Taking off from Dominguez Field, Champion flew first at 1,500 feet and covered the area between Santa Monica Canyon and Del Rey. His second trip was at 1,000 feet and encompassed the Santa Monica Bay where a quartet of warships lay anchored. The final trips were taken very near the beach, close enough to the sand to speak to those seated there. A young vacationer from the Midwest, Ted Fach, aimed his camera and took a photo of the unusual sight. The following year, the Fach family moved to Venice and Ted kept the picture all of his life. While the aviator was flying over the city of Venice, he was dropping floral “bombs,” provided by the Kinney Company. Over and above the entertainment aspect of the flight, Kinney wanted to show the crowd the importance of aerial craft in future warfare.
          Always a very special holiday in Canal City, Christmas was more elaborate each passing year. Town Decorator, Arthur Reese and his crew obtained a tree that reached to the ceiling of the Dance Pavilion. The theme of his design was a California Christmas in comparison to one in the eastern half of the United States. Overlaying one side of the large room were snow banks and and a covering of artificial snow. From boxes, icicles dangled and threatened to cut into anything that ventured too close. Very large bells tinkled merrily and every rafter was covered in tinsel. Lacy snowflakes appeared to be dropping from the roof. Standing in the center of the winter scene was the tree, twinkling with hundreds of red and green lights and a star blinking from the top.
          The California section that represented the holiday was replete with local pepper boughs, and streamers of holly cascading down palm trees. Reese’s crew spent a lot of money on the design and it took eight men five days to erect it.
           When the important day arrived on the calendar a grand march and a holiday program of music and dancing gave birth to the event. In excess of 1,100 youngsters attended the anticipated event so just as the grand march came to a halt, Santa Claus Kinney arrived in a gigantic sleigh, drawn along by four Shetland ponies. Each child had already received a bag of nuts, a toy, and a box of sweets from the Merchants Association but Santa had brought special toys. The kiddies were comprised of all ethnicities and races and the Vanguard noted that all were treated equally, as were the parents who accompanied them. Perhaps Abbot held this lavish Christmas event in memory of his departed wife and five children, or so it was speculated.
The whole town celebrated that day. Tom Prior served turkey and ate with his employees that day as well as handing out fresh birds to the men and women to take home. Al G. Barnes served turkey to all of the circus members in show of togetherness. The schools and Sunday Schools gave programs and parties to anyone who entered their doors. Only two really needy families were detected in Venice and both were fed handsomely.
          Easily, the most exotic celebration was given by the 101 Wild West Show, encamped in Venice for a few months. More than 100 Native Americans barbecued an ox. Four cooks and as many assistants, began the preparation on the Pier almost 24 hours in advance of the dinner. Abbot Kinney was invited to help serve but he was exhausted from his role of Santa Claus and sent his new superintendent to do the honors. The Indians, the Wild West Show, and their guests took less than an hour to consume the ox and eat the side dishes.
          As if the Christmas celebration was not enough for the residents of the area, a Sixth Annual Masquerade Ball was planned for the Dance Pavilion. Held in the Sun and Snow scene left over from the kiddie party, maskers were offered prizes for clever costumes. The most comical, original, handsome, and sustained characters were gifted with substantial rewards. The affair was orderly and contained even though the turnout was tremendous. Mr. McCarver of the Kinney Company arranged for all of the special music and dances and everyone expressed enjoyment on all accounts.
          Those who did not partake of the Masquerade Ball formed private parties and Watch celebrations to welcome the New Year. Because the Cafes were required to close at the usual time, managements of the various bars and dining rooms served food instead of liquor to stop the patrons from departing. It was a safe and sane observance and 1912 was ushered in without a whimper.

Chapter Eleven
Sea Urchins
          No entries in the Tournament of Roses Parade for 1912 but the usual contingent of fans were well represented by the Chiaffarelli Band, which was invited to take a spot in the procession. The 101 Wild West group teamed up with the Band for transportation to Pasadena. Before the advent of the football game, gladiator-style games were staged and two men were vying for a large prize this year. Lillie Francis agreed to marry the winner of an unusual horserace. Each of the two men were standing astride the backs of two unsaddled ponies, Cossack-style, for the contest. The cowboys began the dash abreast and held that position with bettors yelling out their choice as the hopeful grooms passed around the two laps. Only near the end did Rixon call upon the extra energy of his mounts and cross the line ahead of Saunders. Instead of stopping, the winner galloped to the grandstand to claim Miss Lillie, billed as Queen of Cattle Country in the 101 Show. He scooped her up and set her on the bare back of the second mount and “rode into the sunset.” 
          January 13 was Boys Derby Day and push-mobiles could be seen in at Venice in one state of construction or another. Boys and their fathers gathered in garages to discuss the pros and cons of steering wheels and tires in preparation for the coming event. A parade preceded the event and females were strictly banned from both the procession and the main event. Testosterone Fever took hold in Canal City!
          On the big day, the homemade cars deemed the best of the group were selected for the series of races on Ocean Front Walk and “pushers” lined up behind them to give each the best possible start. Different classes were “light,”” heavy,”” medium,” and “free-for-all.” Auto dealers and prominent drivers were in evidence to officiate. Winners went home exultant and losers trudged to their dwellings dispiritedly, sorting through mental plans for next year’s event.
          The Al G. Barnes Circus made a prolonged winter stop near the Canaled City limits. The group had many more wild animals than Sells-Floto so it was not long until complaints rolled into the offices of the Trustees concerning lions roaring. Of particular nuisance were the trumpets of the seemingly unruly elephants and one of those same beasts proved how ill-trained they were. While being escorted from a show in the Auditorium to his stable near Mildred Avenue, Mr. Jumbo broke loose from his handler and wandered into the arches of the colonnades. He continued up the arcade unmolested with visitors and merchants diving in doorways and the keeper yelling ineffectual commands. The Venice Police were too stunned (or afraid) to interfere. For a few minutes it seemed as if the gargantuan “shopper” was going to raid a greengrocer’s outdoor display but he probably weighed the consequences in his small brain and decided against the illegal action. Finally, at the terminus of the arched roof, the pachyderm realized he had lost his cover and allowed the frantic circus employees to control him once more.
          The 101 stayed long enough on the Athletic Field in Venice to combine their extravaganza with that of the Al G. Barnes Circus to present a Showfolks Charity Masque Ball in the Dance Pavilion on Valentine’s Day. After the Grand March, a Cossack dance was presented by Russians, and the Native Americans exhibited a Spring Dance. Cowgirls swayed with bareback riders while belly dancers tripped around to the music with cowboys and buckskin-clad sharpshooters. Townspeople mixed with the entertainment figures amidst flashes from colored spotlights and the event was termed an unqualified success by the Vanguard when over $1,000 was raised for charity.
          The Los Angeles Times first broke the story of the sinking of the giant ocean liner, Titanic. Information about the tragedy was lacking due to the dearth of knowledge of survivors who were picked up by the Carpathia, a ship that steamed toward the Titanic’s last S.O.S. site. Early headlines informed Angelenos that no one was lost in the collision with the iceberg but as days passed the true horror of the story came to light. Manfredi Chiaffarelli recalled that it had not been that many years since he brought his family from Italy on a smaller version of the doomed liner and with the soul of the artist he was, wrote “The Titanic Suite.”  Presented for the first time in the Pier Auditorium, the great maestro conducted his masterpiece to a somber crowd. The music began as a representation of dawn on the morning of the mammoth ship’s demise. Part Two was entitled “Intermezzo: The Morning Promenade,” and was written to subtly to project the cosmopolitan character of those who could afford to be on the maiden voyage of the “unsinkable” ship. Part Three began on the afternoon of the fatal day and progressed on to the tragic accident. A resounding crash was heard from the orchestra to represent the impact and one could almost hear the onrush of the water as it swamped the ship. A panicked voice announced that the ship was going down and a cacophony of cries followed quickly. The impression of sinking was accomplished by the use of a descending chromatic scale which became softer and softer as the strains of, “Nearer My God to Thee,” were detected. The effect of the Suite on the audience was evident as the notes ended. Many had tears running down their cheeks and all faces were horror-stricken and shaken to their very depths. Many spoke later that Signore Chiaffarelli was a genius beyond measure.
          Along with other partners, young Sherwood Kinney opened a franchise drug store named Peoples on the ground floor of the new the apartment building located at the corner of Windward and Trolleyway. It was a large and ornate store with marble counters and a black marble soda fountain near the center. All manner of merchandise was stocked and prescriptions were filled for those with illnesses. The business offered lunch at the soda fountain as well as ice cream and desserts and they advertised catering as a side enterprise.
          Disaster in the form of a conflagration struck Ocean Park on September 3, 1912. For quite a long time, it appeared as if the whole city was headed for destruction but the salt water hydrant system of Venice saved the town. Twelve fire companies who employed 500 men were on the scene. Six separate streams of water were thrust upon the ornate bath house by Chief Hubbard and the Venice Fire Department. When the last spark had been extinguished, refugees numbered 1,500 souls who had lived in the 200 smoldering buildings. Five lives were lost: three of which were small children. Alexander R. Fraser, whose fortune was nearly wiped out by the loss of his Million Dollar Pier, engaged a construction company the following day to design a bigger and better wharf.
          Age 20, Innes Kinney was the first to marry of Margaret and Abbot’s offspring. The bride was a Helena, Montana, beauty whom he had first met while her family vacationed in Venice.  October 22 was the date, and the place was Santa Monica’s Presbyterian Church. Innes and his new bride were sent to Kinneloa and Innes managed the ranch for most of his rather short life.
           A very disturbing article appeared in the Venice Vanguard when a German dishwasher reported the appearance of a large snake in the kitchen of the restaurant where he worked on Windward. A search was quickly instituted but nothing slithery was seen “except for local lounge lizards,” said the paper. The report was nearly forgotten for close to a week when a second sighting was made by a local citizen. His “snakeship” revealed himself from a hole in the sidewalk. A posse was formed of the least fearful of the restaurant’s patrons and the big rock python was captured. When all of the furor died, it was revealed that the Midway Garage was holding the big reptile in a barrel “snake-sitting” for its owner who was away in Yuma, Arizona. A long-distance call to Mr. Simpson in Yuma uncovered the fact that “Charlie” was only one of seven of the herpetologist’s brood. If the others were found, they would come when their given names were called.
          Sherwood Kinney was the second son to leave the Park Avenue house at the corner of Speedway. Mr. and Mrs. Warren Wilson announced the engagement of their daughter, Lois to Abbot Kinney’s second son. Handsome Sherwood met his bride at the Bachelor’s Club Ball after having just been elected secretary. Fellow bachelors declared that they thought young Kinney would be the last of their group to marry but Fate had other plans for the couple.
          The newspaper recapped the city’s history for a revealing look at its progress. The school population was over 700 and a total of 36 apartment houses had been built, valued at between $15,000 and $35,000 each. Several miles of sidewalk and street improvements were effected in the previous year. Thousands of dollars were expended on fire fighting equipment after the Ocean Park blaze. Although the 1910 Federal Census numbered 3,200 people living in the city, another official estimate numbered closer to 7,000. The assessed valuation was $8,454,543. That Abbot Kinney’s dream had taken wing was of doubt to no one.
          Those who did not rise for the first gleaming of the winter sun missed cheering Venice’s Rose Parade entry for 1913. Almost two-dozen Shetland ponies, hitched four abreast, pulled a float on which rested a gondola. Each span of small horses was guarded by a footman in medieval dress. The base of the float was lavishly strewn with green peppers and red geraniums and the same colors were used on the water craft. Thornton Kinney, now 26, and a bevy of his friends were bareheaded and sporting short-sleeve shirts while the females on the vehicle wore middy blouses and duck skirts. Marguerite daisies and narcissus formed a pergola over the boat while a gondolier on the rear, sported a Venetian costume and swung a mighty golden oar.
          Mindful of the city’s reputation, Kinney turned away an offer from a sports syndicate to erect a boxing ring in his city. It was the third such offer made to him and this time the unnamed sponsors offered $100,000 to complete the project.  The group advised the Doge that it would make Venice the most popular sporting center in the country. Abbot declared that he only permitted short fights in the Auditorium that were halted when they drew blood. “I do not think the better class of people here would countenance the erection of a prize fighting stadium which would attract such crowds as have attended the Vernon fights. Venice will continue to be a Mecca for clean sport and amusement.” He staunchly declared.
          Eddie Maier was the head of a local brewing company and a great booster for baseball. His favorite team was the Vernon Tigers but the members were dissatisfied with some of the restrictions they faced playing in that city. Maier brought the team manager, Hap Hogan, to the Canal City to meet with the Kinney Company and the Venice Tiger Baseball Team was born. In preparation for the contract signing, the new athletic field was being readied for the boys and a 3,000-fan grandstand was erected. It was estimated that another 1,000 fans could stand on the grounds. Constructed outside the fence was parking for nearly 100 autos. The team’s initial game was played in March against Occidental College on Baer Field in Los Angeles. Duke Walk, the star pitcher for the Tigers was sent in at the game’s inception and it was all uphill after that. The ending score: Venice, 8, and Occidental, 0. Fans from the seaside town went home in high spirits. The Kinney Company was jubilant- there was a new drawing card to their town.
          A powerful squall blew in from the Pacific and saturated the entire city. Waterways overflowed and a high percentage of the town was submerged. In places only an inch of water stood but in alternate locations, the depth was nearly three feet. The Short Line was immersed in the deepest part and two cars had derailed. The Al G. Barnes Circus was wintering in Canal City once again and their wagons and animals were forced to move further inland. The new Tigers ballpark resembled a lake. In the vicinity of City Hall, 100 lots were swamped. Under sea level, the volume of the water filled the basin at the bottom of Windward and the new Venice High School’s floors were ruined by the wet trash and accompanying sand, silt, and flotsam. The office of the principal was the hardest hit because it was located at the front of the building. Playa del Rey’s floodgates were jammed and dynamite was ordered, despite the objections of the railroad.  When the inundation finally began to recede, damages to the town were estimated at six figures. The Kinney Company bore the brunt of the devastation but by Monday, things were pretty dry and children had been ordered to return to school.
          During the debacle of the waterlogged streets, Lois Wilson had a dinner at her home on (appropriately) Ocean Spray Avenue for her wedding party. Her friends and family were all in evidence while Miss Wilson became Mr. Sherwood Kinney. The groom presented his new wife with a  diamond and pearl lavalier and she slipped a handsome ring on his finger.
          The Majestic Theater in Los Angeles was playing “Queen Elizabeth,” to packed houses and the star, Sarah Bernhardt, was appearing there to boost ticket sales. Recalling her pleasant stay in Venice she booked an entire floor at the King George Hotel at Rose and Ocean Front, where she again supped with the town Doge. The Muse was forced to take a private railcar to and from the City of Angels twice a day and with only a couple of tiring trips, she spurned this set-up. A grand automobile was rented for her and her closest friends and it was more comfortable and quicker than the rail line. She used it to sightsee and was seen all about the area. Hearing local residents speak about the Race Through the Clouds Rollercoaster, the aging actress determined that her entourage should ride the monster. Negotiating an entire string of cars and then winning the race with the other coaster, Madame was heard to declare that the sensation was most delightful. On the following day, Bernhardt wished to view the sunset at Washington and the beach, but it was a day she would never forget. An auto accident injured her knee. Later, she slipped and fell on the stage, before the joint was healed. Less than two years later, the entire leg was amputated.
          Yet another grand opening was staged in Venice. Pennant-covered autos, motorcycles, every auto dealer in the county, and a host of private cars were preceded by the Venice-of-America Band as they commenced their parade at Temple and North Broadway in Los Angeles. Eddie Maier, owner if the Tigers and Charles Comiskey, head of the White Sox, rode side-by-side on the back of a new sporty model vehicle while Happy Hogan and his crew shared a more sedate sedan with Mr. Jim Callahan, much lauded leader of the Chicago team. Upon reaching the park, Maier hoisted the beautiful American flag to its perch at the top of the pole. Mayor of Venice, Mr. Holbrook, delivered an optimistic booster’s speech to the crowd on just the effect the park would have on Venice. Ward McFadden, proprietor of the Ship Café, handed out souvenir medals with the Tigers 1913 home games imprinted and announced a dinner for both teams. Hilarity was so high that few negative comments were heard when the Venice team lost to the Sox, 14-7. Mr. Kinney stood behind the crowd, his face wreathed in a rare smile.
          With a strong comeback, the Tigers beat the San Francisco Seals—but just barely. A number of players were on the injured list from the White Sox game. Hap Hogan decided to start his southpaw pitcher, John Raleigh, who was the deciding factor in the victory.
          A number of motion picture studios made use of the beautiful seaside town of Venice. Mary Pickford was the star of the first silent film made on the canals in 1910 and ever after that time, the studio folk vied with one another to use the seaside city as a location. The weather usually was sunny bright and the sights, like the canals and the Kinney Pier made very good background material as did pretty girls and gondolas.
          Small “Tiny “ Broadwick was a Venice girl, born Georgia Thompson. At an early age, she was adopted by the famous aviator and parachutist, Charles Broadwick, who taught her, “the business.” The fairy-like “Tiny” went him one better and also learned the art of wing-walking. She claimed to anyone who would listen that she really did not need a ‘chute because a parasol would suffice. At barely 100 pounds, the Thompson child teamed up with aviator Glenn Martin and made a several thousand-feet jump over Griffith Park in Los Angeles. A national tour was next on the agenda and her worldwide reputation was born. Daredevil stunts were her talent and crowds gathered in every country where she appeared. She was prominent in the news media promoting women in aviation until her death, at a very advanced age.
          Mr. and Mrs. Innes Kinney announced the birth of their first child, a little girl, on September 14. The Doge was a grandfather for the first time at age 63! Abbot must have wished his deceased wife could see the child, after suffering over her five lost babies. At his request, the dainty infant was named, Margaret, and much ado was made over the new Kinney. Gifts and congratulations pored in to Kinneloa in Pasadena, where the parents lived and her beaming grandpa announced in the newspaper that he would deposit $5,000 in a savings account for her.
          The High School Board of Directors determined that the Lagoon Bath House was neither large enough nor safe enough to house the town’s teenagers. A new piece of land was selected in the recently annexed section of the city located on Venice Boulevard. President V.T. Reuter announced in the Venice Vanguard that the cost was $2,750 an acre and work would begin immediately on the new Polytechnic High. As a member of the Board, Kinney was greatly in favor of more and better education.
          In keeping with the tradition of turkey dinner for Thanksgiving, many of the Venice restaurants and cafes served that menu to commemorate the day. The fire and police departments arranged schedules in shifts so that everyone could feed on the established bird. Theaters and amusements were open for the holiday and a Hi Jinks dance played at the Pavilion. The new Prentiss Band gave an admirable show and the Vanguard printed the story of the Pilgrims with an incorrect landing date.
           Privately, Kinney feted the Venice Fire Department at the newly renamed Seaside Club (formerly the Country Club.) Many speeches of appreciation were given in honor of the holiday. Thornton Kinney gave a talk about Thanksgiving as did Fire Chief George Hubbard, and Kinney Police Chief (at the Pier,) George Shishim. Typically, cigars and music were enjoyed after the banquet.
           Christmas items were listed in the Outlook and the Vanguard at the beginning of December so that residents could plan a holiday outfit or gifts for a loved one. Waists (blouses) in the new middy style were priced between $1.50 and $4.95 while finer modes made of cotton lawn went for $5 to $8. Hanky and sock sets in a fancy presentation box were $1.25 while accompanying red suspenders were only $1. Parisian ivory hairbrushes sold at $2 and Paris-cut velvet smoking jackets could be purchased for $7. Sears catalogue advertised ladies’ and gentlemen’s fur-trimmed coats for $45 to $55 and nice footwear could be picked up from $2 to $4. Kiddie’s fur collars and matching muffs were listed at $9.95.
          The 1913 Christmas holiday celebration promised to be the best one in the history of the seaside town with a more than usual emphasis on the children’s party. A play was conceived in which details are no longer available. However, the group names of each actor or actress were recorded in the newspaper. The event sounds a bit like a forerunner to Disneyland’s Small World with the designations of pink and blue dolls, fairies, bears, and reindeer, plus tots in nightgowns. An old man called “Foxy Grandpa” played Santa and he was delighted to hand out oranges, candy, and toys to each of the children. An observer remarked to Mr. Kinney that he thought too many items had been ordered. The Doge’s reply was typical of his love of youngsters, “I would rather have 500 left over than be one short.”
          Venice received the honor of requested participation in the Rose Parade, when the new Prentiss Band was asked to march in front of the first division. A large contingent of Venetian citizens appeared at the procession to cheer on the city’s musicians. Men dressed in sailor suits kept step beside those playing instruments. Kinney wasn’t allowing any opportunity to advertise pass him. Signs held aloft said, ”Venice, the Queen of Beaches,” and “Venice, Capitol of Joyland.” A rousing cheer arose from the viewing crowds whenever the group came abreast of them.
          Testosterone was rampant in the air again when the Junior Vanderbilt Races were held for small motor cars and push-mobiles in January, 1914. Like the larger race for adults, this contest only differed in that the prizes and receipts were not as large. The photographers were busy, the band played, and a few accidents alarmed the fathers who and the sidelined females of the family. The police even made an arrest. Making grandstand plays, the small drivers caused a lot of strident yelling. Defying the police, watchers surged onto the track to get a better view, when the situation called for it. Dan Woods of Venice took third place and $7.50 in the  “A” Class, Free For All Motor Race He again won third and $5 in the “B” Class Single Cylinder Motor Race. Bob Hutton of Venice won the Venice Hardware Store cup and $5 in the “D” Class Pushmobile competition. This rivalry was so popular that it was called on to be an annual event in Canal City.
          At Kinney’s behest, a contract was signed with Dick Bishop to provide 23 of his big birds for exposition on the Kinney Pier. At 700 to 1,000 pounds per avian, the ostriches had to be shipped by Pacific Electric Railway boxcar and then unloaded with hoods hiding their eyes from the curious, who lingered on the wharf. Two handlers on horseback kept the elegant creatures from escaping. The long-legged fowls were fast as a horse and kicked like one, as well. Enmeshed in secure corrals, visitors to the Kinney Pier paid a small price to see these feathered friends and higher amounts if they wished to take home one of their graceful plumes.
          It was a particularly heavy winter for storms and when the coast finally cleared in February, Kinney’s first grandson was born to Sherwood and Lois. Named Abbot, after his grandfather, he was a very handsome infant who grew into a handsome man like his father. Living on Washington Boulevard, the baby received many gifts among which was a season pass to the Plunge and Dance Hall. The Vanguard hinted that the Doge planned to deposit $10,000 in a bank account for his future.
          A petition was made to the Board of Trustees by Mark S. Collins, a hotel proprietor from Maine. Having purchased St. Mark’s Island, he wished to build a 40-bungalow court for tourists and residents alike and rename it United States Island. Each cottage was named after a state with a replica of the U.S. Capitol in the courtyard. Sidewalks and a ferry service by motorboat, completed the proposal. Kinney and his Board heartily approved the action. When the project came to completion, beautiful flowers and trees ornamented the grounds that also sported an aviary and pergola. It was yet another tourist attraction in exciting Venice-of-America. 
          Not to the surprise of his friends, Abbot Kinney decided to take a new wife. A wedding ring owned by the late Jackie Gerety Konrad gives the date of their initial meeting in 1900, when Winifred Harwell was a dental student at University of Southern California. It was said that he maintained an acquaintance with the London-born woman until after Margaret passed away and then was seen by neighbors getting off of the streetcar at her home. The daughter of J. Courtland and Jeane McDonald Harwell, the new Mrs. Kinney was very retiring in disposition and wished as little publicity as possible. After the ceremony, the couple left on an extended honeymoon to Hawaii.
          They were the parents of two children. Helen Harwell Kinney married Jack Gerety, who was the son of one of Canal City’s mayors and they produced Jacqueline who married Marion Konrad. Clan Kinney, Abbot’s fifth son, had many ins and outs in his life, making him a troubled man but he was briefly married to Pat Clancy, a circus performer.
          Abbot had planned for many years to remodel the Cosmos Club as a home for himself and so the work was begun after his marriage to the second Mrs, Kinney. It took the couple an entire year to build rooms on the ground floor and a second story but the result was exactly what they wanted and they moved into #1 Grand Canal with a flourish and many well wishes.
          The exciting Tigers baseball team maintained their second-place position after capturing two hard-won games with the Los Angeles Angels, 2-1 and 4-1. San Francisco was in the number one position as the best ranking in the West Coast League. Fan turned out to see the Tigers in droves and the Board of Trustees patted their own backs in having secured the boys from Vernon.
          Not only were the Tigers attracting hoards to Venice, but the other attractions were doing a land office business, as well. Easter Sunday saw the influx of 40,000 visitors on Red Cars that ran every 5 minutes. The Vanguard pithily expostulated that the line to rent suits at the Plunge was at least two-blocks long and the suits, themselves, were pretty much like last years models except they were made with less material.  The Broad Walk from Venice to Santa Monica’s North Beach was a moving panorama of new spring suits and glorious hats. It was a typical Easter Sunday.
          The Good Government League prevailed in the elections once again and Mayor Edward A. Gerety took his place as the head of the Board. Immediately after the election, the new mayor celebrated his 35th birthday and was treated to a party by his wife. The invited guests were C.W. Pinkerton, C.W. Lyon, Byron Hanna, W.A. Rennie, of Venice Vanguard fame, Dr. W.M. Kendall, Frank Early, William McStay, Joseph Braun, Caesare Menotti, Edward Sanders and George Fox.
          On May first, Caesare LaMonica began his engagement in Venice and took the district by storm. It was bandied about that his was the best band ever hired in Canal City. May Day dawned warm and the sun was shining brightly when the Queen of the May and excited grammar school youngsters seated themselves in a circle as the Maypole Dance was performed. While the fifth graders danced, they wove colored ribbons around the pole situated on the lawn.  The entire institution took part in a grand march as children dressed as butterflies, bees, and birds flitted around the grassy area. The band played, the kiddies sang, and the whole program ran smoothly and successfully as Caesare LaMonica made his debut in Venice.
           Frank Stites, the well-known aviator added a new dimension to his performance when he hired William Morton to make parachute jumps from his bi-plane.  When he was hired to fly over Canal City and environs a crowd of 20,000 or more gathered. Stites flew the flimsy plane to 2,500 feet and Morton stepped from the cockpit to the wing. Outfitted only with light clothing and his parachute, the jumper hurled himself into the thin air and at the proper time, pulled his cord. His falling motion slowed considerably as the great white billow appeared above his head. An audible cheer was heard from the ground and hankies waved as the unseeing daredevil fluttered to the ground.
          Aviation was always popular in the seaside city but never more so than after the stunt pilots of the area made their base at the Venice Flying Field. Names like Al Wilson and Frank Clarke made the Field a much sought out lounging place for pilots and wing walkers alike. Wilson and Clarke’s talents were much used vehicles in films and Wilson was so handsome, he became a star in his own right.
          When the first Academy Award was presented by the Motion Picture Industries, the winner was a World War I movie entitled Wings. The scenes which garnered the most attention were aviation sequences which were enacted by the stunt pilots from the former Venice Flying Field, later known as Ince Field, and then DeLay Field.
          The celebration began at noon with a luncheon at Frank Early’s Venice Café. A couple of hours later, a special train of five autos conveyed the diners to the new school grounds where a cornerstone would be placed in the Venice Union Polytechnic High School. Many hundreds had preceded them in the Red Cars and by foot. Abbot Kinney hosted the program which was a long one filled with music and addresses by various notables. Cree T. Work, the principal spoke on the significance of the new institution while Reverend Fenwicke L. Holmes of the Venice Union Church gave the invocation. The climax of the celebration came when the Venice High School Board carried the cornerstone to its selected place. Before it was sealed, school records, copies of the school paper, copies of the Vanguard, names of teachers, and other interesting items were placed inside. The gathered crowd sang a patriotic song, and Reverend Alfred R, Taylor, rector of the Episcopal Church gave a benediction. LaMonaca’s Band played a brief concert and the tired groups headed home, escorted by the setting sun.
          The Kinney Company gave exclusive time to the boys of the new Venice Military Academy at the Plunge each morning from seven to eight o’clock. Opening in mid-June in the Country Club’s old building, boys from six to fifteen years-of-age were boarded and taught classes similar to those in grammar and high school. The institution’s aim was to develop young minds and sturdy bodies during summer sessions. A daily military drill utilized strenuous exercise and the boys slept, ate, and had classes outside. Thanks to Mr. Kinney, the Academy owned different types of boats and their use was counted as a class.
          Although much money was expended on this venture and the students/cadets retained many happy memories of bonding with the headmaster and other boys enrolled, the Venice Military Academy was a financial failure. After only one summer of operation, William Strover of the United States Army, admitted defeat and closed the school forever.
          Venice was growing by leaps and bounds, said a newspaper report. Fully 20 miles of streets were in daily usage and all of the important thoroughfares were paved. This was a deliberate action designed to bring buyers to the local merchants because it was a published fact that drivers took their machines to areas where there was the least stress on their tires and springs. Ocean Front Walk, also known as the Broad Walk, was the most popular promenade in town, even though autos could not drive down its surface. In 1914, it extended to Marine Avenue at the city limits to Vista Avenue, more than a mile-and-one-half distant. The population was figured at 10,000 by the canaled city’s ninth year in existence. Four walk streets lay within the town’s boundaries: Navy, Dudley, Breeze, and Clubhouse. The most substantial houses were built on these streets. City electrician, Lou Eager, kept the lighting up to date and many streets were veritable White Ways. It was also his duty to keep circuits operating and pipes from leaking in the hidden utility tunnels under Windward Avenue.
          A landmark was wiped out by flames on the night of September 9th, and no one even speculated why the alarm was not called into the Fire Department until it was too late to save the Lagoon Bath House/ High School. When the firemen arrived, the blaze was already shooting up from the center of the structure. It was speculated that the conflagration was being fed by some sort of fuel from within the rafters. When the announcement was made at the Dance Pavilion and the Venice Athletic Club, hundreds of spectators ran from those respective buildings, mindful of the Ocean Park fire which destroyed everything. Colonel Prior played his private hose on his Race Through the Clouds Rollercoaster face. Fred Church, his partner, directed a second hose on the nearby office buildings. The Venice Garage at the rear of the Bath House-cum-High School was in imminent danger when it flared up three times. However, it was saved by focused attention and a wind blowing in the opposite direction. The nearly complete Union Church briefly joined the endangered list but was twice extinguished.
          With a searing crash, beams fell in two directions, one felling Detective Pete Pirotte. He did not recall how he was saved without severe injury so it was assumed that some Good Samaritan rescued him. The stately verandas crashed and it was more than a full 60 minutes until the inferno was contained. That the structure was a total loss  seemed suspicious to local residents since the new high school was nearly finished being constructed.
          Perhaps the most artistic fete in Venice or any town on the Bay, was the much-praised Grape Festival. Arthur Reese, Town Decorator, began his design early on the very end of the Pier. The grapes were provided by the Etienne Brothers of Lamanda Park, a vineyard much the size of Kinney’s citrus orchard. Talented Reese and his crew fashioned a steamship from the red globes of the fruit, perhaps to commemorate the recently lost Titanic. Grapes and their vines hung from every available space on the Pier and festooned the columns on Windward Avenue, as well. The invitation was, “Come and pick grapes. Take home as many as you can carry.” It was a festival of joy in three parts: music, poetry, and dance. A call for photographs of pretty women went out and the nominating committee received many more than expected. Finally, beautiful Louise Green of Upland became a guest of the town and was motored in to a suite of rooms at the St. Mark Hotel. An expensive brocade gown and cape were provided, along with a tiara.
          The event was celebrated like a Mardi Gras Day in New Orleans with hilarity everywhere. An Arabian Nights-like fantasy was portrayed in the Auditorium with both dance numbers and special music written by LaMonaca for the occasion. Comic impersonators and females dressed like clowns, called Yama-Yama Girls, filled the streets as well as other visitors in all manner of costume. The prevailing spirit was hedonism at its best. A parade with Tom Prior’s new calliope, a band sent down from Santa Monica, the garishly dressed characters of the celebration, gaily decorated autos, and LaMonaca’s Band formed an assemblage five-blocks-long, wrote the Vanguard.
          The Al G. Barnes Circus was back in town for their winter rest period. Some of the prominent residents of the city had complaints about the animal noises and the low character of some of the employees but overall they were welcome in Canal City. They signed a contract for 3 weeks of shows before their break and during the last days of their scheduled time, the combination of a poorly driven wooden stake and the weight of the elephants caused a split in the outfall sewer pipe. Most of the audience asked for their money back due to the odor and left the area. Sewer pipes were made of wood during the period of time Venice was built so accidents of this type were not unusual. Dr. Kendall reported that the pumps were forcing the gas and excrement through the ground and a significant health hazard existed. The discharged material was forced into a small-size pond. The circus closed their tent flaps for the winter. Some performers traveled to other areas and some rented rooms in Venice, far from the broken pipe. The wild animal menagerie was relocated to the Kinney Pier to replace the former Ostrich Farm.
          A small village mock-up was built on the Pier for the headhunting Igorots, still living in the district after the old Midway closed. Chief Chy-anne appeared before the Board of Trustees at a regular meeting to plead in broken English for the job of Dog Catcher in the city. He declared that he would not charge money for his services but would only take the unlicensed dogs in payment. After several negative opinions were voiced among the canine owners, Mayor Gerety declared that he would take the matter under advisement and communicate with the chief in due time. The man bowed low with all of the dignity of his title as head of a nation of warriors and strode proudly from the room.
          Martha Florine, lady cat trainer, nearly had a fatal accident during a post-Christmas show in Venice. During the finale of her presentation, Martha released several leopards into the performance cage. One of the felines was new to her group and immediately got into a fight with another cat. The lady edged toward a piece of pronged iron used to control the beasts but fell over a stand. Immediately the animal forgot his altercation and leaped onto his owner’s prone figure. Sinking his claws into her shoulder to hold her for the kill, he suddenly heard his name, Babe, being called by a trainer outside the bars. When he was successfully forced off of Miss Florine, she slowly righted herself and escaped the enclosure to have her wounds treated.
          The Venice Grand Prix was undoubtedly the most exciting event of 1915 but it left a sour taste in the mouths of some residents and certainly the Abbot Kinney Company. The official winning purse was set at $8,000 and given to race officials by the Doge. Four miles of canvas was used to block the non-paying viewers from the course and 200 men were deputized to guard it from vandalism during the night and counterfeit ticket holders during the event. Policemen and plain clothes detectives were stationed around the course as well as ambulances and physicians in case of accidents. An enormous crowd arrived on the Red Cars. From early morning until noon, three and four-car trains arrived groaning with the weight of every passenger who could force their way into the small spaces. Some even rode on the roof of the vehicle.
          Among the 22 entries were famous drivers such as Barney Oldfield and Eddie Rickenbacher driving a mixture of Chevrolets, Bugattis, Maxwells, Chalmers’, Delages, and other models. Driver Grant developed radiator problems in the 25th lap and took his Stutz out of the event. The cars hit speeds of 72 miles-per-hour with Rickenbacher leading. But he had to leave the contest permanently when oil from his crankcase began leaking in the 51st lap.
          The real disaster struck when a 74-year-old man insisted on crossing the track, even after being threatened by the police. His leg was nearly torn from its socket by wedges protruding from a Bugatti, driven by John Marquis. An ambulance was summoned and the senile man was taken to St. Catharine’s Hospital where his limb was removed. He later sued the Kinney Company as did the onlookers on whom a scoreboard fell.
          When the hoopla died down, Barney Oldfield in his Maxwell, captured the prize and he was jubilant. Residents remembered the exciting day far into their old age. The town fathers, in partnership with Abbot Kinney, lost over $20,000. The Doge determined never to sponsor another race unless it was of the Pushmobile variety.
          May 2 was the date set aside for a bathing suit parade and Canal City was braced for an invasion of the male species. The procession started at Marine and made its way down Ocean Front Walk to the tune of LaMonaca’s Band. The dignitaries marched first in the arrangement followed by minor officials and representatives of the police and fire departments. Grammar school children walked behind and threw flowers to the crowds lined up along the Broad Walk. Finally, the girls in the latest styles of 1915 swimwear walked, rode on floats and straddled the hoods of automobiles. A few were even ensconced in Electriquettes, the new motorized rolling chairs available for rent on the promenade. Goat carts brought up the rear with a new silent movie star, Charlie Chaplin who had just filmed his first Little Tramp picture in Venice the year previous. His role in the parade was to promote that endeavor, Kid Auto Races at Venice. The 24 floats were sponsored by area businesses and five judges were chosen to award prizes of $50, $15, and $10 to the most outstanding. A Joker’s Band performance completed the day of merriment.
          Much to the shock of baseball fans, Hap Hogan passed away of pneumonia in his home after an illness of only seven days. Eddie Maier, Tigers president was in attendance as well as Hogan’s immediate family. Abbot Kinney ordered the flags flown at half-mast in mourning and the town talked about nothing other than their fallen sports hero.
           Venice baseball fans never really recovered from Hogan’s death. A sorrowful note linked itself to the games. With receipts falling off at the Athletic Park, the Tigers were released from their contract and went back to Vernon, where they were enticed with a better offer.
          The Igorot Village ended their engagement on the Pier and was hired by the Foley and Burke Street Carnival. Whether or not their departure from Venice had anything to do with Chief Chy-anne’s rejection as City Dogcatcher was just anyone’s guess.
          The popular Italian immigrant, Caesare Menotti, opened a beautifully appointed buffet across Windward Avenue from his  green grocery store. Designed in the Venetian style, the building matched those across the street. His countrymen rallied around him and presented the man with a large floral arrangement which he placed in the entrance of his eatery. Although the buffet was not completed yet, it was functional. Three new employees joined the many volunteers to help serve the food to city and county officials.
          The Abbot Kinney Company had deeded Windward Avenue from the Grand Lagoon to the Pier to the City of Venice. A formal action to reverse the proceedings was filed in court by the Doge in 1915. The gift came with a condition that the grounds be kept landscaped with flowers and trees but in recent days, the area was not kept as the deed specified. A park was implemented at the east side of the Lagoon in an effort to satisfy Kinney. This act caused him to withdraw his complaint when he observed the city’s effort of good will.
           It was announced by Abbot Kinney that he intended to procure more large rocks for the breakwater and the Trustees threatened legal action. The Doge looked at the aging Pier structure with a jaundiced eye and deduced that a freak storm might wreck the end of his wharf. His attorney advised against the venture, calling it risky. Accustomed to sitting far out on creaking branches, Kinney went ahead with his plan and dumped the enormous loads of rocks right after Christmas. As Fate would have it, a powerful squall broke over Venice and residents could not believe their eyes when they saw snow falling. The addition of the breakwater had, indeed, prevented the Pier from heavy damage. The year 1916 was ushered in on a relieved note, especially at the Kinney Company.


Chapter Twelve
High Tides

          During the night of January 27, city employees, the Kinney Company and many private residents were sleepless as they constructed dikes and pickaxed ditches to combat rapidly falling rain and the elevated tides that usually accompany storms. Both the dwellings on the ocean front and the structures lining canals were in danger of the flood. Police rowed up and down the canals protecting the abandoned cottages from robbers. The Kinney Company and volunteers guarded the Pier from floating debris that might crash against the wood from the wreckage of another damaged structure. Hip boots were employed to get through the neighborhood around Lion Canal. Plaster was ripped away from stucco homes, streetlights toppled and were drowned and one roof blew entirely off and landed on the one next door. The lowlands all seemed to blend together as the sea rushed in to cover the land. Even Walgrove was flooded. After 18 rainy days in one month. only one other year was recorded as having seen more moisture than 1916. The record was set in 1890, before Venice was built.
          One canal resident was unable to get home at all and his cocker spaniel howled through the night until the police relief boat made a special trip to retrieve him. It was the worst damage Canal City had ever experienced but they were fortunate in comparison to other Los Angeles neighborhoods. Even as far inland as Sierra Madre, agricultural products were nearly wiped out, including the citrus at Abbot’s Kinneloa Ranch.
          When the sun peeped above the horizon on the 28th, it reflected off a vast lake that did not spare much more than the business district of Venice. Since the Chamber of Commerce meeting room was leaking under Race Through the Clouds, residents and merchants gathered in the lobby of the St. Mark Hotel to discuss methods of pumping the water to dry out the entertainment zone. But after the citywide destruction, it was agreed that no one was thinking about a fun day at the beach.
          However, it never took long for Angelenos to recover fro natural disasters and soon the city was dry and the beach and other entertainment was high on everyone’s list. Venice was the most popular destination on the coast and the crowds began to gather there once again.
          Due to Kinney’s connection to the citrus associations, he advertised and arranged a trip to the spectacular Orange Show in San Bernardino. A special banner-bedecked train was hired for the journey and at least 100 enthusiastic locals crowded aboard the cars. Tickets were  purchased for three dollars and the price included a special Venetian metal badge. The Doge had his own citrus display at the exposition but his plans included promoting his city, as well. Venice Day was listed on the program. A gigantic water tank was constructed and many pretty bathing girls were secured to display to fairgoers “how mermaids disport themselves at the beach.” A wide variety of entertainers were hired and Caesare LaMonaca’s Band played both on the trip and after reaching the Orange Show.
          Innes and Helen Kinney proudly announced the birth of their son in March of that year. Diminutive Kendrick was a strong, healthy boy who would do well in life. Abbot was thrilled to have a second grandson in his life at age 66 and announced that he planned many advantages for little Ken’s future. Helen had birthed a stillborn son just previously so everyone breathed a sigh of relief at the obvious health of the infant.
          April first, All Fools Day, was promoted in the seaside town with all manner of merriment. Everyone wore his best clothing to the parade of females that cavorted down the Broad Walk. Girls in the latest bathing attire, dancing ladies, Yama-Yama girls, females in Sunday finery, actresses advertising their latest movies, and just plain beautiful girlies waved and smiled as they skipped by the onlookers. A much- complained-about calliope from Race Through the Clouds was mounted on a float and brought up the rear. Its raucous tunes put the crowd in a delirious mood and the city kept businesses open all evening.
          For years, Kinney had what was considered an eyesore in his beloved city. The foundation for a luxury hotel was laid at the southwest corner of Windward and Ocean Front Walk but he did not want to finance the ultra-expensive, ultra-luxurious hostelry. The basement, with its pylons, lay below sea level and was a problem when storms ravaged the coast. The Doge finally leased the odd-looking pit to the owner of an alligator farm, who advertised his saurians as being over 2,000 years old and other nonsensical claims. A pretty handler named Princess Cleo was grabbed one afternoon by one of the ugly beasts and taken down. But other employees were able to save her life by repeatedly hitting it with a club. She retired from the business after that scare.
          Owner, H.E. Cross took her place in the “Farm,” and after preparing one reptile for transfer to another tank, it clamped down on his hand and rolled over on its back. The tall gentleman did not fall as the ‘gator expected but it did twist the victim’s arm painfully. Attendants beat the attacker with crowbars until he released his jaws and then he was herded back into an enclosure. Dr. J.B. Sands, Venice City Physician, worked on Cross in the emergency room to close his wounds and support his arm. City Fathers were appalled by the second attack, the comment it caused by the public, and the children with reported nightmares who witnessed the entire assault. They nullified the lease, forcing the alligators to find new quarters. When last heard from, all of the ancient scaly ones had taken up residence in another state.
          A “disorderly house” was reported to the Kinney Company by one of its neighbors and an arrest was made of the “madame” and her two “soiled doves.” Chief of Police Reynolds declared that while he was the head of the Venice force he would make every effort to rid the city of such places. The Kinney Company immediately had the rooming house license the establishment possessed, soundly revoked.
Venice celebrated its first decade anniversary of children’s Christmas parties December 25. This year, thespian Barney Sherry enacted the role of Santa and related appropriate stories while he distributed gifts. A holiday play with  music from LaMonaca’s Band providing background music, was presented with all juvenile actors. A 35-foot tree was located and brought to the Dance Pavilion by Reese and his crew and children looked up in awe at the splendid ornaments and gifts hanging on the branches. Each child received a bulging stocking, 3,000 of which were allocated. Each youngster was permitted to choose a wrapped gift from the tree and a grand ball followed. Gertrude Stanley, a noted coloratura soprano soloist, sang a special Christmas program.
          The celebration of the New Year was as eventful as the Christmas event in Venice. All of the usual ingredients were present in 1916: fireworks, parades, bands, bombs, serpentine dances, and the crowning of a queen made the evening larger than life. The parade left early from Race Through the Clouds for Los Angeles to advertise the big evening. More than 50 decorated autos, trucks, and trailers shouted the event in Canal City. Because Barnes Circus was once again wintering in the area, four giant camels, 20 ponies, and a cage with a baby lion and a baby tiger were led by the ringmaster on a white charger. Twenty-five beautiful movie starlets from different film companies rode circus ponies dressed in voluminous domino pantaloons. Yama-yama girls rode the camels.
          The masked ball was a tradition in the seaside city and this year the largest crowd ever showed up to see and be seen. Confetti battles, a Joker Band, and the raucous shriek of noise-makers prevailed for an entirely riotous night. Nothing exists today like the wonderful celebrations in Venice, and they probably will never be repeated.
          Memorializing 1917 continued the following day with an aquatic event off of the Kinney Pier. Plunge manager, Jake Cox, who regularly dove afire in a chicken suit from the pool’s rafters, presented 50-yard swimming dashes for the youngsters of the area. The aquatic lunch, served from a boat while swimmers treaded water, was passed by this year. Instead the Mack Sennett comedy stars did routines in the briny liquid which the newspaper promised would make those present laugh until their sides ached.
          Warren Wilson, aged only 61, passed away in his Venice home at 15 Ocean Spray Avenue. His daughter, Lois, had married Sherwood Kinney shortly after the family moved to the Los Angeles area. Wilson was the former editor of a San Diego newspaper and founded a well-known legal sheet called The Index while the family resided in San Bernardino. His home in Venice was considered a beach cottage despite the fact that it was large and 2-stories tall. The viewing was held in the parlor of that dwelling while his large family gathered to mourn.
          Manfredi Chiaffarelli, slowly recovering from the shooting death of his daughter, four years previously, surprised the district when his full-scale opera, One Night in Venice, was staged at the Pier Auditorium. The opera’s storyline featured thinly disguised members of the Doge’s family. The hero, Thornton Kinney, was called Mark and like most operas, it was a love story. Ending in tragedy, the musical extravaganza featured many well-known singers, some of world renown. The theme was one of “youthful life and color,” said the Vanguard . “The composer captures the matchless spirit of Venice.” Although the critical acclaim was outstanding, the people of the district were not culturally inclined and the performances were not well attended.
          In an attempt to reveal city graft and corruption in Venice, the Grand Jury called Kinney and others to testify. Abbot informed the august body that often his work in relation to the town’s welfare was hampered because of the accepted manner of doing business but that he had no direct knowledge of any paybacks. He added that he did think that the charge was suspect. The other nine men subpoenaed testified in a like manner so the Jury put the matter on hold until more facts were available.
          World War I was uppermost in the minds of all Americans after the United States entered the fray on April 6. Price began to climb, especially on meat and the hot dogs on the Pier went from five-cents to ten-cents. Draft registration began May 18 and every man who reached 21 on or before June 5 had to register. Anyone over 31 was exempt. Vacant lots were planted with vegetables and Kinney joined with the Chamber of Commerce to suggest rabbit drives to supplement meat shortages. Liberty Loan bond drives began in the City of Angels with Venice cooperating. Eighteen million dollars was the goal and Venetians dug deep into their pockets when movie stars like Mary Pickford and Douglas Fairbanks, Sr. appeared to ask for funds.
          The Arcade Buffet issued orders that every male of doubtful age in town be required to show a draft card with his birthday inscribed before being served a drink. The idea was that if one couldn’t fight for his country, he could not drink in it, either. The expose of “slackers” was a moral issue in Canal City.
          Word came through his brother to Abbot Kinney that his older sister, Contesa Constance Gianotti, widow of Conte Casare Gianotti, and owner of a well-known palace in Rome, had passed to her reward.  Survived by two daughters, she was one of the most famous figures in Italian court circles.
          Three-cent postage was imposed on the general public for mail addressed to recipients outside of the Los Angeles area. In keeping with higher prices to assist the war effort, (red) meatless days were announced by the government. It was stated that the troops had to be fed the best diet possible and that precipitated a shortage of all kinds of groceries. Buffets and cafes in Canal City made do with fish and chicken substitutes for beef, ham, and pork. The Vanguard labeled those who continued to eat meat as unpatriotic and butchers, declaring that they sold no prohibited meat, said there was no consumption of such at all.
          There was a movement in the St. Mark Plaza to raise $1,000 requested by the war effort. Fearing that his citizens could not contribute that much from their meager salaries, Kinney started the fund by donating the $1,000. Other residents were urged to give as much as possible. Later, C.A. Short of the War Activities Clearing House said the collection of monies was the highest of any drive ever spearheaded in the town. After the total was announced, Sherwood Kinney joined the army and was sent away to basic training in Washington State.
          With the war commanding attention on all fronts, Abbot staged his usual Christmas party for the kiddies with some modifications and the pulling of strings. Sugar was very difficult to obtain so residents were asked to donate their rations to the Kinney Company. However, with their own celebrations in mind, an ample amount was not gathered. Bearing in mind that the Rationing Board was composed of the Doge’s friends and acquaintances, he took the liberty of requesting to purchase additional pounds of the sweet grains and was able to fulfill his quota. Young Helen and Clan, children of Abbot and Winifred Kinney, acted as masters of ceremony.
          A Mardi Gras Festival marked the end of 1917 and the beginning of 1918. The downtown area was decorated with American flags  and bunting which had been displayed on all of the private homes in the city. Auto horns and noise-makers were in audible evidence while jazz bands played lively music at the Dance Pavilion. Angelenos and Bay area folks had come to Venice to forget their troubles, if for only one day.
          The Rose Parade float for 1918 was an example of the genius of Arthur Reese when his appropriate design for the City of Venice took to the streets of Pasadena. The calliope, much abused in Venice because it could be heard all over town when it was played, was the centerpiece. The only colors used were green and red, which were considered suitable in wartime. The Red Cross emblem and the town’s name were the only use of the red carnations on the extravaganza.
          Eggs were now in short supply as well as meat and sugar so California residents were advised to not cook them more than one time per week. Everyone was tightening his belt for the troops and “starving children in Europe.” At a public forum, Venetians discussed methods not already employed for saving food and Venice resident, Oscar Redinsky, revealed his plan for selling Thrift Stamps and booklets. When one was able to obtain so many gasoline or sugar stamps, they could be used to “buy” the item. Oscar further stated that the stamps could be used as tips for waiters in restaurants. Everyone was thrilled with the idea and adopted it immediately, when the stamps were printed.
          Prices on food were still rising and were reckoned at 25% higher. The manager of Menotti’s Grocery was elected to handle the ration of food in the town with the cooperation of the police. Wheatless days were Monday, Wednesday, and at all evening meals. Porkless days were Tuesday, Saturday and at all lunches. Sugar prices were cut by one-tenth and all waste was eliminated. The Vanguard set the slogan, “Eat sufficient to make you efficient.” Loss of our freedom was in question if we did not win the war. Aliens were required to register with the postmaster and those with Germanic surnames tried to Anglicize them or keep a low profile. Those who were called Kaiser and Zimmermann became King and Carpenter, the English translations of their German appellations.
          Abbot donated space at the corner of Westminster and Trolleyway to be utilized as a Red Cross headquarters. Both women and children knitted socks and caps for the soldiers and also established a small rummage store. The funds made in the shop were used to buy yarn. They rolled bandages, as well, and when gauze became scarce, were requested to sacrifice some of their own wardrobe to earn the cash to pay for more material. Everyone pulled together.
           Stampeded by a small dog entering a ring of the Barnes Circus in their winter quarters, five elephants thundered into the streets of Venice. Autos slammed on their brakes and sat terrified of being smashed, Pedestrians ducked into doorways, some on a flying roll. Trumpeting as they picked up speed, they clumped along Mildred Avenue with an assistant instructor running frantically behind. The head handler, Sidney Rink, saddled a horse and it took him a mile of racing to catch up with the big beasts. When Chief, the leader of the pachyderms saw Rink facing him, he turned the herd and were led leisurely back to the barn, as if nothing had occurred.  Taking advantage of the large hole in the fence, a number of horses and four camels made good their escape, too. They were chased by circus employees and returned to the barn, to the relief of terrified shoppers and merchants.
          Mayor Ed Gerety was charged and tried for graft and corruption. At his trial Abbot Kinney and many others testified as to the mayor’s sterling character and it only took the jury 15 minutes to declare him innocent of the charges. Gerety stated that he was never concerned about the outcome and bore no malice towards those who had sought to harm him. He finished by adding that he would not seek revenge for their sins against him and that they would be the victims of their own consciences. 
          Twenty-thousand spectators lined the coast to observe 500 soldiers from Fort MacArthur march in dress uniforms in a musical parade. When it was judged that a plethora of patriotic zeal was attained, the third issue of Liberty Bonds commenced to add to the war effort. The Venice Publicity Department of the Kinney Company in concert with the Chamber of Commerce deduced that since mock naval battles had been so successful in the canaled city’s past, another would be staged to benefit The War Relief Fund.
          Another 20,000 souls jammed the pier and the coast near Venice. Two land batteries, three military tractors, and a large torpedo boat destroyer bombarded a sham U-boat. Baron Long, Proprietor of the Ship Café, decorated his yacht to make it appear like the torpedo boat destroyer and running it to and fro, would take shots at the conning tower of the fake U-boat. The tractors flew over the “German enemy,” and dropped their bombs after the sub was above surface. Half-dressed personnel fell into the salty water and were captured by the destroyer. The submarine was blown to little pieces. Everyone cheered when a rocket burst high above the crowd and, attached to a parachute, an American flag unfurled. It was the most stirring sight of the noisy and spectacular fight.
          To keep spirits aloft and relieve the depression of having to do without, the Kinney Company announced another bathing suit parade. More than 65,000 turned up to view it, mostly males. Moving Picture Companies were in evidence to advertise their latest photoplays and many young women showed up for the beauty contest with all manner of supposed swimwear. The costumes were military, circusy, patriotic, and some, just plain strange. A few suits would have been ruined upon entering any type of water. Many carried a prop such as a toy, some twirled parasols, some donned hats, and in the former fashion of the day, a few sported stockings. The operator of the Baby Bank, Mrs. Behrens, who ran a business where one could obtain babysitting for the day, brought a carload of small children, all outfitted in swim wear. The parade was only six-blocks-long but it featured many contestants for the competition. Some asserted laughingly that the kiddies were the cutest and should win all of the prizes.
           Because of the dearth of young men created by the enlistment, young women tried out and were accepted for both Bath House and Plunge lifeguards. A few of the more heavily muscled ladies were chosen for the beach as ocean lifesavers. It was whispered behind hands that no real man would like to be rescued by a lady, even if she was a better swimmer.
          Caesare LaMonaca had returned to Venice from a stint as bandmaster at the beautiful Coronado resort near San Diego. Since Venice was between bands, LaMonaca was hired once again. Thinking that the Italian man was not an American citizen, Venetians whispered about his age being over 31. When it was discovered that he was a naturalized citizen and still only 30-years-of-age, he was arrested by government inspectors. Denying his status as a “slacker,” LaMonaca posted his own $1,000 bail. When he appeared again at concerts, residents did not think it fitting that he should play patriotic music so Kinney called the man into his office and, in effect, fired him. Later the former Italian joined the U.S. Navy to prove his loyalty to his new country and was placed as bandmaster to a naval orchestra. His music was missed by the townspeople but not his deception.
          For a reason unknown to Venetians, the Spanish Influenza pandemic did not affect Venice at its outset. It was surmised that the flu was kept at bay because of ocean winds and the washing of streets with salt water each morning. It struck first abroad and then spread to the United States by the returning soldiers. Visitors stayed away from the seaside town in droves, hoping not to be infected. Those who were forced to go to the business district held a handkerchief across their nose and mouth. On October 11, an order was issued to close all places of public congregation: schools, churches, the Pier, the Plunge, dance halls, restaurants, and motion picture houses. An especially appointed health overseer ordered the use of disinfectants. However, only a few days later, another order rescinded parts of the former one and the Plunge reopened. Band concerts were permitted because they took place outdoors in salubrious salt air.
          With a canny foresight that characterized his entire life, Abbot began to plan for peace even though the war was still in progress. A war trophy exhibit was foremost in his agenda so he penned a letter to Henry Osbourne, his Congressman. Forewarding his request to the War Trophy Department, the government man collected the items needed for Kinney’s display.
          Always the center of information for Venice, the Vanguard was the first to receive word that the war was over. Germany had completely surrendered. Auto horns began blaring and the town emergency siren at the powerhouse aroused the entire city. Never in its history had Venice hosted such a spontaneous celebration. A parade was organized by the Kinney Company for the following day. Since the Barnes Circus was again wintering in town, they contributed camels, elephants, and other exotic animals to march at the head of the procession. The Venice-of-America Band followed playing patriotic music as they had never played it before. There was music, tears, shouting, tears, singing, tears, laughter, and more tears. The word ,”Peace,” was heard everywhere.
          The government announced that they were bringing 300,000 soldiers home for Christmas and they would keep shipping the boys home until all of them were back with their families. As vets returned to their own domiciles, the Kinneys welcomed son, Sherwood, back to Canal City.
          Although the war casualties and the flu had lowered spirits of most Angelenos, the Doge proceeded with public Christmas plans. The disease seemed to be mostly gone so it seemed safe to erect the usual large tree. From 2:00 P.M. to 5:00 P.M. on Christmas Day the little ones received gifts and stockings, rode ponies, and took part in a grand march around the tree. Charity was not forgotten as free live turkeys were distributed to those in need. Band concerts, fireworks, and a dance were provided for adults.
          A scaled-back version of New Year’s Eve was planned and many features such as confetti were absent from the usual celebration. Residents dressed in their best costumes for the Grand Domino Ball at the Dance Pavilion. The local district turned out en masse to see the old year out and pray that they never saw another like it.
           


Chapter Thirteen
Ebb-Tide
          The year of 1919 began on a high note with soldiers still returning from overseas. After a third wave of influenza, health officials declared that there would be no more contagion. However one to four cases were still being reported daily and even though the death rate was not high, Venetians still eyed anyone who coughed suspiciously. The death of City Electrician, Lou Eager, was a blow to the residents because he was well-liked and highly efficient at his job. That most popular restauranteur, Caesare Mennotti, succumbed in a similar manner.
           In late January, the Grim Reaper took William A. Rennie, but the causes were natural and not flu-related. Rennie opened a small weekly newspaper on Windward Avenue in 1907 and it progressed to a daily newspaper and move to Mildred Avenue not many years later. The publisher was also a Justice of the Peace and City Recorder at the time of his pneumonia-related demise. He was succeeded at the Vanguard by sons, Robert and Walter.
          It was known around town that George Freeth, fearless star of the 1908 spectacular lifesaving event, was living in San Diego and was battling influenza. When word of his death on April 7 was telephoned up the coast, swimmers and locals, alike, could not believe it. He was The Man Who Walked on Water. Champions such as George Freeth do not die. As Arthur C. Verge, Ph.D., wrote in California History, Volume LXXX No. 2/3 (Summer/Fall, 2001): “From the shores of Hawaii to the sands of California, George Freeth touched the lives of thousands for the better. Fulfilling the true calling of a hero, he repeatedly risked his own life so that others could live. His individual courage and personal actions on behalf of those in great danger stand as a final testament to a true, but often forgotten, hero of California history.” There was no higher calling.
          The Board of Trustees, led by Abbot Kinney, decided to take a step to modernize the Venice Police Department. Otto Meyerhoffer was appointed to his post as first aerial policeman in the country. He could outfly speeding cars, running criminals, and provide aid to watercraft in distress. His plane could reach the speed of 100 miles-per-hour and it was bandied about that he was possibly the best pilot the nation had to offer. A second plane to carry dead bodies was purchased by Canal City very shortly after the purchase of the first aircraft. Its name, Black Mariah, another name for hearse, was painted on the side. All of the motion picture companies had a camera in operation at the site and films of the most advanced method in catching criminals were shown wherever there were movie houses.
          The seaside town was struggling to divest itself from the horror of war, only to be followed by the dread of disease and dying. A 1919 Venice Fashion Review was announced. All of the Los Angeles shops vied with one another as well as those on the Westside. The selection of clothing was spectacular in its diversity and each store entered its best finery to compete with other emporiums. Both child and adult models were displayed on living persons and one was Miss Helen Kinney in a pink chiffon dress with a pink hat. One small girl was even dressed as a kewpie doll, which were very popular prizes given on the pier for guessing one’s weight. In all, a record crowd of over 100,000 was seen in the city that day.
          Kinney founded libraries in Pasadena and Santa Monica but the only such institution in Venice was a small structure located in the depths of Villa City. The Doge decided that the only way he could accomplish a city library was to donate the land. So his announcement did not come as much of a surprise to residents because they had heard him speak of such an establishment for many years. The junction of Grand Canal and the Lagoon was comprised of three lots and a foundation had already been poured for another building. Surprisingly, one of his most prominent proponents was his old enemy Dana Burks, who had opposed many of Abbot’s projects in the past. The gift was offered to the City Fathers but funds to construct a Venetian-style Library, as Kinney wished, were not available. A book lending institution was never constructed in his day and when one was erected, it was located elsewhere.
          Many thousand of the area’s imbibers of alcohol gathered in Venice to grieve a Congressional decision to ban liquor in the future. The canaled city celebrated for three unbroken days of festivities with a Parade of Mourners who sobbed while they kept step with a funeral dirge. The Non-Alcoholic Quartet warbled about Near Beer while confetti fights and dancing kept the festivities at a fever pitch. Although spirits were not yet completely banned, citizens held their collective breaths awaiting Congress to announce Prohibition. Crowds continued to pour into Canal City. The founder was heard to say that it was the really the beach and sunshine that brought visitors to the coast and to his town.
          Kinney, who founded a Tennis Club in years past, announced a tournament for the July 4th week. The Vanguard made mention of his donation of valuable prizes. Abbot, a former Southern California Men’s Singles Champion, saw to it that the four tennis courts were always kept in immaculate condition so the membership was large. The Doge and his two sons, Sherwood and Carlton, took part in the contest, after which Abbot presented the prizes to the winners.
          Ince Aviation Field had purchased the old Venice Flying Field and movie producer, Ince, was exploring the idea of hydroplane landings and a parking area on the beach. Bert Lennon, personal representative for Ince, was invited, along with a submarine chaser crew hired to study the conditions of the beach, to a dance at the Pavilion. Many single Venetian ladies volunteered to hostess at the event. This sub chaser was rumored to be one of the best the United States Navy had to offer and one of the fastest, as well. Local people flocked to the Pier to get a glimpse of the unusual ship.
          Lennon, a publicist who resided in Venice, was the father of a large family of singers. Eventually one son produced the world-famous Lennon Sisters, who sang, for many years on the Lawence Welk television show.
          Ceremonies were held at night for the grand opening of Thomas H. Ince Aviation Field with town founder, Kinney presenting the opening address. Ince, motion picture maker, responded with another speech. He offered $50,000 to the first person who could make a trans-Pacific flight. Miss Violet Oliver, a pretty Venice High School student christened the new aviation center while hydroplane, airplanes, balloons, and dirigibles floated in the air above the hangers. Aeroplanes were a national fad and the heroes of the day were pilots and wing walkers. These were the last years of Ince’s life as he died aboard the Oneida, a boat owned by William Randolph Hearst. His cause of death is a mystery to the present day.
          The Soldiers and Sailors Home, founded by Kinney and the only free establishment for servicemen visiting in the area was torn down.. At first it provided quarters for the men, numbering as many as 10,000 through the years. On Clubhouse Avenue, it served meals and never turned away a single needy soldier or sailor. After the government took over the operation, details began to slip and maintenance was shoddy. When things finally became untenable, the home closed its doors forever.
          Miss Maizie Kinney, companion to Winifred Harwell Kinney for many years and informally adopted by the Doge, said that there was a great need for small low-rent houses in Venice, like the ones she managed in Villa City. The warm summer climes brought those from the city to cool down at the beach and the winter cold of the north brought “snow birds” to warm up in the coastal sun, as well.
          The Lew Lewis Orchestra played for the big Christmas Party for the children. Local dancing classes presented a part of the show and were costumed as kewpies, fairies, and dolls of different ethnicities. Mild illness kept Abbot Kinney away from the most strenuous part of the merriment but a number of adults remembered his generosity to themselves in years past. Free chickens and turkeys were given to the needy all day and the Ship Café prepared hot meals for the homeless, as well.
          To sum up the past twelve months as the final days of December slipped by, it was said that 1917 and 1918 had been difficult but that Venice was resuming its old stance in the community. However, as usual, the passing of any year is a sad event.  
          An economic upswing continued into the year, 1920. Maizie Henderson Kinney’s words were prophetic in the need of Venice living quarters and citizens were asked by the Chamber of Commerce to list every spare room they could rent. It was even put forth that tents could be erected in backyards and furnished minimally. A cookstove should be included, they added as an afterthought but somehow, outdoor plumbing was conveniently forgotten.
          A funeral and wake were held in Venice when old John Barleycorn was declared completely dead by Congress. The day before Prohibition formally was launched, a city worker purchased an entire keg of beer and informed the Chief Engineer that it was to be drunk by city workers only. When word got around, courtesy of the town gossips, not one city worker called in sick that day. The “Drys” of the district rejoiced that Demon Alcohol would no longer be available but, of course, they had not yet begun to contend with the creative minds of some of the “Wets.”
           The two Chiefs of Police, Watson and Loomis were asked if they had collected much of the now-forbidden liquor and Watson pointed to the many containers that were surrendered by drunks being brought into jail. Some were not of the drinkable variety and just contained spirits. The Vanguard asked Loomis if females drank as much as men and his answer was in the negative. He did add that women preferred Jamaica ginger or even cologne as it tasted better than denatured alcohol. However, perfume left a dreadful hangover the following morning.
           Kinney, feeling less well than usual, went to see his physician for the results of tests and came home to tell Winifred the sad news. He had a cancerous tumor in his left lung and nothing could be done to save his life. Although Abbot was of the opinion that cigarettes were lethal to the smoker, he always believed that if one waited until he was over 30, they would be past the age of danger. He was a heavy smoker and usually lit one cigarette off of the one he just finished. He also smoked a pipe on occasion. However, in 1920, little could be done to prolong his life or save it.
          The family kept his health a secret and as Tony was already being groomed for the position of Kinney Company president, things went on pretty much as usual. The Doge still swam in the ocean every morning and took his walk around the canals but the clock was ticking and the family mourned him even before his actual demise. Kinney already had his estate set up and secured his millions in an unbreakable 12-year trust fund so that his wife and each child got exactly what he wished to give them.
           The great Scenic Railway receipts had been suffering since the Race Through the Clouds was installed a few years back. So its owner disassembled it and rebuilt it in Ocean Park. A new luxury theater was there to take its place. The motion picture house had all leather seats, deep carpets, and a lavish foyer that were definite attractions. An intermission was popular in early performances. It allowed patrons to purchase food and drink and gave older females time to lie down in the Resting Room and loosen their stays. The California Theater was a popular venue for many years to come.
          Mildred Harris Chaplin was the young wife of the world-renowned silent film comedian, Charlie Chaplin. Having grown up on Brooks Avenue in Venice, the girl made news in the Vanguard with her divorce suit against London-born Charles. She charged him with desertion of several months and said she had not even seen him in two weeks. The Little Tramp’s only reply was, “Such is life in the great West.”
           Divorces seemed to be contagious among famous Venetians as the Al Jolsons also obtained their final decree. Henrietta got her jewelry, the family home in Oakland, and $16,000 in cash. Al obtained his freedom and items the Vanguard did not enumerate.
           A large fight broke out when the City of Venice took the small Center Street Pier lease from the Abbot Kinney Company and handed it over for a 15-year span to an individual named Carrol J. Daly.  The lease had been in place since Kinney built the wharf in 1907 but he had made the mistake of donating the tidelands back to Venice and then leased it back. He did the same with the Kinney Pier at Windward Avenue and when the outrage started, three of the Town Fathers revoked that lease as well. Trustees Lutz and Gerety sided with the Doge as did his lawyer. However, Trustees Holbrook and Harrah (later of Lake Tahoe gambling fame,) stood with Mayor Coles on the matter. The license to the Piers were both cancelled by the town Kinney had also built. 
          Many residents were aghast. Mayor Dudley, Kinney’s former partner, wrote that it seemed that no investment in the Piers would be safe as it would appear that any agreement could be cancelled at any time. Many prominent citizens wrote of their disbelief but the revocation held and the Kinneys lost control of the Pier.
            Frank Prior, son of the now deceased colonel Tom, and his partner, Fred Church, announced the grand opening of the Big Dipper rollercoaster at the entrance to the Kinney Pier. “The biggest dips of any coaster in existence,” was their claim and the public could not wait to step aboard. Seriously concerned about accidents, the large mechanism was tested for seven days straight before any tickets to ride were sold to visitors. A Mrs. Hall christened the cars with ocean water after they were stopped at their highest point. The line of tethered cars was returned to the gate at that point, amidst loud cheering and passengers were allowed to board.
          The citizenry of the district was appalled when gasoline prices rose from 23 cents per gallon to 26 cents. A gas shortage was looming in the area and all of the stations in the district were dry, even the city lot. Chief Engineer Crawford declared that he did not know when petrol would be available again or its price.
          King Neptune was a thief and many women reported loss of their jewelry in the ocean to the Venice Police. Wedding rings to pins and brooches worn on their bathing suits were ripe pickings for the King of the Sea. One afternoon, a middle-aged gentleman who was known and noticed on the sands every day because of his lustrous locks and his eccentricity of wearing a bathing cap to protect them, came for his daily dunk. When a cruel wave knocked him down he was surprised but not more than the ladies in his fan club. The water washed not only the hat from his head but the toupee underneath and deposited it at their feet. The baldheaded Romeo stood up and being careful not to look at the giggling ladies, strode off into the sunset forever, leaving cap and hair to fend for themselves.
          The second most stolen item by the Sea King was store-bought teeth. When Neptune decided to throw the choppers back up onto the sands, a notice was printed in the newspaper and toothless folks would show up from all over the county to discern if the set belonged to them. It was even reported that teeth lost in one location would show up a year later in the same spot.
          The U.S.S. Idaho appeared in the Bay and the tired crew was welcomed to Venice with a bouquet of flowers dropped by Aviatrix Lois Barr. In the center was an invitation to free access to all of the amusements. Bathing, canal boat rides, and a dance in the Pavilion with single young women hostessing, under the strict eyes of overseers, was also offered.
          When Chief of Police Loomis was informed about an illegal still in the center of the residential neighborhood, he raided the house and tipped the contents of the apparatus into the gutter. The 300 gallons of mash was in an advanced state of fermentation and the odor brought birds from all over town to the scene to peck at the leavings. Chickens and pigeons comprised the main characters of the flock and they all enjoyed the spirits even, if they were not legal to drink. Many avians did not make it home to their roosts that night. They staggered under porches and leaned upright against fences, sound asleep and soundly drunk. The pigeons that Abbot Kinney had imported from Rome, Italy, slept on the ground. Some were killed attempting to fly but misjudging windows and walls. A veterinarian remarked that their headaches had to be fierce the next day but the birds came back to what was left in the gutter and began another binge the following morning.
         The terminal illness of the founder of Venice, Abbot Kinney, finally was announced in the Vanguard when the Doge could no longer hide his weight loss and his lack of energy. Dr. M.G. Gates visited the Kinney home on Cosmos Point and informed the Kinneys that he did not have much time left. Finally, Abbot was lapsing in and out of consciousness and his kidneys stopped functioning. The town siren and the curfew whistle were not blown at Winifred’s request. Attendance was down at the Pier and it was evident that the city held its collective breath. Three days later, at 6:20 A.M., he took his last shuddering gasp. The King of Venice was gone. He died as he had lived: quietly. His affairs were all in order, and everyone had their instructions.
           His body lay on display at home for a few hours while close friends and his family stood by. He was driven to a Santa Monica Funeral Home and then Reverend C.W. Hollister of the Episcopal Church of the Good Shepherd conducted a private service for the family. The public service at Woodlawn Cemetery was characterized by massive floral displays and telegrams of condolence from friends, admirers, and public figures, alike. The Doge of Venice was hailed as a man with a unique personality and a gentleman of rare attainment and courage. Even those who disagreed with him in the past said he had magnetism that drew friends and retained them. Mayor Coles, who just months before, cancelled the lease for the Kinney Pier, ordered town business to cease for an hour. City flags flew in the stiff ocean breeze at half-mast. The amusement section dowsed their lights in respect. A naval unit anchored in the Bay, sailed away in sympathy of the town’s loss.
          Governor Stephens gave a eulogy at the Band Plaza in which he labeled Kinney as a great Californian who was admired for his wealth of goodness. State Senator Charles W. Lyon called him the “noblest of men.” A pall was cast over Venice and visitors stayed away from the area. Rents even began to drop.
          Thornton Kinney, new head of the Kinney Company at his father’s written edict, said that celebrations for Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year’s Eve would go on as usual but his words were not far-seeing and another disaster was looming over the already grieving Venice. This Christmas and New Year’s celebrations would be unlike any other.
          It began in the Dance Pavilion in a private box where Dr. Byron Palmer and his party were seated. Christmas was five days away and the party was celebrating the coming of festivities. He noticed that a small heater seemed to be too warm and leaned forward to turn it down. As he did, flames leaped out and suddenly the box and its surroundings were alive with fire. Patrons at the hall exited through the doors in an orderly fashion and no one seemed panicked.
          Town Decorator, Arthur Reese, who built the gas heaters said the conflagration could not have started in this manner. He claimed the heaters were fabricated with heavy fireproof boxes encasing the elements and fire could not escape from them. He postulated that a hot match or dropped cigarette was the real culprit. Fire investigation was almost unknown in 1920 so no one’s story was provable. 
          The blaze moved quickly down the Pier, engulfing the Ship Café, a bowling alley, concession stands, the Aquarium, and shops. The California Theater was just barely saved as was the Plunge and the St. Mark Hotel. It was a nightmare from a moving picture that no one wanted to witness. A frantic melee rushed to the police station to deposit prizes from concession stands such as pocket knives, dolls, feathers, decks of cards, rubber duckies, and paste jewelry were dumped in armloads on cell floors by the owners of the booths. One horrified man raced back and forth from his shop to the station depositing live turkeys that he gave for prizes on the station floor before the flames could get them.  A terrified young woman, Ola Belle Williams, age 19, ran with a cash register too heavy for her slight frame and gave herself a lifelong painful hernia.
          Thieves saw their chance and risked their lives to steal merchandise from unwatched locations. Some were arrested, and one was a Santa Monica High School boy. The carousel, the Ocean Inn, the garage on the auto park part of the Pier as well as some cars, were lost. A women living above the Dance Pavilion had to be rescued by a steeplejack. Despite the ocean water, firefighters were severely handicapped by the monstrous size of the fire. Thousands of residents lined the shores to watch one of the most spectacular catastrophes that had ever happened in Southern California. Guests packed and left from surrounding hotels as soon as the trouble began.
          An historic landmark was lost when the Auditorium was consumed. It was there where Bernhardt played and there where Venetians identified events from their passing years. Many watchers were in tears and some sobbed uncontrollably.
          Only one death was attributed to the great fire and that person was Fire Captain Herbert Harlan. Sadly, he was given his position as a reward for catching a hold-up man on a Red Car. Harlan was inundated by falling walls on the south side of the Kinney Pier. It did not appear that his injuries were fatal but he passed away in the hospital from trauma and multiple burns. It was astonishing that only one death occurred in the conflagration.
          The fire was still smoking the following day but everything on the Pier except the Big Dipper was ash. It looked like a bombed out war zone. People with box cameras moved around the safer areas but most stayed at home, silent and somber. Thornton Kinney announced that the lease to the new Venice Pier would be held by the Kinney Company, and that they would begin rebuilding as soon as the debris was removed. He also announced that Christmas would still be celebrated, but in a different way.
          The huge holiday tree was erected in front of the St. Mark Hotel, glittering in contrast to the burned remains. Three thousand youngsters gathered for their stockings, candy, and fruit. But there was no music, no plays, no grand march around the tree… and most of all, no Abbot Kinney.
           Because the Dance Pavilion was gone, the Grand Domino Masked Ball had to be moved. Blackened ruins stood like menacing ghosts as flooring was laid across the pool of the Plunge. The Venice-of-America Band played from memory as their music sheets had been burned in the fire or soaked by hoses. No one minded a few mistakes and though the gaiety might have been forced, everyone was grateful for what they did have and no one wanted to look back.
          When the year of 1920 hobbled out of Venice, it took with it the shards of the city’s finest times. The Town Father, Abbot Kinney, was gone and could no longer look after their best interests. The Kinney Pier was gone, as well, and with it, the most treasured of folks’ childhood memories. Gone were the cultural events. Gone was the unbridled fun. Gone was the Era of Innocence. Gone.
          
          

Epilogue

          Countries like Rome and Greece ascend into great power, have their positive or negative effect on the nations they rule, and then topple. Similarly, heavenly bodies glitter in the skies above us, causing naïve mankind to make decisions based on the alignment of barely-seen planets. Then, they too, cease to shine and their light is lost forever. Men with self-confident and resilient personalities make an impermeable impression that sends a beacon down through the ages. Neither the passage of time nor any sequence of events can modify or foul that impress. Abbot Kinney was such a beacon in his universe of the late 19th and early 20th century. He was the author of seven books, as well as the author of his own life. As much as any human being can be, he was an example for cultivating what was good and right. 
           A poor person who lives to bring beneficial influence in the world will engender positive reaction in his neighbors. His actions bless all of those who come in contact with him. However, a millionaire who lives by nobility has the authority to influence those in distant and isolated locales and through many intervals of time.  Such a man was Abbot Kinney. No inhabitant of his age has more completely impacted the history of Southern California than the Doge of Venice. His opinion was sought by the greatest minds of Los Angeles County and his decisions in the business of many varied subjects were utilized to promote that which was constructive for his fellow human beings.
          He was a modest man. His given name does not appear on his tombstone by his special request, only his surname. Perhaps he best said it himself when once asked by a reporter why he did not name Venice after himself. His reply was,” There were pharaohs in Egypt who spent their lives building pyramids that would serve to perpetuate them forever. And people even forgot how to read the language in which their achievements were written. What do you think the chances are for my being remembered?”



          
          
          



          

          





